ELECTRONIC  ON-BOARD  RECORDERS  (EOBRs)  AND 

TRUCK  DRIVER  FATIGUE  REDUCTION 

S.  HRG.  110–1205 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION 

AND MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, 

SAFETY, AND SECURITY 

OF THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

MAY  1,  2007 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

79–551 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2013 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  TENTH  CONGRESS 

FIRST  SESSION 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Vice  Chairman 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Policy  Director 

CHRISTINE D.  KURTH,  Republican  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  SURFACE  TRANSPORTATION  AND  MERCHANT 

MARINE  INFRASTRUCTURE,  SAFETY,  AND  SECURITY 

FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey, 

Chairman 

JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 
THOMAS  R.  CARPER,  Delaware 
CLAIRE  MCCASKILL,  Missouri 
AMY  KLOBUCHAR,  Minnesota 

GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon,  Ranking 
JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 
JOHN  THUNE,  South  Dakota 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

Page 
1 
55 
1 
25 
2 

28 
30 
12 
14 

2 
4 

34 
36 
50 
53 

38 
40 
7 
9 

61 

69 
64 
71 

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on May 1, 2007 
.................................................................................
Statement of Senator Klobuchar  ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Smith  ...................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Harrison, Captain John E., President, Commercial Vehicle Safety Alliance 

Gabbard,  Jerry  G.,  Vice  President  and  General  Manager,  Commercial  Vehi-
cles, NAFTA Region, Siemens VDO Automotive Corporation  ..........................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
.....
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Hill,  Hon.  John  H.,  Administrator,  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administra-
tion, U.S. Department of Transportation  ...........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
McCartt,  Anne  T.,  Senior  Vice  President,  Research,  Insurance  Institute  for 
Highway Safety  ....................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Olson, Richard G., CEO, FIL-MOR Express, Inc.  .................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Reiser,  Richard  S.,  on  behalf  of  the  American  Trucking  Associations,  Inc. 
(ATA); Executive Vice President and General Counsel, Werner Enterprises, 
Inc.; Chairman, ATA’s Hours-of-Service Committee  .........................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
....
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Rosenker, Hon. Mark V., Chairman, National Transportation Safety Board 

APPENDIX 

Rajkovacz,  Joe,  Member,  Board  of  Directors,  Owner-Operator  Independent 
Drivers Association, prepared statement  ...........................................................
Response  to  written  questions  submitted  by  Hon.  Frank  R.  Lautenberg  to: 
Captain John E. Harrison  ................................................................................
Hon. John H. Hill  .............................................................................................
Richard S. Reiser  ..............................................................................................

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

ELECTRONIC  ON-BOARD  RECORDERS  (EOBRs) 

AND  TRUCK  DRIVER  FATIGUE  REDUCTION 

TUESDAY,  MAY  1,  2007 

SUBCOMMITTEE ON SURFACE TRANSPORTATION AND 

MERCHANT MARINE INFRASTRUCTURE, SAFETY, AND SECURITY,
COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  2:35  p.m.  in  room 
SR–253, Russell Senate Office Building, Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg, 
Chairman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Our  Subcommittee  hearing  today  is  on 

electronic on-board recorders and truck driver fatigue reduction. 

I  want  to  welcome  everyone  to  today’s  hearing  as  we  begin  the 
Subcommittee’s  work  on  truck  safety.  It’s  a  factor  that  worries  all 
of us, particularly in a state like mine which has high-density trav-
el,  and  in  New  Jersey,  we  are  very  conscious  of  risk  that  we  face 
with a mixture of cars and trucks on the same roads, all competing 
for space and time. 

Today,  we’re  going  to  focus  on  reducing  truck  driver  fatigue 
through  the  use  of  safety  technologies.  Each  year,  some  43,000 
Americans die in traffic crashes; 5,000 of them are killed in a crash 
with a large truck. Surveys show that as many as one in five truck 
drivers  regularly  exceeds  the  maximum  hours  that  they  may  drive 
under the law, and we know that that fatigue causes crashes. 

The  paper  logbook  system  for  recording  driver  time  is  outdated, 
easy  to  falsify,  and  fails  to  ensure  safety.  But  there’s  an  existing 
technology  available  to  better  enforce  our  safety  laws.  A  device, 
presented over here on the table, called an ‘‘electronic on-board re-
corder,’’ could help prevent tragedies by giving trucking companies 
and law enforcement officials a way to enforce hours-of-service. 

These  recorders  can  be  installed  in  a  truck’s  cab,  made  tamper-
proof,  and  programmed  like  a  black  box  to  record  safety  data,  in-
cluding  engine  operation,  location,  mileage,  speed,  and  braking 
data.  Further,  I  believe  that  these  recorders  could  be  used  to  help 
drivers accurately log the time spent loading and unloading trucks 
at  terminals.  This  work,  and  the  delays  that  sometimes  occur  at 
these  facilities,  can  significantly  add  to  driver  fatigue,  consumes  a 
lot of time. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

2 

Last,  on-board  recorders  can  save  time  and  money  for  truckers 
and  trucking  companies  by  reducing  paperwork,  improving  fleet 
management, and increasing safety. 

Electronic  on-board  recorders  are  already  required  in  big  trucks 
in  the  entire  European  Union,  and  many  other  countries  in  Asia, 
and  South  Africa.  They’ve  noted  substantial  reduction  of  accidents 
as a result—in the European Union—of the device’s presence. Safe-
ty  advocates  have  been  advocating  their  mandatory  use  in  the 
United States since the 1980s. 

So, I’m perplexed as to why the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Ad-
ministration proposed in January to require recorders on as few as 
465  of  the  more  than  700,000  trucking  companies  in  this  country. 
It doesn’t make any sense. 

Under the proposal, only 1 and a half percent of the industry will 
even be inspected for compliance with truck safety laws each year. 
Now, I’m not sure that the industry themselves could have written 
a more favorable proposal if they choose not to be concerned about 
this.  We  need  electronic  on-board  recorders  in  every  truck  on  the 
road to ensure the safety of our truck drivers and the families who 
travel on the highways. 

So, I thank our witnesses for appearing today. Before we call on 
them,  I  want  to  recognize  my  colleague,  Ranking  Member  Smith, 

Senator Smith, your comments, please? 

STATEMENT OF HON. GORDON H. SMITH, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM OREGON 

Senator  SMITH.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  appreciate  your 
scheduling  this  important  and  timely  hearing.  Thank  all  the  wit-
nesses for being here. I particularly want to welcome Administrator 
John Hill, who, I understand, recently was in Oregon, where he ad-
dressed  the  Oregon  Truckers  Association.  And  I  hear  you  earned 
rave reviews. 

So,  we’re  fortunate  to  have  an  impressive  group  of  experts  with 
us  to  discuss  an  issue  that’s  been  debated  for  several  decades  and 
is now the subject of pending rulemaking. 

So, I look forward to the hearing. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you  very  much.  We’re  pleased  to 

have you join us for this hearing. 

And  I  would  now  call  on  Mr.  Hill.  We  welcome  you  here.  You 
bring  a  lot  of  experience  and  knowledge.  We’re  pleased  to  have 
your testimony. And if you would be—start with us. We’ll give you 
5 minutes. If you don’t break down at 5, we’ll give you some coast-
ing  time,  maybe  another  minute,  but  we  ask  you  to  summarize, 
please. 

Thank you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN H. HILL, ADMINISTRATOR, 
FEDERAL MOTOR CARRIER SAFETY ADMINISTRATION, 

U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Mr. HILL. Mr. Chairman, I’ll try to be right on time. 
Chairman  Lautenberg  and  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  mem-
bers  of  the  Committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  discuss  the 
Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration’s  proposed  rule-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

3 

making  concerning  electronic  on-board  recorders  and  our  efforts  to 
reduce the number of fatigue-related crashes. 

I  am  pleased  to  describe  FMCSA’s  proposal  to  require  carriers 
with  severe  patterns  of  hours-of-service  violations  to  use  EOBRs 
and to promote the voluntary use of EOBRs throughout the indus-
try.  We  are  currently  analyzing  all  the  comments  received  on  the 
proposal,  and  we  will  also  incorporate  the  comments  from  this 
hearing  into  the  public  docket,  basing  future  decisions  on  a  com-
plete analysis of all submitted information. 

Since  2000,  FMCSA  has  been  exploring  the  EOBR  issue,  includ-
ing  whether  these  devices  should  be  mandatory,  and  analyzing 
proper design, use, cost, and benefits. 

In May 2000, FMCSA proposed requiring the use of on-board re-
corders  for  long-haul  and  regional  carriers  based  on  data  indi-
cating,  one,  the  higher  percentage  of  crashes  involving  these  car-
riers;  and,  two,  noncompliance  with  the  hours-of-service  regula-
tions, particularly by some segments of the long-haul industry. 

The proposal was part of the Agency’s comprehensive rulemaking 
on hours-of-service. After reviewing nearly 50,000 comments to the 
rulemaking docket, and the data concerning the potential costs and 
benefits  of  requiring  the  use  of  on-board  recorders,  the  Agency  de-
cided  to  focus,  at  that  time,  on  completing  the  first  major  revision 
to the hours-of-service rules in over 50 years. 

In  September  2004  FMCSA  published  an  advance  notice  of  pro-
posed rulemaking, requesting public comment on the issue of tech-
nological specifications for EOBRs and whether their use should be 
required  for  the  entire  motor  carrier  industry,  certain  segments  of 
the industry, or whether they should remain voluntary. 

During  2005,  we  completed  a  literature  and  technology  review 
and  study  focusing  on  a  range  of  data  collection  and  information 
management topics. 

In  January  2007,  FMCSA  proposed  a  rule  intended  to  increase 
the use of electronic on-board recorders within the industry and to 
improve  hours-of-service  compliance.  The  proposal  contains  three 
components:  one,  a  new  performance-based  standard  for  EOBR 
technology;  two,  the  use  of  EOBRs  to  enforce  and  monitor  regu-
latory  noncompliance;  and  three,  incentives  to  promote  EOBR  use. 
We  believe  these  three  components  strike  a  balance  promoting 
highway safety while objectively evaluating the cost and benefits of 
the  rulemakings.  In  addition  to  requesting  comments  through  the 
Federal  Register  notice,  the  agency  held  three  public  listening  ses-
sions in Washington, D.C.; Phoenix, Arizona; and Chicago, Illinois. 
In  our  enforcement  activities,  FMCSA  targets  unsafe  companies. 
Based  on  our  safety  research,  motor  carriers  whose  drivers  rou-
tinely  exceed  hours-of-service  limits  have  an  increased  probability 
of  involvement  in  fatigue-related  crashes.  The  carriers  that  would 
be  required,  under  the  proposed  rule  to  use  EOBRs  have  crash 
rates that are 87 percent higher than the overall industry average. 
Therefore,  we  propose  a  risk-based  approach  to  target  these  car-
riers. 

EOBR  technology  is  available  and  an  important  tool  to  ensure 
improved  unsafe  driving  behavior.  Drivers  must  follow  the  hours- 
of-service  rules  to  protect  them  and  those  with  whom  they  share 
the road. FMCSA’s Large Truck Crash Causation Study shows that 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

4 

approximately  13  percent  of  the  large  truck  crashes  involved  some 
form of fatigue on the part of the commercial vehicle driver. EOBRs 
will help to encourage compliance of drivers violating hours-of-serv-
ice regulations and reduce the likelihood of fatigue-related crashes. 
My  experience  in  traffic  safety  has  taught  me  that  meaningful 
traffic  enforcement  programs  must  contain  strong  and  valuable 
laws  and  rules,  public  support  for  the  law  to  encourage  voluntary 
compliance, an effective enforcement regime that imposes sanctions 
for noncompliance, and, finally, there must be meaningful adjudica-
tion processes. 

The  2007  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  for  electronic  on-board 
recorders  will  provide  a  basis  for  meaningful  enforcement  of  those 
who  flaunt  the  safety  of  our  highways.  We  intend  to  build  on  that 
NPRM as we review the comments, the docket, and will take them 
into consideration in determining the most appropriate action. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  today,  and 

I’ll be looking forward to your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Hill follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. JOHN H. HILL, ADMINISTRATOR, FEDERAL MOTOR 

CARRIER SAFETY ADMINISTRATION, U.S. DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Introduction 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of  the  Sub-
committee,  thank  you  for  inviting  me  today  to  discuss  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier 
Safety  Administration’s  (FMCSA’s)  proposed  rulemaking  concerning  Electronic  On- 
Board  Recorders  (EOBRs)  and  our  efforts  to  reduce  the  number  of  fatigue-related 
crashes involving commercial motor vehicle (CMV) drivers. I am pleased to describe 
to  you  what  FMCSA  has  proposed  to  improve  the  safety  performance  of  motor  car-
riers  with  severe  patterns  of  hours-of-service  (HOS)  violations,  and  to  promote  the 
voluntary use of EOBRs in the motor carrier industry. However, as FMCSA is now 
analyzing  all  the  comments  received  on  the  proposal,  we  have  not  made  any  deci-
sions  about  the  next  step  in  the  rulemaking.  Any  future  decisions  concerning  the 
rulemaking  will  be  based  on  our  analysis  of  the  comments  and  data  submitted  to 
the docket. 

These  days,  the  transportation  community  must  confront  many  important  issues. 
Even as priorities change and transportation needs evolve, safety on our roads must 
remain  paramount  to  all  other  priorities.  Perhaps  the  most  important  influence  on 
improving  future  road  safety  rests  with  technology.  By  strategically  integrating 
smart  technologies  like  EOBRs,  we  will  improve  safety  in  the  motor  carrier  indus-
try. 

For  many  years,  the  transportation  community  has  focused  on  fighting  driver  fa-
tigue  as  a  way  to  make  our  roads  safer.  Earlier  this  year,  we  took  another  step  to-
ward  reducing  the  number  of  these  crashes  by  proposing  the  mandatory  use  of 
EOBRs  by  carriers  with  the  worst  levels  of  compliance  with  the  HOS  rules.  This 
action  will  force  these  carriers  to  provide  their  drivers  with  adequate  opportunities 
to obtain the proper amount of rest before getting behind the wheel. 
Background 

Initially  prompted  by  a  desire  to  improve  efficiency,  the  motor  carrier  industry 
began  looking  to  automated  methods  for  recording  drivers’  duty  status  more  than 
20  years  ago.  In  the  late  1980s,  we  implemented  the  first  rule  allowing  the  use  of 
automatic  on-board  recording  devices  (AOBRDs).  Still  in  effect  today,  the  rule  pro-
vides straightforward performance requirements for these devices to ensure they are 
tamper-resistant  and  capture  enough  information  to  monitor  drivers’  time  behind 
the wheel. 

The  existing  design  standard  must  permit  duty  status  to  be  updated  only  when 
the vehicle is at rest, unless the driver is registering the crossing of a state bound-
ary.  The  on-board  recorder  and  support  systems  must  be  tamper  resistant  ‘‘to  the 
maximum extent practicable.’’ The device must provide a visual or an audible warn-
ing  to  the  driver  if  it  ceases  to  function.  Any  sensor  failures  and  edited  data  must 
be  identified  in  the  Records  of  Duty  Status,  more  commonly  known  as  log  books, 
printed from the device. Finally, the on-board recorder must be maintained and re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

5 

calibrated  according  to  the  manufacturer’s  specifications,  drivers  must  be  ade-
quately  trained  in  the  proper  operation  of  the  device,  and  the  motor  carrier  must 
maintain a second (backup) copy of electronic HOS files in a separate location. 

At the time the current rule was issued, the technology to allow on-board record-
ers  to  transmit  data  wirelessly  between  the  CMV  and  the  motor  carrier’s  base  of 
operations  did  not  exist  on  a  widespread  commercial  basis.  Today’s  technologies 
allow  for  real-time  transmission  of  a  vehicle’s  location  and  other  operational  infor-
mation.  These  technologies  enable  a  motor  carrier  to  know  at  any  point  in  time 
where a vehicle is, whether it is on its assigned route, and when it reaches its des-
tination. These same technologies can also be used to record and transmit the driv-
er’s HOS information. FMCSA calls these current-generation recording devices elec-
tronic  on-board  recorders  or  EOBRs.  By  exploiting  the  power  of  these  technologies, 
a  motor  carrier  can  improve  not  only  its  scheduling  of  vehicles  and  drivers  but  its 
asset  management  and  customer  service.  These  developments  in  technology  and 
communications require that FMCSA revise the current, narrowly defined on-board 
recorder regulations. 
May 2000 Proposal to Require EOBRs 

Since  2000,  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  has  been  exploring 
the  EOBR  issue  further—including  whether  these  devices  should  be  mandatory— 
and  analyzing  proper  design,  use,  costs,  and  benefits.  In  May  2000,  FMCSA  pro-
posed  requiring  the  use  of  on-board  recorders  for  long-haul  and  regional  carriers 
based on data indicating: (1) a higher percentage of crashes involving these carriers; 
and  (2)  non-compliance  with  the  HOS  regulations,  particularly  by  some  segments 
of  the  long-haul  industry.  The  proposal  was  part  of  the  Agency’s  comprehensive 
rulemaking on HOS of CMV drivers. 

After  reviewing  the  public  comments  to  the  rulemaking  docket  and  considering 
data  concerning  the  potential  costs  and  benefits  of  the  proposal  to  mandate 
AOBRDs, the Agency decided that mandating the use of on-board recorders was not 
appropriate at that time. However, the Agency determined there was a need to fur-
ther  explore  the  potential  of  this  technology  for  helping  to  ensure  that  motor  car-
riers  and  drivers  comply  with  the  HOS  rule.  To  this  end,  the  Agency  conducted  re-
search on EOBRs and other technologies, and considered the feasibility of providing 
incentives  for  their  voluntary  use.  Key  research  factors  included:  (1)  the  ability  to 
identify  the  individual  driver;  (2)  tamper  resistance;  (3)  the  ability  to  produce 
records for audit; (4) the ability of roadside enforcement to quickly and easily access 
the HOS information; (5) the level of protection afforded other personal, operational, 
or  proprietary  information;  (6)  cost;  and  (7)  driver  acceptability.  The  research  in-
cluded  a  literature  and  technology  review  that  was  completed  in  March  2005,  and 
a  study  focusing  on  a  range  of  data  collection  and  information  management  topics, 
including location referencing methods, completed in August 2005. 
Initiation of New Rulemaking in 2004 

On  September  1,  2004,  FMCSA  published  an  Advance  Notice  of  Proposed  Rule-
making (ANPRM) requesting public comment on the issue of technical specifications 
for  EOBRs,  and  whether  the  use  of  such  devices  should  be  required  for  the  entire 
motor  carrier  industry,  certain  segments  of  the  industry,  or  whether  use  of  the  de-
vices  should  remain  voluntary.  During  2005,  we  analyzed  the  comments  to  the 
ANPRM  and  prepared  a  proposal  for  a  new  EOBR  rule  that  takes  those  comments 
into consideration. 
January 2007 Proposal 

In January 2007, FMCSA proposed a comprehensive rule intended to increase the 
use  of  EOBRs  within  the  motor  carrier  industry  and  to  improve  HOS  compliance. 
The  approach  contains  three  components:  (1)  a  new  performance-oriented  standard 
for EOBR technology; (2) the use of EOBRs to remediate regulatory noncompliance; 
and  (3)  incentives  to  promote  EOBR  use.  FMCSA  believes  this  approach  strikes  an 
appropriate  balance  between  promoting  highway  safety  and  Executive  Order  re-
quirements to evaluate the societal costs and benefits of all significant rulemakings. 
In addition to requesting comments through the Federal Register notice, the Agency 
held three listening sessions in Washington, D.C.; Phoenix, AZ; and Chicago, IL. 

FMCSA’s  NPRM  proposes  amending  the  safety  regulations  to  incorporate  new 
performance  standards  for  EOBRs  installed  in  CMVs  manufactured  on  or  after  2 
years  from  the  effective  date  of  a  final  rule.  EOBRs  meeting  FMCSA’s  current  re-
quirements and voluntarily installed in CMVs manufactured before the rule’s effec-
tive  date  may  continue  to  be  used  for  the  remainder  of  the  service  life  of  those 
CMVs. 

The  technical  standards  element  of  the  proposed  rule  would  help  motor  carriers 
and  safety  compliance  officials  by  providing  them  with  clearly  defined  information, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

6 

presented  and  stored  in  a  standardized  way.  These  standards  would  provide  a 
‘‘benchmark’’ for EOBR system developers to use in designing their systems and for 
motor  carriers  to  use  in  comparing  the  features  and  performance  of  different  sys-
tems. The standards would also enable motor carriers to select the devices that are 
most  appropriate  for  different  types  of  operations,  knowing  that  the  data  from  the 
different systems will be recorded, stored, and secured in consistent ways. This por-
tion  of  the  rule  would  require  EOBRs  to  record  basic  information  needed  to  track 
a driver’s HOS compliance, including: identity of the driver, duty status, date, time, 
and location of the commercial vehicle, and distance traveled. Additionally, it would 
add  a  new  requirement  to  use  Global  Positioning  System  technology  or  other  loca-
tion tracking systems to automatically identify the location of the vehicle, which fur-
ther reduces the likelihood of falsification of HOS information. 

Our  proposed  technical  specifications  would  improve  dramatically  the  ease  and 
convenience  of  using  these  devices  as  a  safety  tool.  First,  there  would  be  standard 
display of specific data fields. Regardless of location or which manufacturer’s device 
is being used, every read-out and display would be in a similar format. Additionally, 
the  technology  would  have  to  support  the  ability  to  transfer  the  data—either  by 
hard  wire  or  wireless  transmission.  Updating  the  technology  standards  will  allow 
us  to  make  the  best  use  of  modern  and  efficient  communications.  Uniformity  will 
help drivers and law enforcement know how to use these devices regardless of man-
ufacturer or model. 

The rule further proposes that motor carriers with a history of serious noncompli-
ance  with  the  HOS  rules  would  be  subject  to  mandatory  installation  of  EOBRs 
meeting  the  new  performance  standards.  If  FMCSA  determined,  based  on  HOS 
records  reviewed  during  each  of  two  compliance  reviews  (CRs)  conducted  within  a 
2-year period, that a motor carrier had a 10 percent or greater violation rate (‘‘pat-
tern  violation’’)  for  certain  HOS  regulations,  FMCSA  would  issue  the  carrier  an 
EOBR  remedial  directive.  The  motor  carrier  would  be  required  to  install  EOBRs  in 
all  of  its  CMVs  regardless  of  their  date  of  manufacture  unless  the  carrier  had 
equipped  its  vehicles  already  with  AOBRDs  meeting  the  Agency’s  current  require-
ments and could demonstrate to FMCSA that its drivers understand how to use the 
devices. 

Finally,  FMCSA  would  encourage  industry-wide  use  of  EOBRs  by  providing  the 
following  incentives  for  motor  carriers  that  voluntarily  use  EOBRs  in  their  CMVs: 
(1)  revising  its  compliance  review  procedures  to  permit  examination  of  a  random 
sample  of  drivers’  records  of  duty  status;  and  (2)  providing  relief  from  HOS  sup-
porting documents requirements, provided certain conditions were satisfied. 
Rationale for Limiting the Mandate 

In  all  our  enforcement  activities,  FMCSA  focuses  on  those  companies  that  are 
most likely to be a safety hazard on the road. Based on its safety research, FMCSA 
believes  that  motor  carriers  whose  drivers  routinely  exceed  HOS  limits  have  an  in-
creased  probability  of  involvement  in  fatigue-related  crashes  and  therefore  present 
a  disproportionately  high  risk  to  highway  safety.  Based  on  the  Agency’s  analysis  of 
its  Motor  Carrier  Management  Information  System  data  from  CRs  conducted  on 
motor carriers operating in interstate commerce, carriers to which a remedial direc-
tive  would  apply  under  this  proposal  have  crash  rates  that  are  87  percent  higher 
than  the  overall  industry  average.  Currently,  carriers  with  high  crash  rates  and 
high driver HOS violation rates top our priority list for CRs and are targeted at the 
roadside for increased inspections. 

Under  this  proposed  rule,  only  those  truck  companies  with  a  history  of  serious 
HOS violations would be required to install EOBRs in all of their commercial vehi-
cles. Within the first 2 years of the rule’s enforcement, we estimate that 930 carriers 
with 17,500 drivers would fall under this requirement. 

FMCSA  recognizes  the  views  of  many  in  the  highway  safety  community  and  the 
general  public  about  mandating  EOBRs.  However,  there  are  several  million  CMVs 
on America’s roads today. Our estimated costs for mandating EOBRS on every vehi-
cle in the fleet greatly exceeded the estimated benefits at the time we published the 
April 2003 Final Rule on drivers’ HOS. Therefore, we focused on finding other ways 
to  get  more  of  these  units  on  CMVs  without  creating  an  unreasonable  burden  with 
a  government  mandate.  Consequently,  we  proposed  a  risk-based  approach  to  target 
this  technology  where  it  is  likely  to  have  the  most  benefits  for  the  driving  public. 
Driver Behavior 

While  EOBR  technology  is  at  our  disposal,  we  must  always  remember  that  it  is 
just  another  tool  to  ensure  safe  driver  behavior.  Drivers  must  also  follow  the  HOS 
rules  that  protect  them  and  protect  those  with  whom  they  share  the  road.  In  2003 
and  again  in  2005,  FMCSA  revised  its  HOS  regulations  to  require  motor  carriers 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

7 

of  property  to  provide  drivers  with  better  opportunities  to  obtain  sleep  and  thereby 
reduce  the  incidence  of  crashes  attributed  in  whole  or  in  part  to  drivers  operating 
CMVs  while  drowsy,  tired,  or  fatigued.  These  rulemakings  were  necessary  because 
FMCSA  estimated  that  a  portion  of  truck  drivers  involved  in  large  truck  crashes 
each  year  is  fatigued.  Specifically,  the  results  from  our  March  2006  Report  to  Con-
gress  on  the  Large  Truck  Crash  Causation  Study  indicate  that  13  percent  of  the 
large  truck  drivers  involved  in  study  crashes  were  believed  to  be  fatigued.  FMCSA 
estimates that, when adhered to fully, the changes to the HOS rules will save lives 
each  year  as  a  result  of  giving  drivers  an  increased  incremental  amount  of  time  to 
obtain rest and sleep. EOBRs will monitor non-complying motor carriers for compli-
ance with these important rules. 
Conclusion 

Motor  carriers  have  been  allowed  to  use  on-board  recorders  to  document  drivers’ 
HOS  for  approximately  20  years.  While  the  current  level  of  on-board  recorder  use 
is limited and many believe that nothing short of an industry-wide mandate will im-
prove safety, the information we had available at the time we published our NPRM 
did not support an industry-wide mandate. We have received strong feedback to our 
NPRM and have begun the process of reviewing each of the comments to the docket 
to determine the most appropriate steps to take in following up on the January 2007 
proposal. 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear before you today. I look forward to work-
ing  with  this  Committee  and  the  transportation  community  to  ensure  a  safe  trans-
portation  system  for  the  citizens  of  the  United  States.  I  would  be  happy  to  answer 
any questions you may have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Mr. Hill. 
The  witnesses  range  from  the  Administration  to  trucking  indus-
try officials to the manufacturers of the on-board recorders, and we, 
obviously, welcome all of you to the witness table. 

Mr.  Rosenker,  Mark  Rosenker,  Chairman  of  the  National  Trans-
portation  Safety  Board,  welcome,  and  please  give  your  testimony. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK V. ROSENKER, CHAIRMAN, 

NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  Thank  you,  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking 
Member  Smith  for  allowing  me  to  present  testimony  on  behalf  of 
the National Transportation Safety Board. It is my privilege to rep-
resent  an  agency  that  is  dedicated  to  the  safety  of  the  traveling 
public. 

Today, I’d like to talk about how technology can help prevent fa-
tigue-related  accidents  by  improving  commercial  driver  compliance 
with the hours-of-service regulations. 

First,  I’d  like  to  compliment  the  administrator  and  his  organiza-
tion,  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration,  on  begin-
ning this process and framing the public debate by issuing a notice 
of  proposed  rulemaking  on  electronic  data  recorders  for  hours-of- 
service. 

As  you  know,  paper  logbooks  offer  many  opportunities  to  play 
fast  and  loose  with  the  hours-of-service  rules.  Some  unscrupulous 
drivers  falsify  their  books,  or  keep  two  sets  of  books.  Some  motor 
carriers  do  not  closely  monitor  their  driver’s  compliance  with  the 
rules  and  some  may  actually  coach  their  drivers  on  how  to  fudge 
their logbooks. 

Recognizing  this  lack  of  accountability  with  paper  logbooks,  the 
Safety  Board  has  advocated  the  use  of  on-board  data  recorders  for 
the  past  three  decades.  In  1977,  the  Safety  Board  issued  its  first 
recommendation on the use of on-board recording devices for hours- 
of-service  compliance  by  asking  the  Federal  Highway  Administra-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

8 

tion  to  explore  the  merits  of  tachographs  on  reducing  commercial 
vehicle  accidents.  Although  the  Highway  Administration  studied 
the issue, they did not make any changes. 

During  the  1980s,  the  technology  for  on-board  recorders  for 
hours-of-service improved dramatically. In 1990, as part of a study 
on  heavy-truck  crashes,  the  Safety  Board  recommended  that  the 
Highway  Administration  and  the  states  require  the  use  of  auto-
mated,  tamperproof  on-board  recording  devices.  This  recommenda-
tion was rejected by the Highway Administration. 

In  1995,  the  Board  reiterated  this  same  recommendation  to  the 
Federal Highway Administration and the states. Both failed to act. 
In  1998,  the  Safety  Board  tried  a  different  approach  and  made 
recommendations  directly  to  the  industry,  asking  them  to  equip 
their  commercial  vehicle  fleets  with  automated  and  tamperproof 
on-board  recording  devices.  This  recommendation  was  opposed  by 
the industry. 

In  2001,  when  the  new  FMCSA  issued  an  NPRM  for  hours-of- 
service  of  drivers,  the  Board  reiterated  its  position  that  FMCSA 
strongly consider mandatory use of electronic on-board recorders by 
all motor carriers. FMCSA did not incorporate this suggestion into 
the NPRM. 

Finally,  2  weeks  ago,  the  Board  sent  a  letter  to  the  FMCSA  ex-
pressing  our  disappointment  with  the  NPRM  on-board  recorder 
issue. There are three primary reasons why the Board felt that the 
NPRM fell short of its intended target: 

First,  the  Board  would  like  to  see  damage-resistance  and  data- 

survivability included in the standards for recorder hardware. 

Second,  the  Safety  Board  believes  on-board  recorder  technology 
should be applied to all carriers, rather than only to carriers found 
to  be  pattern  violators.  It  will  be  extremely  difficult  for  FMCSA  to 
identify  and  administer  the  program  on  an  exception  basis,  given 
that  they  can  only  audit  annually  about  1  percent  of  the  carriers 
and  that  the  Board  has  found  significant  problems  with  their  cur-
rent  compliance  review  program.  Therefore,  the  Safety  Board  is 
convinced  that  the  only  effective  way  in  which  on-board  recorders 
can  help  stem  hours-of-service  violations,  which  the  Board  has 
linked  to  numerous  fatigue-related  accidents,  is  to  mandate  their 
use by all operators. 

Third,  the  proposed  rulemaking  attempts  to  promote  the  vol-
untary  installation  and  use  of  on-board  recorders.  It  seems  ex-
tremely  unlikely  that  the  unscrupulous  motor  carrier,  who  already 
plays  fast  and  loose  with  the  logbooks,  would  be  willing  to  comply 
with a voluntary program. 

In summary, fatigue-related accidents continue to plague our Na-
tion’s  highways,  because,  unlike  alcohol,  fatigue  is  extremely  dif-
ficult to detect. In fact, fatigue is probably the most under-reported 
causal  factor  in  highway  accidents.  Electronic  on-board  recorders 
hold the potential to efficiently and accurately collect and verify the 
hours-of-service  for  all  drivers.  They  will  also  establish  the  proper 
incentives  and  a  level  playing  field  for  compliance  with  hours-of- 
service  rules  and  will  ultimately  make  our  highways  safer  for  all 
drivers. 

Accordingly, Safety Board urges Congress to support the require-

ment for on-board recorders for all motor carriers. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

9 

I would be delighted to answer any questions. 
[The prepared statement of Mr. Rosenker follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. MARK V. ROSENKER, CHAIRMAN, 

NATIONAL TRANSPORTATION SAFETY BOARD 

Good  morning  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member  Smith,  and  Members  of 
the Subcommittee. Thank you for allowing me this opportunity to present testimony 
on  behalf  of  the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  regarding  Electronic  On- 
Board Recorders for Hours-of-Service Compliance. 

As  you  know,  the  NTSB  is  an  independent  Federal  agency  charged  by  Congress 
with investigating every civil aviation accident in the United States and significant 
accidents in other modes of transportation—railroad, highway, marine, and pipeline, 
and  issuing  safety  recommendations  to  prevent  future  accidents.  The  Safety  Board 
also oversees the assistance to victims and their families following commercial avia-
tion  accidents  and  also  acts  as  the  Court  of  Appeals  for  airmen,  mechanics  and 
mariners whenever certificate action is taken by the Federal Aviation Administrator 
or  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  Commandant  or  when  civil  penalties  are  assessed  by  the 
FAA. 

Since its inception in 1967, the Safety Board has investigated about 138,000 avia-
tion  accidents  and  thousands  of  surface  transportation  accidents.  In  addition,  the 
Safety  Board  has  issued  more  than  12,600  safety  recommendations  in  all  modes  of 
transportation. Although we do not have authority to regulate safety, our reputation 
and our perseverance in following up on safety recommendations has resulted in an 
82 percent acceptance rate for our recommendations. 

Today, I would like to talk about how technology can help prevent fatigue-related 
accidents by improving commercial driver compliance with the hours-of-service regu-
lations. 

As  you  know,  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  (FMCSA)  pub-
lished a notice of proposed rulemaking (NPRM) regarding ‘‘Electronic On-Board Re-
corders  for  Hours-of-Service  Compliance,’’  on  January  18,  2007  and  asked  for  com-
ments by April 18, 2007. Although this very important rulemaking has the potential 
to greatly improve the compliance with hours-of-service rules, and ultimately reduce 
fatigue-related accidents, it will not accomplish this in its present form. 

First  I  would  like  to  give  you  some  background  and  long  history  on  the  Board’s 

position on this issue. 

For  the  past  30  years,  the  Safety  Board  has  advocated  the  use  of  on-board  data 
recorders  to  increase  hours-of-service  compliance  of  commercial  drivers.  As  you 
know, commercial drivers are currently required to keep logbooks on the hours they 
drive. However, for many reasons these log books often do not reflect the true hours 
of operation. Because drivers for the most part are paid by the mile and motor car-
riers  make  more  money  the  more  miles  that  are  driven  by  their  drivers,  neither 
party  has  adequate  incentives  for  compliance  with  the  hours-of-service  rules.  The 
current  system  of  paper  logbooks  offers  many  opportunities  to  play  fast  and  loose 
with these rules. Some unscrupulous drivers write down hours different from those 
that they actually drive, some maintain multiple logbooks, and some outright falsify 
the  information.  In  addition,  some  motor  carriers  do  not  closely  monitor  their  driv-
ers’  compliance  with  the  rules  and  some  actually  may  coach  their  drivers  on  how 
to  fudge  their  logbook.  It  is  not  comical,  but  many  in  the  truck  and  bus  industry 
affectionately call the logbooks ‘‘comic books’’. 

Let  me  summarize  some  of  the  key  events  that  have  led  to  the  Board’s  position 

on hours-of-service compliance. 

In 1977, the Safety Board issued its first recommendation on the use of on-board 
recording  devices  for  commercial  vehicle  hours-of-service  compliance.  It  was  in  re-
sponse  to  the  Federal  Highway  Administration’s  (FHWA’s)  withdrawal  of  an  Ad-
vance  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  concerning  the  installation  of  tachographs  in 
interstate buses. That recommendation proposed that the FHWA: 

Conduct scientifically controlled studies to determine the effects and merits of the 
use of tachographs on commercial vehicles in reducing accidents. (H–77–32) 

In  April  1977,  FHWA  rejected  the  Board’s  recommendation  due  to  ‘‘insufficient 
credible  evidence  of  the  effectiveness  of  recording  speedometers  as  an  accident  pre-
vention device’’ and due to ‘‘evidence that present day technology of recording speed-
ometers severely limits their use to certain purposes and specific conditions.’’ 

In  the  1980s,  the  technology  for  on-board  recorders  for  hours-of-service  improved 
dramatically, such that in 1990, the Safety Board first urged the FHWA to mandate 
the use of on-board recorders. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

10 

The  Board  made  this  recommendation  in  its  1990  safety  study  on  Fatigue,  Alco-
hol,  Drugs,  and  Medical  Factors  in  Fatal-to-the-Driver  Heavy  Truck  Crashes.  This 
study concluded that on-board recording devices could provide a tamper-proof mech-
anism  to  enforce  the  hours-of-service  regulations.  The  study  also  found  that,  of  the 
182  cases  studied,  the  most  frequently  cited  factor  or  probable  cause  in  these  acci-
dents  was  fatigue,  cited  in  31  percent  the  cases.  Alcohol  was  second  at  29  percent. 
Therefore, the Safety Board recommended that the FHWA: 

Require  automated/tamper-proof 
such  as 
tachographs  or  computerized  logs  to  identify  commercial  truck  drivers  who  ex-
ceed hours-of-service regulations. (H–90–28) 

recording  devices 

on-board 

An  identically  worded  companion  recommendation  was  made  to  the  states,  the 
Commonwealth  of  Puerto  Rico,  the  Virgin  Islands,  and  the  Territories  (H–90–48). 
In 1995, the Board reiterated this Safety Recommendation (H–90–28) in its safety 
study  on  ‘‘Factors  That  Affect  Fatigue  in  Heavy  Truck  Accidents’’  in  which  107 
heavy truck accidents were studied. The study also noted that the incidence of driv-
er  fatigue  is  under-represented  in  the  Fatality  Analysis  Reporting  System  (FARS) 
database. Both the FHWA and the states failed to act on this recommendation. 

In  1998,  the  Safety  Board  again  advocated  industry-wide  use  of  on-board  record-
ing  devices  after  investigating  a  multiple-vehicle  accident  that  occurred  in  Slinger, 
Wisconsin,  on  February  12,  1997  in  which  8  persons  died.  This  time,  rather  that 
focusing  on  regulations  we  tried  a  different  route  and  made  the  recommendations 
to the American Trucking Associations, the International Brotherhood of Teamsters, 
and  the  Motor  Freight  Carriers  Association,  the  Independent  Truckers  and  Drivers 
Association,  the  National  Private  Truck  Council,  and  the  Owner-Operator  Inde-
pendent Drivers Association, Inc. The recommendation was: 

Advise  your  members  to  equip  their  commercial  vehicle  fleets  with  automated 
and  tamper-proof  on-board  recording  devices,  such  as  tachographs  or  computer-
ized  recorders,  to  identify  information  concerning  both  driver  and  vehicle  oper-
ating characteristics. (H–98–26) (H–98–23) 

At  that  time  the  American  Trucking  Associations  responded  that  it  opposed  the 
mandatory installation of such devices. The International Brotherhood of Teamsters 
and the Motor Freight Carriers Association did not respond. 

In  August  12,  2001,  the  Safety  Board  reiterated  its  position  regarding  the  use  of 
on-board  recorders  for  hours-of-service  compliance  in  its  response  to  the  FMCSA’s 
NPRM  on  Hours-of-Service  of  Drivers.  In  our  response,  the  Safety  Board  again  re-
quested  that  the  FMCSA  strongly  consider  mandatory  use  of  EOBRs  by  all  motor 
carriers to help improve hours-of-service compliance. 

Finally, 2 weeks ago on April 18, 2007 the Board sent a letter to FMCSA express-
ing  its  disappointment  with  the  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  entitled  ‘‘Electronic 
On-Board Recorders for Hours-of-Service Compliance’’. Let me highlight some of the 
reasons why the Board felt the NPRM fell short of its intended target. 

As you know, the NPRM focuses on three elements: 

1. Performance-oriented standards for EOBR technology; 
2.  Mandatory  use  of  EOBRs  by  motor  carriers  who  are  found  to  exhibit  a  pat-
tern of violations of HOS regulations; and 
3.  Development  of  incentives  anticipated  to  encourage  voluntary  industry-wide 
use of EOBRs. 

With respect to the first element, the Safety Board is generally satisfied with the 
direction  proposed  by  the  FMCSA  except  in  the  area  of  crash  protection.  Perform-
ance  standards  offer  flexibility  in  the  face  of  rapid  technological  advances;  thereby 
requiring minimal-to-no changes to pertinent regulations. The NPRM makes several 
proposals  designed  to  ensure  the  security  and  validity  of  EOBR  data,  but  it  fails 
to address EOBR damage resistance and data survivability. Naturally, the survival 
of  the  data  is  important,  not  only  for  regulatory  compliance,  but  also  to  assist  acci-
dent investigators to determine the influence of fatigue on the driver and the cause 
of  the  accident.  Therefore,  in  its  comments  on  FMCSA’s  NPRM,  the  Safety  Board 
asked FMCSA to add performance standard factors that consider these issues. 

Concerning the second element, the Safety Board is disappointed that the NPRM 
did not propose to mandate the use of EOBRs by all operators subject to the hours- 
of-service  regulations.  The  proposed  rules  only  require  EOBRs  for  carriers  who  are 
identified  through  the  compliance  review  process  as  pattern  violators  of  the  hours- 
of-service regulations. Identifying such carriers seems problematic. 

For a carrier to be identified as such, the FMCSA must perform at least two com-
pliance reviews on that carrier within a 2-year span. In 2005, the FMCSA was only 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

11 

able to perform a total of 8,097 compliance reviews on a population of approximately 
911,000  active  and  registered  carriers,  meaning  that  less  than  1  percent  of  all  car-
riers  were  assessed  for  safety  and  fitness.  Although  the  FMCSA  uses  a  computer-
ized  rating  methodology  (SafeStat)  to  target  potentially  unsafe  carriers  for  compli-
ance  reviews,  flaws  in  the  compliance  review  system  guarantee  that  many  unsafe 
carriers  continue  to  evade  even  initial  identification  as  an  hours-of-service  violator. 
The Safety Board has documented several instances in which carriers have received 
favorable  compliance  review  ratings  despite  long  and  consistent  histories  of  driver- 
and  vehicle-related  violations.  For  example,  this  was  the  case  for  the  operator  and 
vehicle  involved  in  the  recent  investigation  of  the  motorcoach  fire  that  fatally  in-
jured 23 people near Dallas, Texas. 

In  light  of  the  proven  deficiencies  in  the  FMCSA  motor  carrier  compliance  pro-
gram,  this  program  should  not  be  the  triggering  mechanism  to  initiate  a  require-
ment  for  EOBRs.  The  Safety  Board  does  not  believe  that  the  FMCSA  has  the  re-
sources or processes necessary to identify and discipline all carriers and drivers who 
are pattern violators of the hours-of-service regulations. 

Consequently, a program to impose EOBRs on pattern violators that relies on the 
compliance program to identify such carriers seems unlikely to succeed. In addition, 
pattern  violators  of  hours-of-service  regulations  are  the  carriers  least  likely  to 
choose  to  install  and  use  EOBRs  voluntarily.  The  Safety  Board  is  therefore  con-
vinced  that  the  only  effective  way  in  which  EOBRs  can  help  stem  hours-of-service 
violations,  which  the  Board  has  linked  to  numerous  fatigue-related  accidents,  is  to 
mandate EOBR installation and use by all operators subject to hours-of-service reg-
ulations. 

Additionally,  the  Safety  Board  is  concerned  that  the  NPRM  proposes  using 
EOBRs  as  a  form  of  remediation  or  punishment,  when  the  technology  has  signifi-
cant  potential  for  increasing  the  safety  of  all  motorists.  According  to  the  NPRM, 
‘‘. . . motor carriers that have demonstrated a history of serious noncompliance with 
the  hours-of-service  (HOS)  rules  would  be  subject  to  mandatory  installation  of 
EOBRs  meeting  the  new  performance  standards.’’  The  Safety  Board  believes  that 
encouraging motor carriers to perceive EOBRs primarily as a means of punishment 
would  undermine  the  goal  of  achieving  voluntary  industry-wide  acceptance.  In  fact, 
progressive  motor  carriers  are  using  EOBRs  as  an  effective  tool  in  shipment  track-
ing,  equipment  maintenance,  and  operator  scheduling.  In  addition,  EOBRs  provide 
a more efficient and reliable way for enforcement agencies to monitor hours-of-serv-
ice compliance. Finally, the Europeans have required the use of digital tachographs 
for some time. 

With respect to the NPRM’s third element, the proposed rulemaking outlines sev-
eral  incentives  that  the  FMCSA  hopes  will  promote  the  voluntary  installation  and 
use  of  EOBRs.  Among  these  incentives  are  new  compliance  review  procedures  and 
exemptions for certain supporting documentation requirements. The Safety Board is 
in  favor  of  any  incentive  that  fosters  use  of  EOBRs  without  undermining  safety; 
however, the Board is skeptical whether the incentives currently proposed would be 
strong  enough  to  override  the  financial  motivation  some  carriers  and  drivers  have 
for  continuing  to  circumvent  the  HOS  regulations  and  not  use  EOBRs.  Moreover, 
for  those  motor  carriers  considering  the  installation  of  EOBRs,  the  burden  of  being 
subject  to  additional  regulatory  requirements  might  cause  them  to  choose  not  to 
equip their vehicles with the technology voluntarily. 

In  summary,  the  Safety  Board  is  convinced  that  the  regulations  proposed  in  the 

NPRM: 

motor carriers, 

• will  not  result  in  the  timely  and  effective  adoption  of  EOBR  technology  by  all 
• may  serve  to  depict  EOBRs  as  a  punitive  device  rather  than  as  one  that  pro-
• will  ultimately  fail  to  reduce  the  number  of  carriers  and  drivers  who  exceed 

motes safety, and 

Federal hours-of-service limits. 

Accordingly,  the  Safety  Board  urges  the  FMCSA  to  revise  the  NPRM  to  require 
that  all  motor  carriers,  subject  to  the  HOS  regulations,  to  install  and  use  EOBRs. 
The  trucking  industry  in  the  United  States  has  already  installed  hundreds  of 
thousands  of  devices  capable  of  recording  hours-of-service  information.  We  believe 
it  is  past  time  to  act  and  that  the  use  of  EOBRs  should  be  mandatory  throughout 
the industry, as are similar devices required in most of Europe. 

Fatigue-related  accidents  continue  to  plague  our  nation’s  highways  and  because 
fatigue is difficult to quantify by investigating agencies, it is likely the most under-
reported  underlying  causal  factor  in  highway  accident  investigation.  Electronic  On- 
Board  Recorders  hold  the  potential  to  efficiently  provide  the  proper  incentives  for 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

12 

compliance  with  hours-of-service  rules  and  ultimately  make  our  highways  safer  for 
all drivers. 

I would be delighted to respond to any questions you may have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Now, Captain John Harrison, President of the Commercial Vehi-

cle Safety Alliance. 

Captain Harrison, welcome. 

STATEMENT OF CAPTAIN JOHN E. HARRISON, PRESIDENT, 

COMMERCIAL VEHICLE SAFETY ALLIANCE 

Mr.  HARRISON.  Good  afternoon,  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking 

Member and Senator Smith. 

I am John Harrison, President of the Commercial Vehicle Safety 
Alliance, and Captain with the Georgia Department of Public Safe-
ty. 

CVSA is an international not-for-profit organization comprised of 
local, state, provincial, territorial, and Federal motor carrier safety 
officials and industry representatives from the United States, Can-
ada, and Mexico. Our mission is to promote commercial motor vehi-
cle  safety  and  security  by  providing  leadership  in  enforcement,  in-
dustry, and policymakers. 

Our  goal  is  uniformity,  compatibility,  and  reciprocity  of  commer-
cial  vehicle  inspections  and  enforcement  activities  throughout 
North America. 

Chairman Lautenberg, thank you for calling this important hear-
ing  and  inviting  me  to  testify  on  issues  relating  to  electronic  on- 
board recorders and truck driver fatigue reduction. 

In my testimony today, I will discuss the existing problems relat-
ing to hours-of-service, how EOBR technology can help provide—or 
help solve these problems, and our recommendations and qualifica-
tions on implementing EOBRs. 

In  our  written  statement,  we  have  provided  more  detailed  com-
ments  and  recommendations  on  the  current  FMCA  rulemaking. 
Even  though  I  am  a  captain  and  have  a  number  of  employees 
under  my  command,  I  maintain  CVSA  certification  to  conduct 
North American standards inspections. 

Since  2000,  the  regulations  regarding  commercial  driver  hours- 
of-service  have  been  through  a  series  of  formal  actions  by  the 
FMCSA,  as  well  as  being  challenged  by  outside  groups  and  in  the 
D.C.  Circuit  Court  of  Appeals.  In  the  meantime,  compliance  with 
hours-of-service  continues  to  be  a  significant  problem  encountered 
by  law  enforcement,  both  at  roadside  and  in  the  motor  carrier’s 
place of business. 

In  2006,  hours-of-service  violations  were  represented  in  7  of  the 
top 20 driver violations discovered during roadside inspections rep-
resenting  34.2  percent  of  the  total.  Further,  of  the  top  20  driver 
out-of-service violations at roadside, 78.8 percent were for hours-of- 
service.  During  compliance  reviews,  5  of  the  top  12  critical  viola-
tions  cited  were  hours-of-service  related,  representing  34.6  percent 
of the total. 

The  results  from  the  2006  Large  Truck  Crash  Causation  Study 
indicated  that  fatigue  was  reported  as  an  associated  factor  in  13 
percent of all large truck crashes. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

13 

We  believe  EOBRs  hold  great  promise  for  helping  improve  com-
pliance  with  hours-of-service  regulations  and  providing  a  positive 
impact  on  safety  in  crashes  related  to  driver  fatigue.  We  also  be-
lieve  that  widescale—with  emphasis  on  ‘‘widescale’’—adoption  of 
EOBRs  will  help  curb  the  challenges  with  the  limited  resources 
available  at  State  and  Federal  levels  for  overseeing  the  motor  car-
rier  industry.  Unfortunately,  drivers  operating  in  excess  of  hours- 
of-service  limits  and  falsified  driver  logs  continue  to  represent  a 
significant  risk  to  safety.  However,  it  is  important  to  realize  that 
technology  has  limitations.  In  the  end,  driver  behavior  and  chang-
ing the safety culture are determining factors in enhancing compli-
ance and reducing crashes. 

EOBR  technology  is  proven.  More  than  50  countries  have  man-
dated electronic data recorders for driving and standby-time record-
ing and/or speed and distance recording. Our recommendations are 
as follows: 

FMCSA and the National Highway Traffic Safety Administration 
should  work  to  make  EOBR  standard  equipment  with  an  imple-
mentation time-frame on the order of 3 to 5 years. 

After  market  retrofit,  installations  should  only  be  permitted  if 

they meet OEM equipment standards. 

Existing  devices  should  be  grandfathered  into  this  new  require-

ment only if they’re able to meet the new OEM standards. 

Those drivers operating existing vehicles, those built prior to the 
new  OEM  requirement,  or  using  noncompliant  EOBRs,  would  be 
required  to  retrofit  their  vehicles  within  3  years  to  meet  the  OEM 
standard.  The  paper-based  logging  system  would  no  longer  be  per-
mitted. 

FMCSA  and  NHTSA  should  create  a  rigorous  certification  pro-
gram  for  EOBRs  administered  by  a  third  party,  similar  to  how 
speed-measuring  instruments  and  breath  alcohol  testing  devices 
are approved and certified. 

Until  such  time  the  OEM  standard  is  effected,  FMCSA  should 
conduct  several  field  operational  tests  of  different  EOBRs  and  in-
clude a wide range of carrier operational types. In our view, moving 
forward  with  EOBR  implementation  means  taking  the  following 
issues  into  consideration:  simple  and  standardized  display  of  the 
data  for  enforcement;  positive  driver  identification;  tamperproof; 
simple  identification  and  explanation  of  errors  malfunctions  and 
manual inputs; an audit trail at roadside; certification and calibra-
tion  standards;  seamless  secure  standards  based  on  EOBR  data— 
EOBR  data  transfer  for  analysis  by  roadside  enforcement  away 
from the truck; evidentiary needs need to be accommodated; redun-
dancy  in  the  event  the  system  malfunctions;  and  adequate  and 
comprehensive  training  for  enforcement;  rigorous  monitoring  and 
quality control. 

In  summary,  we  believe  that  in  order  to  enable  significant 
changes—significant  policy  changes  to  out-of-service  compliance, 
there  needs  to  be  a  universal  adoption  of  EOBR  technology.  How-
ever,  it  is  critically  important  that  the  performance  specifications 
for  these  devices  and  oversight  for  producing  and  using  them  is 
done  in  a  such  a  manner  that  enables  them  to  be  user-friendly  for 
law enforcement, and that there is credibility and confidence in the 
accuracy of the data. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

14 

Moving forward with a mandatory requirement will help provide 
certainty  and  competition  in  the  manufacturing  community,  and 
help keep costs down for the motor carrier. 

Thank  you  very  much  for  inviting  me  to  testify  here,  and  I’ll  be 

glad to take any questions that you might have. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Harrison follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CAPTAIN JOHN E. HARRISON, PRESIDENT, 

COMMERCIAL VEHICLE SAFETY ALLIANCE 

Introduction 

Good  afternoon  Chairman  Lautenberg,  Ranking  Member,  Senator  Smith,  and 
members  of  the  Subcommittee.  I  am  John  Harrison,  President  of  the  Commercial 
Vehicle Safety Alliance (CVSA) and Captain with the Georgia Department of Public 
Safety. 

CVSA is an international not-for-profit organization comprised of local, state, pro-
vincial, territorial and Federal motor carrier safety officials and industry represent-
atives from the United States, Canada, and Mexico. Our mission is to promote com-
mercial  motor  vehicle  safety  and  security  by  providing  leadership  to  enforcement, 
industry  and  policymakers.  Our  goal  is  uniformity,  compatibility  and  reciprocity  of 
commercial  vehicle  inspections  and  enforcement  activities  throughout  North  Amer-
ica. 

Chairman  Lautenberg,  thank  you  for  calling  this  important  hearing  and  inviting 
me to testify on issues relating to Electronic On-Board Recorders (EOBRs) and truck 
driver fatigue reduction. 

In  my  testimony  today  I  will  discuss  the  existing  problems  relating  to  hours-of- 
service  and  driver  log  violations,  how  EOBR  technology  can  help  solve  these  prob-
lems, and our recommendations and qualifications on implementing EOBRs. Finally, 
I  will  comment  on  the  current  FMCSA  EOBR  proposed  rulemaking  and  what  we 
view as its shortcomings in addressing hours-of-service compliance and enforcement 
and the related problem of driver fatigue. 

Even  though  I  am  a  Captain  and  have  a  number  of  employees  under  my  com-
mand,  I  maintain  my  CVSA  Certification  to  conduct  North  American  Standard 
Roadside Inspections. I work out in the field with the troops on a daily basis. From 
my  perspective,  if  I  am  to  be  effective  and  have  credibility  within  the  ranks,  this 
is something I need to do. 
Problem Statement 

Since  2000,  the  regulations  regarding  commercial  driver  hours-of-service  (HOS) 
have  been  through  a  series  of  formal  actions  by  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety 
Administration  (FMCSA),  as  well  as  being  challenged  on  the  outside  by  various 
groups  and  the  D.C.  United  States  Circuit  Court  of  Appeals.  Countless  hours  have 
been  devoted  to  this  subject,  both  internal  to  the  agency  and  by  the  public.  In  the 
meantime, compliance with the hours-of-service regulations continues to be a signifi-
cant  problem  encountered  by  law  enforcement,  both  at  roadside  and  in  the  motor 
carrier’s place of business. The problem is pervasive. 

In the 2006 calendar year, hours-of-service violations were represented in 7 of the 
‘‘Top 20’’ driver violations discovered during roadside inspections. These Top 20 driv-
er violations in the aggregate numbered 2,232,834—Hours-of-Service violations com-
prised  763,186  of  this  total,  or  34.2  percent.  Delving  further  into  the  Top  20,  Out 
of  Service  (OOS)  violations  related  to  Hours-of-Service  totaled  179,778  of  the 
228,211  total  driver  OOS  violations,  or  78.8  percent.  At  the  motor  carrier’s  place  of 
business during the conduct of Compliance Reviews, 5 of the ‘‘Top 12’’ Critical viola-
tions  cited  were  Hours-of-Service  related.  These  Top  12  violations  in  the  aggregate 
numbered  6,676—Hours-of-Service  violations  numbered  2,309  of  this  total,  or  34.6 
percent. 

There are numerous studies regarding commercial driver fatigue and each of them 
report different numbers related to driver fatigue and its contribution to large truck 
involved crashes. The results from the 2006 Large Truck Crash Causation Study in-
dicated  that  fatigue  was  reported  as  an  associated  factor  in  13  percent  of  all  large 
truck crashes. This is a significant number. 

It is clear we have a compliance and a safety problem. How can we fix it? 

Recommendation 

We  believe  the  implementation  of  Electronic  On-Board  Recorders  (EOBRs)  for 
compliance  with  HOS  regulations  holds  great  promise  for  helping  improve  compli-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

15 

ance with HOS regulations and ultimately providing a positive impact on safety and 
reducing  crashes  related  to  driver  fatigue  and  other  work-related  injuries.  We  also 
believe  that  the  wide-scale  adoption  of  EOBRs  will  also  help  to  curb  the  challenges 
that  currently  exist  with  the  limited  resources  available  at  the  state  and  Federal 
levels for overseeing the motor carrier industry. With nearly 50,000 new motor car-
riers  entering  the  business  each  year  in  the  United  States,  the  implementation  of 
proven safety technologies serves to assist the law enforcement community in focus-
ing its attention on high-risk drivers, vehicles and motor carriers. 

EOBR  technology  is  proven.  More  than  50  countries  have  mandated  Electronic 
Data  Recorders  for  driving  and  standby  time  recording  and/or  speed  and  distance 
recording. As an example, more than 5.5 Million Tachograph systems are being used 
in  commercial  vehicles  and  buses  to  improve  road  safety  in  the  whole  of  Western 
and Eastern Europe. In Germany, for example, since the mid-1970s when the Tach-
ograph was mandated until 2000, they experienced approximately a 167 percent im-
provement in the number of commercial vehicle miles traveled without personal in-
jury (see figure below). 

We  believe  that  in  order  to  meet  the  intent  of  the  3  objectives  FMCSA  laid  out 
in its recent Notice of Proposed Rulemaking (NPRM) for EOBRs, these devices must 
be made mandatory for all commercial vehicles. 

FMCSA  should  work  with  the  National  Highway  Traffic  Safety  Administration 
(NHTSA)  to  make  these  devices  standard  OEM  equipment.  Aftermarket/retrofit  in-
stallations should only be permitted if they meet the OEM equipment standards. In 
order to assist the manufacturing community and to help minimize the cost impacts 
to  the  industry,  we  would  suggest  that  the  requirement  would  be  put  in  place  at 
a  point  in  the  future,  somewhere  on  the  order  to  3–5  years  after  the  final  rule  is 
published.  We  believe  existing  devices  should  be  grandfathered  into  this  new  re-
quirement  only  if  they  are  able  to  meet  the  new  OEM  standard  specifications.  We 
also  believe  the  existing  Automatic  On-Board  Recording  Device  (AOBRD)  regula-
tions in 49 CFR § 395.15 should be sunsetted. Those drivers operating existing vehi-
cles  (those  built  prior  to  the  new  OEM  requirement)  or  using  EOBR  devices  not 
compliant with the new standard would be required to retrofit their vehicles within 
3  years  to  meet  the  OEM  equipment  standards.  The  paper-based  logging  system 
would no longer be permitted. 

In  the  interim,  we  would  suggest  that  FMCSA  conduct  several  field  operational 
tests of different device types (to include those not integrally synchronized with the 
vehicle)  to  understand  what  the  optimum  performance  requirements  should  be,  as 
well as to more fully evaluate their impact on safety. One option for this test could 
be  to  use  the  motor  carrier  population  the  Agency  has  suggested  in  its  NPRM  that 
would  be  subject  to  a  remedial  directive  and  be  required  to  have  the  EOBRs  in-
stalled—those  carriers  FMCSA  has  determined,  based  on  HOS  records  reviewed 
during  each  of  two  compliance  reviews  conducted  within  a  2-year  period,  that  the 
motor carrier has a 10 percent or greater violation rate (‘‘pattern violation’’) for any 
regulation  in  proposed  Appendix  C  to  Part  385.  Theoretically,  once  EOBRs  are  in-
stalled on the habitual offenders’ vehicles, they should realize a significant improve-
ment in safety, both in HOS compliance and in fatigue-related crashes. Another op-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e
.
r
r
a
h
1
0
5

16 

tion  to  consider  for  the  test  phase,  which  is  our  preferred  option,  is  to  tie  EOBR 
application  (for  the  test  phase)  to  SafeStat  and  ISS  scores.  This  approach  would 
broaden the pool of test candidates and will likely also serve as a more representa-
tive sampling of the industry. We believe that by taking into account both SafeStat 
and  ISS  scores,  carriers  with  demonstrated  performance  problems,  as  well  as  those 
with no history can be part of the pool to be evaluated. If the test is properly carried 
out  and  administered,  it  should  effectively  demonstrate  how  to  positively  impact 
HOS  compliance  for  carriers  on  both  ends  of  the  scale—those  who  are  uninformed 
about the hours-of-service regulations and those who are habitual violators. 

EOBRs must use standardized data formats and have a standardized interface for 
law enforcement so that training, compliance evaluation and monitoring is effective 
and simplified. 

We  also  recommend  that  FMCSA  (and  NHTSA)  create  a  more  rigorous  certifi-
cation  program  for  EOBRs  that  is  administered  by  a  3rd  party,  and  to  also  create 
an advisory board that would serve to create and maintain an approved EOBR list. 
This  advisory  group  could  operate  similarly  to  those  groups  who  are  involved  with 
speed measuring instruments and breath alcohol testing devices. Wherever possible, 
EOBR  design  and  performance  specifications  should  use  accepted  industry  stand-
ards that are verifiable and certifiable. 

It  is  our  belief  that  moving  forward  with  a  mandatory  requirement  will  help  on 
all fronts. It will provide some certainty and competition in the manufacturing com-
munity  and  likely  result  in  more  ‘‘hardened’’  and  user-friendly  systems,  help  keep 
costs down for the motor carrier industry through economies of scale, and will assist 
the enforcement community since there will be stringent and uniform standards. It 
also  will  provide  adequate  lead  time  for  both  industry  and  enforcement  to  ramp  up 
their  operations  and  provide  for  training,  as  well  as  budget  planning  for  the  pro-
curement of these devices and the development of back office systems to accept and 
manage the data output. 
The FMCSA Notice of Proposed Rulemaking 

In  its  recent  NPRM  regarding  Electronic  On-Board  Recording  devices  for  Hours- 

of-Service, FMCSA indicated the intent of the NPRM was to: 

1. Improve CMV safety; 
2. Increase use of EOBRs within the motor carrier industry; and 
3. Improve HOS compliance. 

They further indicated that their approach had three components: 

1. A new performance-oriented standard for EOBR technology; 
2. Use of EOBRs to remediate regulatory noncompliance; and 
3. Incentives to promote EOBR use. 

While  CVSA  certainly  supports  the  3  objectives  embodied  in  the  intent  of  the 
NPRM,  we  believe  the  approach  FMCSA  has  taken  will  not  measurably  impact  on 
them. The universe of motor carriers required to install EOBRs as a part of the pro-
posal  is  a  small  fraction  of  the  motor  carrier  population  as  a  whole.  Additionally, 
we  also  believe  that  their  voluntary  adoption,  even  with  the  incentives  offered  by 
FMCSA, will not occur in large numbers. 
Safety 

Given  the  fact  that  hours-of-service  (HOS)  compliance  continues  to  be  a  major 
problem area for many motor carriers, and large truck crashes related to fatigue are 
significant,  we  firmly  believe  that  in  order  to  have  a  substantial  impact  on  safety 
and  HOS  compliance  EOBRs  must  be  universally  used  in  the  motor  carrier  indus-
try.  We  believe  that  habitual  HOS  offenders  need  stronger  enforcement  in  addition 
to  requiring  the  installation  of  EOBRs.  HOS  non-compliance  is  indicative  of  a  sys-
temic  management  problem  within  the  motor  carrier’s  operation,  and  the  mere  in-
stallation  of  EOBRs  will  not  serve  to  correct  this  problem.  The  resources  expended 
by  government  to  monitor  the  motor  carriers  subject  to  mandatory  EOBR  use  will 
be substantial and in our view, the benefits will not outweigh the costs. 
Level Playing Field 

In  our  view  the  NPRM  will  do  little  to  help  deploy  EOBRs  in  large  quantities. 
Most  carriers  already  using  these  systems  are  doing  them  primarily  to  help  better 
manage  their  drivers  and  not  necessarily  for  HOS  compliance.  HOS  compliance  [to 
many of them] is a secondary benefit of these devices. We do not believe this think-
ing will change much with the implementation of the NPRM. Most carriers will view 
this  as  a  cost  item  (and  a  legal  liability)  that  will  put  them  at  a  competitive  dis-
advantage  with  their  peers,  therefore  making  them  reluctant  to  voluntarily  invest 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

17 

in these devices. The EOBR vendors will not put much capital outlay into the devel-
opment and deployment of these systems since there is not a clear market for them. 
Additionally,  given  the  minimal  number  of  devices  that  will  likely  penetrate  the 
market,  the  benefit  of  economies  of  scale  will  not  be  realized,  therefore  not  putting 
much  pricing  pressure  or  competition  in  the  marketplace.  This  will  likely  result  in 
most of the devices not being an attractive purchasing option for many small to me-
dium  sized  fleets,  or  for  those  fleets  operating  on  thin  margins.  Ultimately,  in  our 
view  the  NPRM  will  not  enable  a  level  playing  field  for  the  motor  carrier  industry 
as a whole, which will cause most fleets to opt not to purchase an EOBR. 
Technology 

As  FMCSA  indicates  in  its  NPRM,  technology  has  come  a  long  way  in  recent 
years and is capable of performing many more functions than what would be needed 
to  monitor  and  manage  HOS  compliance.  We  believe  the  optimal  approach  related 
to  EOBRs  is  to  limit  their  performance  requirements  to  just  those  necessary  for 
HOS  compliance.  This  will  help  to  keep  costs  down,  and  also  help  to  ensure  that 
the  display,  evaluation  and  back  office  system  functionality  needed  for  enforcement 
to  monitor  and  evaluate  compliance  will  be  made  easier  and  help  to  minimize  the 
liability exposure to the industry. 

We  believe  FMCSA  needs  to  put  more  explicit  focus  and  emphasis  on  standard-
izing  the  performance  specifications  regarding  tamperproof  requirements,  informa-
tion  gathering  and  display,  editing  and  error  recording  and  reporting,  and  as  well 
as  communication  accuracy,  timeliness  and  redundancy.  We  are  appreciative  of  the 
fact that FMCSA included GPS as a performance requirement in the NPRM, as this 
will  provide  some  measure  of  assistance  in  accuracy  and  redundancy.  We  also  ap-
preciate  requiring  parallel  data  streams  and  making  sure  that  the  original  data  is 
kept intact, as this should help law enforcement when reviewing records and during 
the driver interview process. However, we still strongly believe there must be a tam-
perproof requirement. 

A  related  issue  is  one  of  FMCSA’s  identified  seven  performance  requirements  in 
the NPRM—identification of the driver and ensuring the EOBR is able to attach the 
driver  to  his/her  appropriate  hours-of-service.  In  our  view  this  issue  is  critical  and 
fundamental  to  helping  minimize  falsification  and  errors/inaccuracies.  Although  we 
support  providing  flexibility  to  motor  carriers  and  technology  providers  on  this 
point, we strongly believe that FMCSA needs to specify a minimum performance re-
quirement, to include outlining standardized and explicit test procedures and expec-
tations. This would be part of the EOBR certification program (see Recommendation 
section).  The  EOBR  must  be  able  to  correctly  identify  the  driver/employee  in  all 
duty  status  stages  of  his/her  hours-of-service  and  be  able  to  accurately  tie  the  em-
ployee to the vehicle, cargo and motor carrier at all times. This is especially impor-
tant for leased drivers and owner/operators. 

The  NPRM  discusses  the  notion  of  permitting  EOBR  devices  that  are  not  inte-
grally synchronized with the vehicle. While we fully understand that cell phone and 
other  like-technologies  are  available  that  use  hours-of-service  applications,  at  this 
point  in  time  we  are  not  supportive  of  permitting  them  to  be  used  as  EOBRs.  We 
are  not  convinced  that  these  technologies  will  effectively  minimize  the  opportunity 
for  falsification  and  drivers  taking  ghost  runs.  However,  we  do  believe  that  these 
types  of  devices  are  in  need  of  further  study  to  understand  how  in  the  future  they 
may  be  used  in  this  capacity.  We  are  sensitive  to  the  fact  that  cell  phone  and  like- 
technologies  are  pervasive  in  the  industry  and  tend  to  be  on  the  lower  cost  end  of 
EOBR  devices.  We  do  not  want  to  dismiss  out  of  hand  the  fact  that  once  they  (and 
the performance specifications) are more fully outlined and understood they possibly 
could be used as an EOBR. 
As  for  the  recording  interval,  we  are  supportive  of  1  minute  increments.  We  also 
support  the ±  1  percent  location  accuracy.  We  believe  that  EOBRs  must  use  stand-
ardized  data  formats  and  communications  protocols.  We  also  firmly  believe  there 
must  be  a  standardized  display  using  the  graph-grid  format,  and  that  non-compli-
ance must be easily identified. 

In  our  view,  FMCSA  may  not  want  to  explicitly  identify  the  different  types  of 
communications  technologies  that  are  able  to  be  used  in  the  application  of  EOBRs, 
since they are so rapidly changing and evolving. The more important aspects related 
to  the  data  in  our  view  are  the  security  aspects  as  well  as  the  content  and  timeli-
ness  of  the  information  availability,  and  not  necessarily  the  method  of  communica-
tion. 
Enforcement 

The NPRM upon implementation will likely make it difficult for enforcement offi-
cers.  The  problem  with  EOBRs  today  is  that  there  is  no  standardization  in  terms 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

18 

of  how  the  information  is  made  available  for  officers  to  evaluate  compliance,  how 
errors  and  modifications  to  records  are  recorded  and  reported,  nor  is  there  a  rig-
orous  certification  program  to  ensure  they  are  operating  correctly.  The  combination 
of grandfathering existing devices, providing the 2 year window for voluntary adop-
tion  of  non-complaint  395.16  devices,  and  the  likely  limited  penetration  of  EOBRs 
will  continue  to  create  difficulties  for  enforcement  with  understanding  and  accu-
rately evaluating the operation of all the different device types. We also believe that 
the option of using devices not integrally synchronized with the vehicle presents its 
own  set  of  challenges  for  enforcement  that  are  not  yet  fully  understood.  We  also 
strongly  believe  that  EOBRs  must  be  made  tamperproof.  Although  the  NPRM  does 
make  an  attempt  to  correct  some  of  these  concerns  in  the  performance  specifica-
tions,  we  do  not  believe  it  goes  far  enough  to  minimize  tampering  or  to  make  sure 
that officers will feel comfortable with using the devices. 

Law enforcement needs the capability to be able to print HOS records at roadside 
to  more  effectively  review  HOS  compliance  and  collect  evidence.  Although  we  sup-
port  having  EOBRs  providing  the  functionality  to  print  out  the  HOS  records,  we 
think a more prudent and cost effective approach is to equip certified inspectors/offi-
cers  with  the  appropriate  technologies  and  printing  device  to  be  able  to  do  this 
themselves.  This  will  help  those  officers  who  do  not  currently  use  laptop  or  hand 
held  computers  (or  the  software  to  read  the  EOBR  data  file).  Ultimately,  this  ap-
proach  will  also  serve  to  assist  in  having  more  roadside  inspections  completed  (and 
uploaded)  electronically,  since  many  inspectors  are  still  completing  inspections  on 
paper. 

As  for  access  to  the  HOS  data,  we  agree  with  FMCSA  that  EOBRs  must  not  re-
quire  the  officer  to  have  to  enter  the  cab  of  the  vehicle.  If  electronic  files  are  going 
to be made available for download, they must adhere to common, uniform and strict 
standards. In addition, the officers must be able to read the data on their (for those 
who  have  them)  laptops  or  hand  held  computers.  However,  we  do  have  concerns 
with the possibility of these files introducing a virus or otherwise damaging the op-
erating system or software. 
Summary 

We believe that in order to enable significant positive changes to hours-of-service 
compliance  there  needs  to  be  universal  adoption  of  EOBR  technology.  However,  it 
is critically important that the performance specifications for these devices, and the 
oversight of those producing and using them is done in such a manner that enables 
them  to  be  user-friendly  for  law  enforcement  and  that  there  is  credibility  and  con-
fidence in the accuracy of the data. 

Hours-of-service  continues  to  be  a  challenging  area  for  many  motor  carriers  to 
make significant strides in improving compliance. There must be a multi-faceted ap-
proach  in  terms  of  finding  solutions,  and  the  status  quo  is  just  not  acceptable.  We 
believe that the implementation of EOBRs is one of the important elements of such 
an approach. 

Thank  you  very  much  for  inviting  us  to  be  here  today,  and  I  am  happy  to  take 

any questions you may have. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank each one of you for your testimony. 
Mr. Rosenker, the USDOT’s Large Truck Crash Causation Study 
in  2006,  estimates  that  only  13  percent  of  American  truck  crashes 
involve fatigue, but yet, your agency has put the figure at 30 to 40 
percent. Now, is DOT underestimating the problem of truck driver 
fatigue? 

Mr. ROSENKER. Sir, our study that we did in 1990 on large truck 
crashes  dealt  with  fatal  accidents.  We  found  that  approximately 
one-third  dealt  with,  in  some  shape  or  form,  fatigue.  But  that 
didn’t  necessarily  mean  it  was  fatigue  only.  So,  the  data  that,  in 
fact,  we  are  seeing  now,  clearly  later  data,  is  data  which  is  quite 
valid. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How difficult is it to find out whether driv-
er  fatigue  is  a  factor  in  truck  crashes?  Does  it  have  to  be  an  ex-
trapolation of other data in order to even make an assumption like 
that? 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  It  does.  And  what  we’ve  found,  in  a  series  of  3 
million  inspections,  7  percent  of  the  drivers  that  they  took  a  look 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

19 

at in the 3 million inspections were put off the road for human-fac-
tor  issues,  the  vast  majority  of  which  dealt  with  fatigue.  So,  we 
found that to be a very large factor when they were put out-of-serv-
ice. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Hill, what do you think about that? 
Mr. HILL. Mr. Chairman—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Do you agree with Mr. Rosenker? 
Mr.  HILL.  Well,  I  would  agree  with  several  points  that  he  made. 
I  would  just  like  to  clarify  on  the  data  problem  that  we  have  in 
quantifying exactly the related cause of crashes. 

As  you  know,  most  of  the  crashes  were  done  by  local  and  state 
enforcement  officers,  and  the  crash  reports  indicate  a  variety  of 
things.  Fatigue  is  one  of  the  things  that’s  indicated  on  a  crash  re-
port,  as  well  as  driver  inattention.  And  so,  what  we  look  at  is  the 
FARS  data,  the  fatality  accident  reduction—the  accident  reporting 
system, FARS, has a typical under-reporting problem with fatigue. 
We  know  that.  Therefore,  we’re  taking  into  consideration  later 
data.  When  you  mention  the  Large  Truck  Crash  Causation  Study, 
this  study  took  nearly  1,000  crashes,  and  it  had  specialized  people 
who  went  to  the  scene  of  the  crash,  interviewed  all  the  drivers  in-
volved, and they knew how to find this fatigue-related matter. That 
is  why  the  number  is  so  much  higher  than  what  the  common  re-
porting  numbers  in  FARS  indicate,  which  is  somewhere  around  2 
percent  of  all  fatal  crashes.  So,  we  think  that  the  number  is  much 
higher, and that’s why our Large Truck Crash Causation Study in-
dicates the number of 13 percent. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Did  it  take  a  long  time  for  your  agency  to 
step up to the reinforcement requirements, the law enforcement re-
quirements that were expected to be there in these years past, and 
yet very little has really happened? 

Mr.  HILL.  In  terms  of  the  enforcement  of  the  hours-of-service 

rules, sir? 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr. HILL. As Captain Harrison indicated, there has been signifi-
cant  litigation,  and  every  time  we  have  a  disruption  in  that  rule-
making process, the enforcement suffers from that. They are uncer-
tain about what the current rule is. At any given time, when there 
are  changes  to  the  rule,  we  have  to  go  out  and  train  them  on  the 
changes  that  need  to  be  enacted.  There  has  been  some  disruption 
since 2003, when we implemented the rule. Since that time, we are 
moving  forward  with  our  current  enforcement  program.  As  Chair-
man  Rosenker  indicated  we  are  seeing  out-of-service  rates  com-
parable  to  what  they  were  before  the  rule  was  imposed.  So,  we  do 
have a consistency in the enforcement regime at this time. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Captain  Harrison,  how  do  you  see  it,  in 
terms  of  the  estimates  on  fatigue  and  the  causation  that  it  brings 
about? 

Mr. HARRISON. Well, we are not statisticians, we’re—we’ll enforce 
whatever  the  rule  is.  And  it  appears,  examining  the  data  that  we 
do have, that it’s been pretty consistent, whether it was under the 
old rules or the revised rules. You know, the point I want to make 
is  that  the  hours-of-service  regulations  since  January  2004  have 
been  in  a  constant  state  of  flux,  seems  like.  And,  as  far  as  an  en-
forcement is concerned, we need stability in those rules so that ev-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

20 

erybody  understands  the  rules  and  we  can  readily  educate  the 
motor carrier population and enforce the rules. We consistently run 
upon  drivers  that  don’t  understand  the  rules.  And  sometimes  we 
come to blows, almost, with drivers, because they can’t understand 
why  they’re  being  placed  out-of-service  for  exceeding  the  limits, 
when  they  don’t  really  understand  the  limits.  So,  we  need  consist-
ency on the rules, to start with. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  How  do  we  get  that  educational  factor  in 

place? 

Mr. HARRISON. Well, first, we need these hours-of-service rules— 
if  the  FMCSA  has  done  their  job,  and  they  have  identified  the 
human  factors  that  affect  driver  fatigue,  and  say  that  a  24-hour 
clock is what you need, the circadian rhythm, and they fashion the 
rules according to that, we need them locked in place, and we’ll en-
force  whatever  the  rules  are.  And  then  we  can  have  a  set  of  data 
that  we  can  analyze.  Right  now,  with  the  flux  in  the  regulations, 
we  haven’t  been  under  the  new  rules  long  enough  to  determine  if 
they are effective, if they’re making a difference. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  It’s  obviously  important  for  the  EOB  re-
corders on trucks to be tamperproof. Now, that doesn’t look like it’s 
an  impossible  problem,  either  technologically  or  educationally.  No-
body can alter or adjust the information in black boxes on airplanes 
or  locomotives,  right?  So,  there  shouldn’t  be  a  problem  with  that, 
certainly, in terms of what we expect the device to be able to guar-
antee here. 

Mr.  Hill,  it  seems  that  the  Bush  administration  is  taking  an  op-
portunity  to  use  technology  to  make  our  highways  safer.  Why  not 
require  on-board  recorders  for  all  new  trucks  and  all  new  carriers, 
at the very least? That’s, frankly, how we got airbags into cars. 

Mr. HILL. Mr. Chairman, I would just say to you that we are cur-
rently  proposing  a  rule  that  would  begin  down  the  road  of  seeing 
a  greater  expansion  of  the  technology  in  trucks,  and  we’re  open  to 
considering  other  alternatives.  That  is  why  we  are  going  through 
this notice of proposed rulemaking. So, I think that your question— 
for  us,  in  terms  of  this  particular  rule,  we’re  proposing  one  that 
deals  with  the  risk,  at  the  present  time,  that  we  feel  is  the  great-
est,  and  that’s  why  we  have  addressed  it  the  way  we  did.  I  made 
mention,  in  my  earlier  statement,  that  87  percent  of  the  carriers 
that would be involved in this remedial directive, or a requirement 
to  have  an  EOBR  placed  on  the  vehicle  within  the  first  2  years, 
80—they  have  an  87  percent  higher  crash  rating  than  other  car-
riers  not  in  that  group  of  people.  So,  we’re  trying  to  assess  risk, 
and put the technology where we can see it start to grow, and then 
hopefully create some incentives for other industry participation, as 
well. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, but should we confine the use of these 
recorders only to those who seem to be riskier? We ought to be get 
it  out  there  and  introduce  it  as  a  requirement  for  new  product.  I 
think that’s a relatively easy thing to do. 

What do you think, Mr. Rosenker? 
Mr.  ROSENKER.  We  agree  with  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  We’ve  long 
been  on  the  record  about  this  particular  technology.  We  believe  it 
can do much to begin the process of getting compliance from those 
that are, unfortunately, skirting the law, and that it makes it easy 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

21 

to  do  when  you  don’t  have  technology  like  this  to  validate  the  ac-
tual  hours-of-service  that  an  operator  is  performing.  We  started 
with this back in 1977, and, unfortunately, have not been very suc-
cessful in getting either regulatory or voluntary installation. 

However,  with  that  said,  we’ve  got  an  NPRM  that’s  now  out 
there,  and  I’m  hoping  that  it  would  perhaps  include,  as  what  we 
suggested in our response to the NPRM: one, heartier, more robust 
standards  for  crash-worthiness  that  could  be  utilized  in  the  event 
of  an  accident;  two,  it  should  basically  deal  with  all  carriers,  not 
just selected carriers that have appeared in one shape or form that 
violated  the  rules;  and,  finally,  the  NPRM  asks  for  voluntary  com-
pliance,  and  if  you’re  asking  for  voluntary  compliance  from  every-
one,  those  that,  in  fact,  are  the  most  egregious  of  violators  won’t 
be incentivized to install this device. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I agree. 
Last  summer,  a  large  truck  crashed  into  two  cars  on  the  New 
Jersey Turnpike, killing four people. The truck driver was cited for 
careless  driving.  When  your  agency  looked  at  the  records  of  this 
driver—after  the  fact—the  investigators  found  previous  violations 
of  the  hours-of-service  laws,  falsifying  records  of  compliance,  and 
no drug or alcohol testing plan in place. 

Now,  obviously,  wouldn’t  the  electronic  on-board  recorder  be  an 
aid to your inspectors, and state inspectors, to find violators before, 
not  after,  a  crash?  The  thing  we  were  discussing,  Mr.  Hill,  about 
looking  at  the  riskiest  places—the  riskiest  individuals  also  to  be 
part of that. 

Want do you think, Mr. Rosenker? 
Mr.  ROSENKER.  Again,  we  believe  technology  has  a  tremendous 
place  in  this  issue  of  compliance.  With  the  new  devices  are  data 
and  digital  data-driven,  we  believe  that  they  are  extremely  dif-
ficult,  if  not  nearly  impossible,  to  in  any  way  influence  on  change. 
So  for  us,  when  it  comes  to  accident  investigation,  the  kinds  of 
equipment  that  we  see  right  now  would  be  extremely  helpful.  We 
believe  we  can  significantly  reduce  the  number  of  accidents,  inju-
ries and, ultimately, fatalities by getting compliance ahead of time 
so  that  the  fatigue  issue  isn’t  a  factor  when  we’re  talking  about 
highway accidents. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. But I’m not sure that we came to the con-
clusion  that  relates  to  the  records  of  drivers,  those  who  have  had 
past difficulties, falsifying records. Could we use the data gathered 
here to determine that and make sure that these people had a par-
ticular condition that we had to watch out for? 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  I’m  not  sure  if  this  type  of  device,  the  way  it  is 
built  at  this  moment,  would  be  a  device  that  would  provide  that 
type of information to the roadside inspector. 

done. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr.  ROSENKER.—an  entire  record.  I  don’t  know  if  that  could  be 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  No,  but  I  assume  that  there  is  a  place 
where records are kept of a driver’s performance, especially in seri-
ous  accidents.  Shouldn’t  that  be  a  database  that  we  tap  routinely 
for  people  who  are  going  to  get  behind  the  wheel  of  a  giant  truck 
and get out there on—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

22 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  I  would  agree.  And  we  have  that  on  our  Most 
Wanted  List.  I  happen  to  have  brought  an  example  of  our  Most 
Wanted List with me. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. OK. 
Mr. ROSENKER. Two areas that, in fact, we’ve worked on with the 
Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  is  the  area  of  pre-
venting  medically  unqualified  drivers  from  operating  commercial 
vehicles,  and  also  improving  the  carrier  operations.  We’ve  asked 
that to be done by preventing motor carriers from operating if they 
put  vehicles  with  mechanical  problems  on  the  road  or  unqualified 
drivers  behind  the  wheel,  which  would  be  those  that  are  in  egre-
gious  violation  of  the  rules  and  regulations  of  the  State  and  Fed-
eral law. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thanks.  I  have  more  questions,  but  my 

colleague Senator Smith has been most patient. 

Senator take as much—— 
Senator SMITH. OK. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—time as you need. 
Senator SMITH. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Administrator Hill, I understand that under the rule proposed by 
your agency earlier in the year, only carriers that have a identified 
history  of  noncompliance  with  hours-of-service  regulations  are  the 
ones  that  will  then  get  these  electronic  on-board  recorders.  Is  that 
correct? 

Mr.  HILL.  That  is  the  proposal  at  this  time.  Of  course,  there  are 
also  incentives  for  people  to  put  it  onto  their  carriers  into  their 
fleet  voluntarily,  but  we  did  require  EOBRs  as  you  suggested,  for 
the noncompliant ones, yes. 

Senator  SMITH.  I’m  interested  in  how  you  arrive  at  the  designa-
tion  of  a  noncompliant  person.  As  I  listened  to  Mr.  Rosenker,  it 
seems  to  me  he’s  saying  that  the  sampling  may  be  awfully  small. 
In 2005, your agency performed only 8,000, roughly, compliance re-
views, and there are nearly over 900,000 active and registered car-
riers, meaning 1 percent is the sample. If you’re going to take your 
approach,  providing  EOBRs  on  all  trucks,  is  that  a  sufficient  sam-
ple? 

Mr. HILL. Well, it—as I said, earlier to the Chairman in response 
to  his  question,  we  are  starting  with  a  proposed  rule,  and  I  think 
we have to consider that this is a baseline, and we need to consider 
other options. I’m hearing that very clearly today. I do believe that 
it’s  very  small  sample,  and  it’s  going  to  be  difficult,  but  I  will  say 
that  it’s  a  snapshot  in  time,  so  that  this  list  could  grow,  it  could 
become  larger,  because  of  more  roadside  inspections  finding  non-
compliance,  and  we  could  also  foresee  a  time  when  we  might  use 
other  indicators.  And  one  of  the  things  that  using  EOBRs  does  do, 
as  the  Chairman  was  alluding  to  in  his  last  questioning  with  the 
Chairman, is that it allows us to go in and readily look for patterns 
of  violations.  So,  where  we  put  this  into  carriers,  we’ll  be  able  to 
quickly  survey  and  do  an  assessment  of  the  driver  records  at  that 
carrier’s  place  of  business  much  more  quickly,  because  it  will  be 
automated, as opposed to the safety investigator going through and 
doing  a  laborious  sampling  of  certain  logbooks.  So,  I  think  it’s 
a—— 

Senator SMITH. Doesn’t it take you—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

23 

Mr. HILL.—in the long run—— 
Senator  SMITH.  It  takes  2  years  to  determine  if  somebody  has  a 

Mr.  HILL.  Well,  in  terms  of  the  proposal,  that’s  what  has  been 

noncompliance history? 

suggested. 

Senator  SMITH.  And  do  you  have  the  resources  to  increase  the 

surveillance, the designations? 

Mr.  HILL.  Well,  as  you  indicate,  as  you  framed  the  last  ques-
tion—we  do  have  a  large  population  here,  and  we  have  finite  re-
sources.  I  think  last  year  we  did  15,000  compliance  reviews  be-
tween us and the State enforcement groups. They’re doing 3 million 
roadside  inspections.  That’s  still  a  very  small  part  of  the  overall 
picture. So, we do have limited resources, and that’s why we, as an 
agency,  and  our  State  partners,  focus  on  risk,  looking  at  the  most 
severe violations to try to address that problem. And that’s the con-
sistent theme here that we’ve been trying to apply in this rule. And 
I  would  just,  again,  reiterate  that  it  is  a  notice  of  proposed  rule-
making, with the opportunity to make changes. 

Senator SMITH. I would imagine that the truckers don’t like this. 
You  know,  this  is  Big  Brother  watching  over  them.  I  can  imagine 
that  they  just  don’t  like  the  regulation.  Can  you  give  me  some  fla-
vor of the opposition to this? 

Mr.  HILL.  Sure.  We’re  hearing  privacy  issues.  In  some  cases,  I 
think  there  is  confusion  on  the  part  of  the  person  making  that 
claim,  because  we’re  not  going  to  require  anything  under  this  pro-
posed  rule  or  this  final  rule  of—as  it  comes  out,  that  isn’t  already 
on a logbook. 

But it’s the idea that the monitoring system will allow the carrier 
to  know  where  the  vehicle  is  going  when  they  are  not  doing  work 
for the carrier—— 

Senator  SMITH.  So,  is  it  the  driver  or  the  trucking  company? 
Sometimes  they’re  the  same,  I  understand—but  where  is  most  of 
the  pushback  coming  from,  the  drivers  or  the  motor  carrier  com-
pany? 

Mr.  HILL.  I  believe  you  have  both.  I  think,  from  the  carrier  per-
spective,  there’s  a  cost  factor,  and  they  want  to  make  sure  that  if 
you do have it, that they’re not playing on an uneven playing field 
with  their  competition.  And  then,  I  think  you  have  other  drivers 
who  are  concerned,  because  they’re  not  fully  aware  of  the  EOBR 
technology, about privacy concerns. 

Senator  SMITH.  So,  the  companies  would  prefer  that,  going  for-
ward,  it  be  in  every  vehicle,  I  assume,  as  part  of  the  cost  of  the 
vehicle,  if  you’re  going  to  have  it  at  all,  or  would  they  prefer  just 
in  the  basis  of  where  you  designate  who  has  a  noncompliance  his-
tory? 

Mr. HILL. Well, the industry’s going to be here on panel two, and 
I’m  sure  they’ll  be  ready  to  tell  you  how  they  feel  about  it.  But 
I—— 

Senator  SMITH.  Well,  I  can  imagine  how  they  feel  about  it.  I’m 
not  saying  where  I  am  on  this  position.  But  I’m  anxious  to  hear 
your perspective on your challenge in crafting this regulation, why 
you’re proposing to do it this way. 

Mr.  HILL.  Our  problem,  Senator  Smith,  is  we’re  required,  under 
the Administrative Procedures Act, to figure costs and benefits, and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

24 

it’s going to be difficult to put a rule forward that allows us to show 
some kind of benefit with an industry-wide mandate. 

Senator SMITH. OK. 
Mr. HILL. And so, we’re trying to work within that. To the extent 
that we can do this with a limited population, we can show a safety 
benefit. That is one of the options. 

The  alternative  to  that,  of  course,  is  that,  as  you  deploy  this 

more widespread you’ll see prices come down with the—— 

Senator SMITH. Right. 
Mr.  HILL.—the  technology.  And  somewhere  in  there,  I’d  like  to 
see  somebody  suggest  more  incentives  to  encourage  carriers  to  put 
this on their vehicles. 

Senator SMITH. Well, thank you. 
Mr. Rosenker, I understand that you’ve looked at what the Euro-
peans  are  doing  and  their  digital  recorders  for  some  time  now,  do 
they have it on all trucks? Is that correct? 

Mr. ROSENKER. That is a requirement, yes, sir. 
Senator  SMITH.  And  has  the  incidence  of  fatigue-related  crashes 
in  Europe  decreased  since  the  installation  of  the  recorders?  Was 
there any data—— 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  We  believe  they  have.  And  we  believe  we’d  see 
that same type of improvement here in the United States if, in fact, 
we  required  all  of  the  motor  carriers  to  use  them.  I  have  to  feel 
some  sympathy  for  the  Administrator,  but  I  believe  if  we  made  it 
a requirement across the board, there would be a level playing field 
where  everyone  could  participate.  The  costs  of  these  devices  would 
come  down  significantly.  And  you  would  also  begin  to  see  much 
better compliance. 

As  matter  of  fact,  I  believe  what  you  would  find  is  that  this 
would  help  the  Administrator  and  the  local  authorities  in  compli-
ance,  because,  in  fact,  if  everyone  has  them  then  they  all  run  the 
same  risk  of  being  stopped  and  their  devices  being  looked  at  for 
valid hours-of-service. 

Senator  SMITH.  Do  you  know  of  any  evidence  that  suggests  the 

carriers with the EOBRs have fewer fatigue-related crashes? 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  I  have  not  seen  the  specific  data  that  deals  with 
that.  There  are  not  a  whole  lot  of  carriers  out  there  that  have  it. 
Many  of  your  larger  carriers  are  using  them,  but  they’re  using 
them  as  a  total  system,  because  with  many  of  the  more  advanced 
devices  that  you  get  do  significantly  more  than  just  monitor  the 
hours-of-service.  They  will  deal  in  load  management,  fuel  manage-
ment,  trip  management,  cost-accounting  devices.  Now,  those  are 
more  expensive  devices,  but  I  believe  you’re  going  to  hear  from  in-
dustry  that  will  follow  us  in  the  next  panel,  that  will  talk  about 
the  significant  benefits  they  have  in  not  only  using  the  actual  re-
corder  for  hours-of-service  monitoring,  but  for  other  broader  appli-
cations as well. 

Senator SMITH. Administrator Hill, I wonder if there are any car-
rier companies that have them installed now, because they want all 
the  information  that  Mr.  Rosenker  identified—accounting  and  con-
trol of their traffic and all of these things? 

Mr.  HILL.  Yes,  Senator,  that  is  a  very  legitimate  point  to  this 
whole  process.  It  helps  with  the  overall  operational  efficiency  of 
their carrier operation. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

25 

I  would  just  say  to  you  in  response  to  what  you  asked  earlier, 
we  are  presently  working  with  carriers  who  have  deployed  EOBR 
equipment,  and  we  are  looking  at  their  crash  rates.  And  I—it’s  a 
little  premature,  the  study  is  finished,  but  we’re  going  through  a 
peer-review,  so  it’s  preliminary  for  me  to  actually  tell  you  the  re-
sults  of  it,  but  I  will  say  the  findings  do  look  encouraging,  in  re-
sponse  to  your  question  about  the  safety  benefit  for  people  who 
have deployed it. 

Senator  SMITH.  I  wonder—with  all  the  information-gathering 
that could come from this, I wonder if one of the pushbacks, in ad-
dition to loss of privacy on the part of the driver, would be the fear 
on the part of the company for litigation and what would be discov-
ered, in terms of information. Are you hearing that? 

Mr.  HILL.  Yes,  sir,  that  is  a  concern.  And  there  is  a  desire  in 
some part of the motor carrier industry to have that bulletproof so 
that there would not be this opportunity to just routinely take that 
information and use it in tort situations. 

Senator SMITH. Thank you. Been helpful. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much. 
Senator Pryor, welcome. 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator PRYOR. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
Let  me  ask,  if  I  may,  Administrator  Hill,  just  a  quick  hypo-
thetical  so  I  make  sure  I  understand  the  program  we’re  talking 
about. Let’s say you have a trucking company that has 100 trucks, 
and one driver has an hours-of-service violation. Would this require 
all 100 to add this? Tell me how this is going to work. 

Mr.  HILL.  Senator  Pryor,  the  current  proposal  is  that  when  we 
go  in  to  do  compliance  review,  we  do  a  sampling  of  the  hours-of- 
service  compliance,  so  we  would  take  a  percentage  of  the  drivers, 
so,  in  your  particular  scenario,  it  would  have  to  be  a  very  small 
carrier for one driver to be affected. If you have 100 drivers—— 

Senator PRYOR. Do you know—— 
Mr. HILL.—it would not affect the—— 
Senator PRYOR.—what you—what percentage—— 
Mr. HILL.—entire carrier. 
Senator PRYOR.—what percentage are you looking for? 
What’s your threshold? 
Mr. HILL. Ten percent violation rate, sir. 
Senator PRYOR. OK. Let me ask this. I know that there are com-
panies  that  are  using  this.  And  you  all  talked  about  that  just  a 
minute  ago.  What’s  your  sense  of  how  many  trucks,  or  what  per-
centage  of  trucks,  on  the  road  in  the  U.S.  are  using  this  tech-
nology? 

Mr.  HILL.  We  anticipated  that  question,  sir,  and  we’ve  been  try-
ing  diligently  to  put  our  hands  around  it.  There  was  a  article  in 
last  year’s  Commercial  Carrier  Journal  that  suggested  100,000  ve-
hicles had this kind of equipment. We have seen more recent data, 
from some of the trade publications, that indicates that there might 
be  vehicles  equipped  with  technology  that  is  not  presently  meas-
uring  hours-of-service,  but  has  the  capability  of  doing  so,  on  the 
order  of  400,000–450,000.  So,  there  is  a  lot  of—as  the  chairman 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

26 

just  indicated—there’s  a  lot  of  interest  in  this  already  with  man-
aging your operation, but not using it for the hours-of-service rule. 
Senator  PRYOR.  And  so,  whatever  the  number  is—100,000, 

400,000—how many of these large trucks are out on the road? 

Mr. HILL. Well, we are aware of about 8 million being registered, 
so—now,  that  includes  anything  over  10,000  pounds.  So,  a  lot  of 
trucks, a lot of vehicles that would impacted. 

Senator  PRYOR.  I’m  sorry,  I  missed  the  first  part  of  the  hearing, 
you  probably  said  this,  how  expensive  is  the  base  unit?  I  know,  as 
you  mentioned,  some  do  a  lot  of  other  things,  but  how  much  is  a 
base unit? What’s the cost? 

Mr. HILL. You didn’t miss it. We have, in the Notice Of Proposed 
Rulemaking,  a  range,  anywhere  from  $100  up  to  $4,100.  And  the 
estimate  that  we  use  for  this  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  was 
about $1,200. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. You guys are working on this Mexican truck 
program  that  we’ve  talked  about  before.  The  DOT,  you  know,  is 
scheduled  to  allow  Mexican  trucks  to  operate  beyond  their  current 
scope  of  authority  and  do  international  pickups  and  deliveries  out-
side  their  current,  ‘‘commercial  zone.’’  What  sort  of  technology  will 
be required, or is at least being contemplated, for those trucks par-
ticipating  in  the  Mexican  truck  program?  What  type  of  technology 
are we talking about there? 

Mr. HILL. Well, I can say a couple of things. First of all, they are 

required to meet the same standards that U.S. trucks have. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr.  HILL.  So,  the  regulatory  scheme,  there  would  be  nothing 
other  than  what  we  presently  have  for  U.S.  trucks.  But  we  are 
looking and considering using some kind of tracking mechanism for 
Mexican  trucks  and  U.S.  trucks  going  into  Mexico  during  the  time 
of the demonstration project that would be similar to a global posi-
tioning system that would allow us to monitor some of these activi-
ties. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Would  that  qualify  as  an  EOBR,  or  would  that 
just  be  more  like  a  GPS?  And  I’m  not  sure  I  understand  the  dif-
ference, completely, but—— 

Mr.  HILL.  It  would  have  the  capability  of  doing  what  an  EOBR 
does. I haven’t done a side-by-side comparison to say it meets every 
one of our performance standards, but it would allow us to monitor 
the  movement  of  that  vehicle.  I  wouldn’t  necessarily  put  a  driver 
in  the  exact  location  every  time  in  the  same  way  that  we  want  in 
this EOBR. 

Senator PRYOR. And you might—underline the word ‘‘might,’’ be-
cause  I  think  you  haven’t  finalized  what  you’re  going  to  do  yet— 
but  you  might  put—require  these  as  part  of  this  pilot  program  in 
order—so you can accurately monitor the program and see how it’s 
going, is that the purpose of doing it? 

Mr. HILL. Well, first of all, we are considering this, Senator. But 
the  large  issue  here  is  cabotage  movement.  It’ll  allow  us  to  watch 
for  whether  or  not  there  is  extensive  movement  beyond  the  point 
of delivery and the point of return. And so, in that sense, it’ll allow 
us  to  know  if  the  truck  is  operating  within  the  United  States  con-
trary to the international point—— 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

27 

Mr.  HILL.—of  pickup  and  delivery.  It’s  not  really  focused  exclu-
sively on hours-of-service, but it could have an application. And I’m 
not  prepared  to  talk  a  further  about  it,  because  I  have  not  been 
fully briefed on that. I’d be glad to get back with you on it, though. 

Senator PRYOR. That’d be great. If you would—— 
Mr. HILL. OK 
Senator PRYOR.—that would be great. 
Captain  Harrison,  let  me  ask  you,  from  a  law  enforcement  per-
spective,  does  having  EOBR—a  new  EOBR  regulation,  does  that 
present any challenge to local law enforcement, in terms of training 
and equipment, et cetera? 

Mr.  HARRISON.  I  don’t  think  it  would  have  a  significant  impact, 
provided  we  have  a  standard.  The  problem  right  now  with  the 
EOBRs  that  are  in  use  is,  there’s  not  a  standardized  format  from 
company  to  company  or  manufacturer  to  manufacturer.  So,  when 
we’re  trying  to  examine  these  devices  now  at  roadside,  it  presents 
a significant problem, because every one of them presents the data 
in  a  different  way.  And  so,  now—it’s  probably  a  bigger  problem 
now than it would be in the future, if they’re implemented, because 
now what do you train on? You have all these—— 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr. HARRISON.—different formats? 
Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr.  HARRISON.  In  the  future,  if  you  have  a  standardized  display 
of the information and how it’s retrieved and so forth, we can train 
on that, and we can implement it. 

Senator  PRYOR.  OK.  Is,  your  concern  is  that  there  may  not  be 

any standard? 

Mr.  HARRISON.  Well,  our  concern  is  that  when  and  if  it’s  imple-
mented, number one, it should be systemwide. We advocate that it 
be on all vehicles—all commercial vehicles for an unspecified period 
of time, and that there be standards in place over and above what’s 
there now to make sure that, number one, the data is displayed in 
a standardized format from manufacturer to manufacturer, that we 
have  positive  driver  identification,  because  that  is  a  significant 
problem. You could falsify the data in one of these devices by using 
a ghost driver. You punch in a different driver code, and, you know, 
the officer at the roadside, unless he has the name on the data, he 
doesn’t  know  who  that  data  belongs  to,  it’s  just  some  driver  num-
ber. And also, that it’s tamperproof. Those are our major concerns. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. 
Mr.  Chairman,  if  I  may,  just  one  more  question  for  the  NTSB. 
Mr.  Rosenker,  today  we’re  talking  about  trucking.  What  other 
transportation  industries  regulated  by  DOT  are  currently  required 
to use EOBR for hours-of-service compliance? 

Mr.  ROSENKER.  As  far  as  hours-of-service  compliance,  the  pri-
mary  use  for  the  kinds  of  recorders  that  we  use  in  aircraft,  are 
flight data recorders for performance of the aircraft. 

Senator PRYOR. Right. 
Mr.  ROSENKER.  The  hours-of-service  is  governed  by  other  meth-
ods.  We  have  data  recorders  for  cabs  in  locomotives.  Once  again, 
they  are  dealing  in  performance.  And  then,  of  course,  the  same 
type  of  recording  device  for  ships  called  voyage  data  recorders. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

28 

These are devices which record performance data of the vessels but 
not necessarily hours-of-service of the operators. 

Senator PRYOR. OK. That’s fair enough. 
Thank you. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks very much. 
I  would  ask  that  you  respond  to  any  questions  in  writing  that 
may come. And I thank you all for your testimony. And we’ll excuse 
you now from the witness desk and ask for the next panel to come 
up. That would include Mr. Gabbard, Dr. McCartt, Mr. Reiser, and 
Mr. Olson, please. 

[Pause.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Welcome,  to  our  second  panel.  Mr. 

Gabbard—or is it Gabbard? 

Mr. GABBARD. Gabbard is correct, sir. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  OK,  you’re  Vice  President  of  Siemens, 
VDO  Automotive;  Dr.  Anne  McCartt,  Senior  Vice  President,  Re-
search, for Insurance Institute for Highway Safety; Mr. Reiser, Ex-
ecutive  Vice  President  and  General  Counsel  for  Werner  Enter-
prises,  Incorporated—Mr.  Reiser,  you’re  going  to  be  representing 
the  American  Trucking  Association;  and  Mr.  Olson,  we  know  that 
you’re Chief Executive Officer of FIL-MOR Express, Incorporated— 
as a small-size trucking company, you’ll be able to tell us what size 
is small in the trucking industry. Thank you. 

Let’s  start  with  Mr.  Gabbard,  please.  Try  to  stay  to  a  5-minute 

limit, if you would. 
STATEMENT  OF  JERRY  G.  GABBARD,  VICE  PRESIDENT  AND 
GENERAL  MANAGER,  COMMERCIAL  VEHICLES,  NAFTA 
REGION, SIEMENS VDO AUTOMOTIVE CORPORATION 
Mr.  GABBARD.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman  and  your 

Ranking Member. 

My name is Jerry Gabbard. I am the Vice President of the Com-
mercial  Vehicle  Group  of  Siemen’s  VDO.  On  behalf  of  Siemens 
VDO  Automotive  Corporation,  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to 
present  our  views  on  the  use  of  electronic  on-board  recording  de-
vices. 

As  you  stated  earlier,  I  will  say  I  find  it  astounding  that  the 
United States is one of the few areas of a modern industrialized so-
ciety on this globe that does not have an electronic hours-of-service 
recording device requirement for heavy-duty truck drivers. 

Globally,  Siemens  VDO,  as  indicated  somewhat  earlier  in  some 
testimony,  is  involved  in  the  manufacturing  of  this  type  of  device, 
and  we  have  over  6  million  of  these  devices  deployed  throughout 
the world. 

What’s  wrong  with  today’s  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking?  I 
would  suggest  that  the  regulatory  impact  analysis  that’s  been  ref-
erenced  in  the  earlier  testimony  has  used  data  that  is  flawed,  and 
has led people to draw erroneous conclusions. 

The  rule  does  not  mandate  the  universal  installation  of  EOBRs, 
and  experience  has  found  without  the  universal  mandate  of  the 
EOBR, it will have minimal effect on road safety. 

The  rule  does  not  require  a  tamperproof  system,  which  is  abso-
lutely  mandatory  for  law  enforcement  and  to  enforce  the  rules  of 
the road. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

29 

The  rule  lacks  standardization  for  driver  identification,  as  men-

tioned earlier, on falsification of records and ghost trips. 

And there also is no provision for moving data from one truck to 
the  next.  When  a  driver  would  happen  to  move  from  one  vehicle 
to another, his hours-of-service data needs to move with him. 

The data privacy concern is not adequately addressed. 
Actually, what has happened is that the FMCSA has been led to 
ignore  some  of  the  evidence  that  was  presented,  and  has  been 
swayed somewhat by a regulatory impact analysis that is not as ac-
curate as it should be. 

If you look at the regulatory impact analysis specifically, the full 
cost  of  a  fleet  management  system  was  being  used,  as  was  indi-
cated in earlier testimony, that full cost was in the range of $1,200, 
when, reality, a minimally compliant device could be in the area of 
$300  to  $450,  which  would  dramatically  impact  and  change  the 
outlook of the regulatory impact analysis. 

Also included in the RIA are costs for wireless data transmission 
of data back to a base or a home office, when, in reality today, sir, 
a lot of the truckers that are operating in the United States do not 
have  a  back  office;  in  fact,  it  might  be—the  back  of  the  cab  that 
they’re  riding  in  might  be  their  office;  and,  therefore,  the  wireless 
data  transmission  is  not  really  needed  for  a  minimally  compliant 
device. 

Cost  savings  from  economies  of  scale,  if  you  make  a  market  at-
tractive for manufacturers such as ourselves, it will drive down the 
cost  of  the  device;  therefore,  the  cost  savings  from  economies  of 
scale was not considered. 

The  useful  life  of  the  device,  or  the  life  expectancy  of  the  device 
in the RIA was stated to be 3 to 5 years, when, in reality, the true 
market  indication  is,  the  life  of  the  device  should  be  in  the  neigh-
borhood of 10 years. 

A  universal  mandate  will  also  further  reduce  costs  of  the  device 
itself, as I mentioned, by economies of scale and by reducing instal-
lation  costs;  and,  furthermore,  with  a  standardized  device,  as  indi-
cated in earlier testimony, it will significantly reduce training costs 
for drivers, dispatchers, and law enforcement. 

Therefore,  I  would  re-emphasize  that  the—I  believe  that  the 
FMCSA  was  led,  to  false  conclusions  by  using  flawed  RIA  data  in 
their analysis. 

What  can  an  EOBR  do  for  society  and  for  the  American  roads? 
It  can  increase  road  safety.  It  can  reduce  the  paper  mill  of  sup-
porting  documents.  It  can  improve  driver  compliance.  It  can  pro-
vide tamperproof data. It can provide and reduce roadside time for 
roadside  safety  inspections.  It  can  reduce  accidents  that  translate 
into  the  reduced  loss  of  life  and  property.  It  can  provide  a  level 
playing field. And it can provide and create a market for a low-cost 
device.  And,  reemphasizing  again,  a  low-cost  device  should  be  in 
the hundreds, not in the thousands. 

In  summary,  Mr.  Chairman,  the  full  potential  of  a  standardized 
device of an EOBR can lead to increased road safety. We can create 
an  attractive  market  for  manufacturing  the  device  and  the  sup-
porting materials that will come along with it. 

The  paper  record  of  driver  activity  needs  to  be  replaced,  and  I 
believe  that  in  the  efforts  that  have  taken  place  over  the  last  3 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

30 

years, that we’ve lost the focus of trying to come up with a system 
that  would  provide  trustworthy,  reliable  data  in  order  to  enforce 
hours-of-service rules on our American highways. And this rule, to 
this point, has failed to address this issue. 

This concludes my discussion, Mr. Chairman, and I look forward 

to questions later on. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Gabbard follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JERRY G.  GABBARD,  VICE PRESIDENT AND GENERAL 
MANAGER,  COMMERCIAL VEHICLES,  NAFTA  REGION,  SIEMENS VDO  AUTOMOTIVE 
CORPORATION 
Mr.  Chairman  and  members  of  the  Subcommittee,  my  name  is  Jerry  Gabbard, 
and  I  am  Vice  President  for  Commercial  Vehicles  in  the  NAFTA  region  of  Siemens 
VDO  Automotive.  On  behalf  of  the  Siemens  VDO  Automotive  Corporation,  I  appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  present  our  views  on  the  use  of  electronic  on-board  record-
ing devices. 
Background of Siemens with Vehicle Safety Technologies 

Siemens  VDO  is  a  leading  international  supplier  of  automotive  electronics  and 
mechatronics. Through the use of our products, such as airbags, ABS, or access con-
trol  systems,  both  chassis  and  car-body  safety  is  increased.  As  a  development  part-
ner  within  the  automobile  industry,  we  manufacture  a  comprehensive  spectrum  of 
products  relating  to  the  drive-train,  engine  management  electronics  and  fuel  injec-
tion  that  simultaneously  improve  engine  performance  and  reduce  emissions.  Driver 
comfort  is  enhanced  and  driving  is  made  easier  with  information  and  car  commu-
nication  systems  that  include  instrumentation,  audio  and  navigation  equipment, 
telematics, and multimedia applications, up to entire cockpit designs. 

Globally,  Siemens  VDO  supplies  virtually  all  manufacturers  of  commercial  vehi-
cles with electronic on-board recorders and offers a variety of aftermarket solutions 
tailored  to  unique  regional  and  national  needs.  There  are  more  than  6  million  of 
our on-board recorders installed in commercial vehicles throughout the world. 

Our  company  is  committed  to  support  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administra-
tion’s (FMCSA’s) goal to improve commercial vehicle motor safety and the intention 
to  introduce  a  practical  rule  on  Electronic  On-Board  Recorders  (EOBRs)  for  Hours- 
of-Service  (HOS)  compliance.  Over  the  past  35  years  Siemens  has  learned  from 
other world regions that EOBRs, universally used in all heavy commercial vehicles, 
have  significant  potential  to  contribute  to  improved  compliance  with  HOS  regula-
tion, and therefore, reduce crashes related to driver fatigue. 
Major Concerns With the Proposed FMCSA Rule on EOBRs 

leading to inappropriate analyses. 

• Siemens  VDO  believes  that  the  Notice  of  Proposed  Rule  Making  (NPRM)  on 
EOBR in its current form will not lead to increased installation and proper uti-
lization of EOBR. We therefore predict no measurable impact on improved road 
safety  and  no  contribution  toward  treating  all  carriers  and  drivers  equitably 
and less driver exploitation. 
• The Regulatory Impact Analyses (RIA) has used excessive EOBR cost estimates 
• The  rule  does  not  mandate  the  universal  installation  of  EOBRs,  and  the  pro-
posed incentives will not encourage carriers to install EOBR in significant quan-
tities. 
• The  rule  uses  an  inappropriate  definition  of  ‘‘problem  drivers’’  in  regard  to  the 
reality of HOS compliance. Thus, the chances of detecting non-compliance given 
today’s  minimal  number  of  roadside  checks  makes  meaningful  road  safety  im-
provements highly unlikely. 

• The rule does not require a tamperproof system design. 
• The  rule  lacks  standard  specifications  for  driver  identification  and  how  drivers 
can move their HOS data from one vehicle to another. 
• Data privacy concerns are not adequately considered. 
• FMCSA has tried to balance different arguments in the Advanced Notice of Pro-
posed  Rule  Making  (ANPRM)  but  has  failed  to  put  safety  first.  The  rule  there-
fore  fails  to  meet  the  minimum  standards  established  by  the  Motor  Carrier 
Safety  Improvement  Act  of  1999  or  the  D.C.  Court  of  Appeals  dictate  in  the 
Public Citizen decision. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

31 

FMCSA  has  based  its  decision  not  to  propose  a  universal  mandate  for  an  EOBR 
and to promote mobile devices mainly on the cost/benefit analyses of the Regulatory 
Impact  Analyses  of  Electronic  On-Board  Recorders.  Unfortunately,  the  Regulatory 
Impact  Analysis  (RIA),  and  therefore  FMCSA,  ignored  submitted  evidence  about 
EOBR  products  now  on  the  market  that  are  inexpensive,  tamper-resistant  and 
standardized. There is a significant difference between the cost estimation for EOBR 
as  stated  in  the  RIA  and  the  cost  estimation  of  Siemens  VDO  and  other  potential 
vendors.1 
Detailed Criticism of the Underlying Regulatory Impact Analysis 

• The  full  cost  for  today’s  fleet  management  systems  has  been  used  by  FMCSA 
for  the  RIA,  ignoring  the  fact  that  HOS  function  is  only  an  add  on  component 
to  the  system.  The  primarily  reason  to  use  the  fleet  management  system  (and 
therefore  its  main  cost  driver)  is  to  enforce  other  company  policies  such  as  to 
monitor  drivers’  behavior,  vehicle  movement,  and  freight.  The  proposed  per-
formance  specification  for  EOBR  HOS  recording  adds  only  minimal  costs  to 
standard  fleet  management  solutions  (FMS).  Those  transport  companies  that 
buy and use FMS mainly for operational reasons, are likely to benefit from lim-
ited additional cost for electronic HOS recording and would recoup their invest-
ment costs in a very short period. However, this would place smaller fleets and 
owner-operators at a competitive disadvantage. 
• Costs  for  wireless  data  extraction  are  included  in  the  annual  operating  cost. 
This  is  necessary  for  mobile  phone  solutions  and  is  also  normally  part  of  fleet 
management  concepts  designed  for  big  fleets  in  long  haul  operations.  But  this 
is not implicitly required for minimally compliant, tethered EOBR solutions, as 
they may use other means to transfer data to a secondary data back up system. 
In  particular,  owner-operators,  small  carriers,  and  those  operating  short  range 
distributions do not benefit from wireless data extraction of HOS data. As only 
a limited number of power units do not return to the transport companies home 
location  within  the  required  time  for  downloading  of  HOS  data  to  a  secondary 
back up system, the EOBR rule must allow for data downloading without Gen-
eral Packet Radio Service (GPRS) or satellite communication. 
• FMCSA is focusing on technical solutions available off-the-shelf today, but does 
not consider the technological possibilities for a minimally compliant and stand-
ardized EOBRs at current low cost. 
• Cost  savings  from  economies  of  scale  (when  universally  mandating  EOBR)  and 
• FMCSA  assumes  a  useful  lifetime  of  the  EOBR  of  3–5  years  which  might  be 
correct  when  using  mobile  phones  or  fleet  management  systems  but  will  cer-
tainly  not  be  the  case  with  minimally  compliant  and  standardized  EOBR.  The 
Siemens solution, for example, has a market life of 10 years. 
• With  a  universal  mandate  of  EOBR,  vehicle  manufacturers  are  likely  to  offer 
the HOS functionality as an integral part of their vehicles. This will further re-
duce the cost for the device itself and its installation cost. 
• Standardization  will  significantly  reduce  training  cost  for  drivers,  dispatchers 

increased competition have not been considered by FMCSA. 

and enforcers. 

The Need to Introduce a Practical EOBR Rule 

Thousands  of  people  are  killed  every  year  on  our  roads  in  accidents  in  which 
trucks are involved. In addition, tens of thousands are severely injured. Anyone who 
has  witnessed  a  large  truck  accident  understands  the  extreme  damage  to  life  and 
property that can result. 

Road  traffic  is  increasing  worldwide.  The  fact  that  safety  on  the  roads  has  in-
creased  in  most  of  the  world’s  highly  developed  countries  despite  increasing  traffic 
density  is  due  to  a  wide  range  of  measures  ranging  from  improved  infrastructure 
to  safer  vehicles  and  better  training.  Measures  which  encourage  people  to  comply 
with  speed  and  hours-of-service  regulations  are  a  key  part  of  many  of  these  regu-
latory systems. 
Truck Crash Studies 

Various  truck  crash  studies  have  reached  varying  conclusions  on  the  role  of  the 

driver but all conclude that driver fatigue is a significant factor. 

We  understand  that  some  truck  crash  studies  have  assigned  only  13  percent  of 
the  accidents  to  the  fatigue  of  drivers  (Large  Truck  Crash  Causation  Study)  while 

1 I.e., Report On Board. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

32 

others conclude that fatigue was the probable or primary cause of more than 40 per-
cent  of  the  crashes.2 Other  studies  show  significantly  increased  crash  risk  among 
drivers who have driven a long time rising by 50 percent after 4 hours driving and 
increasing by even 130 percent after more than 8 hours of driving time.3 

To  determine  if  drivers  are  violating  the  HOS  rules,  various  studies  have  been 
conducted. Observations of long distance trucking indicate that 30 percent to 50 per-
cent are in violation of the HOS regulations 4 whereas interviews of drivers indicate 
that more the 75 percent are at least partly violating the HOS rules. 

It should also be noted that two-thirds of interviewed drivers stated that they had 
driven  more  miles  than  was  recorded  in  their  logbook  during  the  past  year.5 In 
other words, Records of Duty Status (RODS) or electronic data records often do not 
reflect  the  reality  about  driving  time.  It  is  not  only  the  paper  log  books  which  are 
easily  tampered  with  but  is  also  the  case  with  many  of  the  recording  devices  cur-
rently available in the U.S. 
Data Security, Data Privacy and Standardization Requirements 

A key purpose of EORB is to achieve less tampering of HOS records than is pres-
ently  the  case  and  to  allow  for  better  enforcement.  Ultimately,  the  HOS  data  re-
corded  in  the  EOBR  must  be  reliable  enough  that  they  could  be  accepted  in  court, 
if required. 

This requires: 

1.  A  technical  and  organizational  concept  which  ensures  that  HOS  data  input 
reflects drivers’ consecutive activities properly; 
2.  A  technical  solution  which  records,  stores,  and  transmits  data  in  a 
tamperproof way; 
3. A means to allow enforcers to detect any manipulation attempt; 
4.  Standardized  data  access/download  interfaces  for  enforcers  and  carriers;  and 
5. Data access routines ensuring that only HOS relevant data could be accessed 
by law enforcers. 

The NPRM fails to address these requirements in the following ways: 
• Although the NPRM makes some suggestions for common protocols and file for-
mats,  EOBR  systems  from  different  vendors  are  unlikely  to  be  interoperable 
with each other. 

• The  driver  identification  system  and  drivers’  data  transfer  from  one  vehicle  to 
another have not been specified and restricted to one technical solution. A con-
secutive  HOS  record  for  drivers  using  different  vehicles  is  therefore  highly  un-
likely. 

• The proposed possibility to use mobile EOBR solutions not tethered to the vehi-

cle leaves the door wide open for falsification.6 

• The  EOBR  security  level  has  not  been  defined.  Test  and  certification  against 
common  IT  standards  by  independent  laboratories  are  not  required  as  they 
should be. 

Unfortunately,  devices  currently  available  in  the  U.S.  are  not  able  to  provide 
meaningful  compliance,  because  those  who  want  to  cheat  can  easily  do  it  using 
these  devices.  The  proposed  FMCSA  EOBR  rule  is  unlikely  to  change  this.  It  can 
be expected that law enforcement will return to requiring supporting documents, as 
the proposed EOBR rule does not provide the confidence that the HOS data is accu-
rate and dependable. 

Thus, we believe the proposed EOBR FMCSA rule will make little or no difference 
in  improving  the  road  safety  and  driving  habits  of  drivers  who  frequently  violate 
the HOS regulation. 

2 Transportation  Research  and  Marketing—A  Report  on  the  Determination  and  Evaluation  of 

Fatigue in Heavy Truck Accidents, 1985. 

3 tzuoo-Ding  Lin,  Paul  P.  Jovanis,  and  Chun-Zin  Yang,  Time  of  Day  Models  of  Motor  Carrier 

4 Beilock, R. and Capelle, R.B. ‘‘Economic Pressure, Long Distance Trucking and Safety’’, Jour-
nal of the Transportation Research Forum 28 (1987) 177–85. Hertz, R.P. ‘‘HOS Violations Among 
Tractor-Trailer  Drivers’’  Accident  Analyses  and  Prevention  23  (1991).  Elisa  R.  Braver  et  al., 
‘‘Long Hours and Fatigue: A Survey of Tractor-Trailer Drivers’’ Journal of Public Health Policy 
353 (1992). 

5 Id. Elisa R. Braver et al., at 4. 
6 Mobile EOBR can record proper HOS data, but only if the driver wants data to be recorded 

Accident Risk. 

properly. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

Findings and Conclusions 

33 

There  is  a  widespread  agreement  that  driver  fatigue  is  a  significant  contributor 
to  accidents  and  excessive  driving  times  are  a  major  contributor  to  driver  fatigue. 
Professional  drivers  are  likely  to  drive  routinely  for  many  hours  and  this  behavior 
is often due to self-imposed economic pressure or other competitive pressures. These 
and other factors often encourage drivers to ignore HOS requirements. 

Responsible managers of transport companies are aware and well informed about 
the  link  between  driving  time  and  accident  risk.  Several  leading  transport  compa-
nies have given a favorable opinion on a mandated EOBR system, because they un-
derstand that both they and society benefit from EOBR deployment. 

Based  on  our  35  years  of  experience  around  the  world  with  legally  required  sys-
tems for recording of drivers’ hours-of-service, we are fully convinced that these sys-
tems do have the strong potential to significantly reduce accidents that would other-
wise  be  caused  by  fatigued  drivers  violating  the  rules  and  will  contribute  to  har-
monized  competitive  conditions  and  perhaps  foster  an  environment  that  minimizes 
driver exploitation. 

However,  we  have  also  learned  that  EOBR  systems  only  achieve  their  full  poten-
tial for improved road safety at a low cost if the technical concept of the EOBR sys-
tem, its infrastructure and enforcement, are tailored for the specific needs and goals 
of the region in which they are being considered. 

We  believe  that  the  proposed  FMCSA  rulemaking  on  EOBR  for  HOS  compliance 
in  its  current  form  fails  to  meet  these  requirements  and  does  not  serve  the  public 
interest to reduce accidents caused by fatigued drivers, nor will it significantly con-
tribute to any significant cost savings to the trucking industry. 

The  Regulatory  Impact  Analysis  of  Electronic  On-Board  Recorders 7 has  failed  to 
adequately collect and analyze information about cost reduction potential for EOBR 
systems  for  HOS  recording  in  a  universally  mandated  market  and  ignored  sub-
mitted  evidence  about  the  existence  of  inexpensive  tamperproof  electronic  on-board 
recorders. The conclusions of FMCSA in the NPRM regarding the cost/benefit anal-
ysis are therefore fundamentally flawed. 

Low  cost  EOBRs  are  possible,  especially  for  owner-operators  or  other  companies 
that do not need the sophisticated functionality of fleet management systems. Dedi-
cated EOBR for HOS recording could be available at low annual total cost if EOBRs 
are universally mandated by FMCSA. 

Due  to  the  lack  of  a  universal  mandate,  existing  and  potential  new  vendors  of 
EOBR  systems  can  not  expect  any  reasonable  market  for  a  low  cost  EOBR.  There-
fore, costs for an EOBR unit including ongoing operating cost will remain high. 

Carriers are not homogenous and have different needs. Whereas some fleets ben-
efit  from  using  sophisticated  fleet  management  systems  others  do  not.  It  is  likely 
that  the  majority  of  carriers  will  accept  EOBRs,  but  only  if  their  concerns  about 
cost,  data  privacy,  and  competitive  disadvantages  are  considered  in  the  manner  in 
which is mandated. 

Under the proposed rule, the U.S. is unlikely to see significant numbers of EOBR 
systems installed and properly used by those drivers referred to as heavy violators, 
as they are simply not going to be apprehended by law enforcement. 

Public safety will not be enhanced without a universal EOBR mandate. 
The  use  of  mobile  solutions,  not  permanently  installed  in  the  vehicle,  allows  for 
ease  of  use  but  also  allows  easy  manipulation  of  driving  status.  Those  systems  are 
perfect  for  drivers  who  will  comply  and  demonstrate  HOS  compliance,  but  useless 
for enforcement if used by drivers willing to cheat. 

The proposed EOBR performance standard proposed in the rule with its inherent 
possibility  to  falsify  EOBR  data  records  at  all  levels,  will  not  improve  the  integrity 
of  the  recorded  data  over  manual  RODS.  Additionally,  law  enforcement  will  not 
have an enhanced tool to detect falsifications. 

It  is  highly  likely  under  the  proposed  rule  that  any  EOBR  data  will  largely  be 
ignored  by  state  and  local  law  enforcement  official,  as  they  will  soon  discover  the 
shortcomings.  Therefore,  it  is  also  unlikely  to  result  in  any  reduction  in  the  need 
for supporting documents. 
Summary of Siemens VDO Recommendations 

• The NPRM should be canceled and replaced by a new NPRM. 
• The  RIA  must  be  reworked  in  order  to  take  into  consideration  the  existence  of 
• The  NPRM  must  standardize  the  level  of  measures  to  prevent  tampering  with 
the  overall  system;  it  should  standardize  user  interfaces  with  respect  to  driver 

low cost EOBR devices. 

7 RIA  prepared  by  ICF  Consulting,  Inc.  for  the  FMCSA  Analyses  Division,  November  2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

34 

allow mobile solutions. 

what FMCSA is assuming, a widespread mandate should be proposed. 

identification and how drivers’ data are transferred from one vehicle to another; 
and it should define file formats and download protocols. 
• The  final  EOBR  rule  should  require  systems  to  be  fixed  to  the  vehicle  and  not 
• As  surveys  show  clearly  that  HOS  violations  are  much  more  widespread  than 
• A phase-in scenario for tamperproof EOBR and phaseout for old systems should 
• FMCSA  should  facilitate  the  introduction  of  EOBRs  by  sharing  the  most  cur-
• The  decision  to  universally  mandate  EOBRs  should  be  made  with  realistic  fig-
ures  and  also  in  the  light  of  the  primary  goal  which  is  to  improve  road  safety. 
I  appreciate  this  opportunity  to  offer  these  observations,  experiences,  and  rec-

rent and correct information on them with carriers and drivers. 

be developed. 

ommendations to improve highway safety in the United States. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you. 
Dr. McCartt? 

STATEMENT OF ANNE T. MCCARTT, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, 

RESEARCH, INSURANCE INSTITUTE FOR HIGHWAY SAFETY 
Dr. MCCARTT. Thank you, Mr. Chairman. 
The  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  is  a  nonprofit  re-
search and communications organization that identifies ways to re-
duce  the  deaths,  injuries,  and  property  damage  on  our  Nation’s 
highways. We’re sponsored by U.S. auto insurers. 

Thank you for allowing me to testify on this critical safety issue. 
The  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  and  its  prede-
cessor agencies have refused to protect the American public by ad-
dressing,  in  a  meaningful  way,  the  serious  problem  of  truck  driver 
fatigue.  The  agency’s  decision  to  increase  trucker’s  permissible 
daily and weekly driving hours, plus its failure to enforce the work 
rules, demonstrate indifference to public safety. Because it does not 
require recorders on all large trucks, and will affect only a tiny pro-
portion  of  motor  carriers,  the  proposed  rule,  if  finalized,  will  be  a 
travesty. 

Efforts to improve enforcement of truckers’ work rules span more 
than  three  decades.  In  1971,  Federal  legislation  was  introduced  to 
require  all  commercial  buses  and  trucks  manufactured  after  Janu-
ary  1974  to  be  equipped  with  tachographs  to  record  driving  time. 
The  legislation  was  not  enacted,  and  the  system  for  enforcement 
still is inadequate. 

In  1986,  our  Institute  petitioned  the  Bureau  of  Motor  Carrier 
Safety to require automatic on-board recording devices on all heavy 
trucks.  The  petition  was  denied,  and,  during  the  intervening  20 
years,  an  estimated  16,030  people  died  in  crashes  involving  fa-
tigued  truckers.  This  included  11,750  passenger  vehicle  occupants, 
2,257 occupants of large trucks, and 2,023 motorcyclists, bicyclists, 
pedestrians,  and  others.  By  failing  to  take  meaningful,  readily 
available  steps  to  address  trucker  fatigue,  FMCSA  and  its  prede-
cessor agencies share responsibility for these deaths. 

By  all  accounts,  the  system  of  manually  recorded  logbooks  is  a 
joke. In the electronic age, there’s no excuse for refusing to require 
devices  to  enforce  what  are  lax  restrictions  on  truckers’  driving 
times.  It  is  doubtful  that  anyone  can  argue  with  a  straight  face 
that a tractor trailer driver spending 11 hours behind the wheel is 
good for safety. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

35 

Since  1986,  our  Institute  has  submitted  four  additional  petitions 
and  19  comments  calling  for  an  on-board  recorder  requirement  for 
all large trucks. We’ve provided more than 200 pages documenting 
the  failed  paper-based  system  of  enforcement  and  the  affordability 
of  electronic  on-board  recorders.  Instead  of  considering  these  and 
other  objective  research  findings,  FMCSA  has  given  weight  to  evi-
dence that’s biased and lacking in scientific merit. For one brief pe-
riod in 2000, FMCSA appeared to take its safety title seriously and 
proposed to require recorders in all large trucks. However, this re-
quirement  was  removed  from  the  final  rule  effective  in  January 
2004.  When  it  vacated  the  rule,  the  U.S.  Court  of  Appeals  for  the 
District  of  Columbia  questioned  the  rationality  of  the  decision, 
chastising  the  agency  for  its,  ‘‘one-sided  and  passive,’’  regulatory 
approach to the issue of recorders, and noting that the agency had 
not  taken  the  ‘‘seemingly  obviously  step  of  testing  existing  record-
ers on the road.’’ 

FMCSA  still  has  not  tested  existing  recorders,  and,  with  little 
justification,  has  drafted  a  rule  affecting  only  a  tiny  percentage  of 
carriers.  The  proposal  represents  the  most  minimal  action  the 
agency could have taken in response to the court. 

In requiring recorders for a tiny proportion of carriers, the agen-
cy assumes there are only a few problem carriers and drivers. This 
is  contradicted  by  our  Institute’s  research  indicating  that  20  to  25 
percent  of  long-distance  truck  drivers  violate  work  rules.  In  2005, 
one  in  five  drivers  reported  falling  asleep  at  the  wheel  during  the 
previous  month,  an  increase  from  13  percent  in  2003,  before  the 
work  rule  change.  Unless  recorders  are  required,  compliance  offi-
cers  must  rely  on  paper  logbooks  and  related  documentation  that 
can  be  easily  falsified.  So,  identifying  even  this  tiny  proportion  of 
egregious violators is problematic. 

The proposal also fails to account for the large increase in trucks 
equipped  with  recorders.  About  45  percent  of  truck  drivers  we 
interviewed  in  2005  said  their  trucks  had  recorders,  up  from  18 
percent  in  2003;  however,  only  10  percent,  or  fewer,  of  truckers 
with recorders said they were using them in lieu of paper logbooks 
to  show  compliance  with  the  rules.  The  excuse  that  technology  is 
not  there  yet  does  not  stand  up  to  scrutiny.  We  can  download 
20,000  songs  to  our  iPods.  Worldwide,  we  sent  161  billion  gigabits 
of  digital  information  last  year.  Our  Government  sends  astronauts 
to  space  for  months  at  a  time.  In-vehicle  technologies  can  parallel 
park  without  driver  input.  Many  large  truck  rigs  have  expensive 
multifunction  entertainment  systems.  Is  it  really  possible  that  the 
Government  cannot  figure  out  how  to  get  devices  in  trucks  to 
record  when  they  are  being  driven?  It  is  past  time  for  research, 
pilot  studies,  or  government/industry  cooperative  ventures.  It  is 
time for action. 

In  the  meantime,  fatigue-related  deaths  continue.  In  Lake  But-
ler,  Florida,  on  January  26,  2006,  a  trucker,  who  had  been  awake 
for 34 hours, except for a short nap, rammed his tractor trailer into 
the  back  of  a  van  stopped  behind  a  school  bus.  In  the  ensuing  in-
ferno,  all  seven  children  in  the  van,  ages  20  months  to  15  years, 
were  killed.  Upon  hearing  of  the  tragedy,  their  grandfather  suf-
fered  a  fatal  heart  attack.  The  driver  of  the  school  bus  and  three 
children  were  seriously  injured.  Highway  patrol  officers  said  there 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

36 

was  no  evidence  the  trucker  braked  and  no  apparent  reason  why 
the  driver  could  not  have  seen  the  van  and  bus  stopping.  Many 
such tragedies occur each year because truck drivers, like this one, 
violate the work rules. 

The proposed rule does nothing that will prevent future tragedies 
like this. FMCSA, with the word ‘‘Safety’’ in its name, must require 
electronic  recorders  in  all  trucks  if  it  is  to  put  real  teeth  in  the 
hours-of-service  rules  and  finally  begin  to  curb  the  deadly  problem 
of fatigued truck drivers. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Dr. McCartt follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ANNE T. MCCARTT, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, RESEARCH, 

INSURANCE INSTITUTE FOR HIGHWAY SAFETY 

The  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  is  a  nonprofit  research  and  commu-
nications organization that identifies ways to reduce the deaths, injuries, and prop-
erty damage on our Nation’s highways. We are sponsored by U.S. automobile insur-
ers. Thank you for allowing me an opportunity to testify on this critical safety issue. 
The  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  and  its  predecessor  agencies 
have refused to protect the American public by addressing in a meaningful way the 
serious  problem  of  truck  driver  fatigue.  The  agency’s  recent  decision  to  increase 
truck  drivers’  permissible  daily  and  weekly  driving  hours  plus  its  failure  to  enforce 
work  rules  demonstrate  indifference  to  public  safety.  Because  it  does  not  require 
electronic  recorders  in  all  large  trucks  and  will  affect  only  a  tiny  proportion  of  car-
riers, the proposed rule, if finalized, will be a travesty. 

Efforts  to  improve  enforcement  of  hours-of-service  rules  for  truck  drivers  span 
more than 3 decades. In 1971 Federal legislation was introduced to require all com-
mercial  trucks  and  buses  manufactured  after  January  1974  to  be  equipped  with 
tachographs to record driving time. The legislation was not enacted, and to this day 
the system for enforcing hours-of-service rules is inadequate. I refer the Committee 
to the detailed chronology on rulemaking that is attached to my testimony. 

On  October  1,  1986,  the  Institute  petitioned  the  Bureau  of  Motor  Carrier  Safety 
to require automatic on-board recording devices to be installed and used in all heavy 
trucks. This petition was denied, and during the intervening 20 years an estimated 
16,030  people  died  in  crashes  involving  fatigued  truckers.  This  toll  includes  11,750 
passenger  vehicle  occupants;  2,257  occupants  of  large  trucks;  and  2,023  motorcy-
clists,  bicyclists,  pedestrians,  and  others  on  the  road.  By  failing  to  take  meaningful 
and  readily  available  steps  to  address  truck  driver  fatigue,  the  Federal  Motor  Car-
rier  Safety  Administration  and  its  predecessor  agencies  share  responsibility  for 
these deaths. 

By  all  accounts  the  current  system  of  manually  recorded  logbooks  is  a  joke.  In 
the electronic age there is no excuse for refusing to require devices in trucks to im-
prove the enforcement of what are lax restrictions on the amount of time truck driv-
ers can spend behind the wheel. It is doubtful that anyone can argue with a straight 
face  that  a  tractor  trailer  driver  spending  11  hours  behind  the  wheel  is  good  for 
safety. 

Since  1986  our  Institute  has  submitted  4  additional  petitions  and  19  comments 
calling  for  an  on-board  recorder  requirement  for  all  large  trucks.  We  have  provided 
more  than  200  pages  documenting  the  failed  paper-based  system  of  enforcement  of 
the  hours-of-service  rules  and  the  affordability  of  electronic  on-board  recorders.  In-
stead  of  considering  these  and  other  objective  research  findings,  the  agency  has 
given weight to evidence that is biased and lacking in scientific merit. 

For  one  brief  period  in  2000  the  agency  did  appear  to  take  its  safety  title  seri-
ously, proposing to require recorders in all large trucks. However, this requirement 
was  removed  from  the  final  rule  that  was  effective  January  4,  2004.  When  it  va-
cated  the  rule  in  July  2004,  the  U.S.  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  District  of  Columbia 
questioned  the  rationality  of  the  decision,  chastising  the  agency  for  its  ‘‘one-sided 
and passive’’ regulatory approach to the issue of recorders and noting that the agen-
cy  had  not  taken  the  ‘‘seemingly  obvious  step  of  testing  existing  [recorders]  on  the 
road’’ (Public Citizen v. FMCSA, 374 F.3d 1209, 1222 (D.C. Cir. 2004)). The Federal 
Motor Carrier Safety Administration still has not tested existing on-board recorders 
and, with little justification, has drafted a rule that would affect only a tiny percent-
age  of  motor  carriers.  The  proposal  represents  the  most  minimal  action  the  agency 
could have taken in response to the court. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

37 

In  requiring  on-board  recorders  for  only  a  miniscule  proportion  of  carriers,  the 
agency  assumes  there  are  only  a  few  problem  carriers  and  drivers.  This  is  contra-
dicted  by  Institute  research  indicating  that  20–25  percent  of  long-distance  truck 
drivers  violate  work  rules.  In  2005,  1  in  5  drivers  reported  falling  asleep  at  the 
wheel  during  the  previous  month,  an  increase  from  13  percent  in  2003  before  the 
work  rule  change.  The  research  further  indicates  an  association  between  work  rule 
violations  and  dozing  at  the  wheel.  Unless  on-board  recorders  are  required,  compli-
ance  officers  must  rely  on  paper  logbooks  and  related  documentation  that  can  be 
falsified  easily.  So  identifying  even  this  tiny  proportion  of  egregious  violators  will 
be problematic. 

The  proposed  rule  fails  to  account  for  the  large  increase  in  trucks  equipped  with 
recorders.  About  45  percent  of  long-distance  truck  drivers  said  in  2005  that  their 
trucks  had  recorders,  up  from  about  18  percent  in  2003  and  about  38  percent  in 
2004.  However,  only  10  percent  or  fewer  of  the  truckers  who  reported  having  on- 
board recorders said they were using them in lieu of paper logbooks to show compli-
ance  with  work  rules.  This  indicates  the  need  for  on-board  recorders  to  overcome 
noncompliance. 

The excuse that the technology is not there yet simply does not stand up to scru-
tiny.  We  can  download  20,000  songs  to  our  iPods.  Worldwide  we  sent  161  billion 
gigabytes of digital information last year. Our government sends astronauts to space 
for months at a time. In-vehicle technologies can parallel park without driver input. 
Many  large  truck  rigs  have  expensive,  multifunction  entertainment  systems.  Is  it 
really  possible  that  the  government  cannot  figure  out  how  to  get  devices  in  trucks 
to record when they are being driven? It is no longer credible to argue that the de-
vices  are  too  expensive  or  burdensome  for  widespread  use.  It  is  past  time  for  re-
search, pilot studies, or government/industry cooperative ventures. It is time for ac-
tion. 

In the meantime, fatigue-related deaths continue. In Lake Butler, Florida, on Jan-
uary  26,  2006,  a  trucker  who  had  been  awake  for  34  hours  except  for  a  short  nap 
rammed  his  tractor  trailer  into  the  back  of  a  van  stopped  behind  a  school  bus.  In 
the  ensuing  inferno  all  7  children  in  the  van,  ages  20  months  to  15  years,  were 
killed. Upon hearing of the tragedy, their grandfather suffered a fatal heart attack. 
The  driver  of  the  school  bus  and  3  children  were  seriously  injured.  Highway  Patrol 
officers  said  there  was  no  evidence  that  the  trucker  braked,  and  there  did  not  ap-
pear  to  be  any  reason  why  the  truck  driver  could  not  have  seen  the  van  and  bus 
stopping.  Many  such  tragedies  occur  each  year  because  truck  drivers,  like  this  one, 
exceed the hours-of-service regulations. 

The  proposed  rule  does  nothing  that  will  prevent  future  tragedies  like  this.  The 
Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration,  with  the  word  ‘‘safety’’  in  its  name, 
must  require  electronic  recorders  in  all  trucks  if  it  is  to  put  real  teeth  in  hours-of- 
service rules and finally begin to curb the deadly problem of fatigued truck drivers. 

REGULATING TRUCK DRIVER FATIGUE: A CHRONOLOGY OF DELAY 

Hours-of-service  and  logbook  regulations  are  inextricably  related.  The  following 
chronology  documents  many  initiatives  that  have  been  made  over  the  past  three 
decades to address the driver fatigue problem by improving the hours-of-service reg-
ulations  and  introducing  on-board  recorder  technology  that  is  objective  and  that 
does not rely on self reporting by the regulated industry. 

1971—To  address  the  issue  of  truck  speeds  and  fatigued  truck  drivers,  the  Bus 
and  Truck  Safety  Act  of  1971  (H.R.  10267)  is  introduced  to  require  all  commercial 
trucks and buses to be equipped with tachographs to record driving speed and miles 
traveled. 

1976—The  Bureau  of  Motor  Carrier  Safety  requests  public  comment  on  hours-of- 

service regulations to address the problem of fatigue-related crashes. 

1986—The  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  petitions  the  Bureau  of  Motor 
Carrier Safety to require heavy-duty truckers to install and use automatic on-board 
devices to record driving times and speeds. This petition is denied. 

1987—After  denying  the  1986  petition  to  require  on-board  recorders,  the  Federal 
Highway  Administration  reverses  its  decision  and  publishes  a  notice  seeking  more 
information. 

1987—The  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  research  shows  that  driving 

more than 8 hours increases the risk of large truck crashes. 

1988—Citing the Insurance Institute for Highway Safety’s petition for reconsider-
ation on on-board recorders, the Federal Highway Administration proposes to allow 
on-board recorders in lieu of the handwritten log. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

38 

1988—Congress  passes  the  Truck  and  Bus  Safety  and  Regulatory  Reform  Act  re-
quiring  the  Bureau  of  Motor  Carrier  Safety  to  begin  rulemaking  on  improved  com-
pliance with hours-of-service regulations, including consideration of on-board record-
ers. 

1989—The  Congressional  Office  of  Technology  Assessment  issues  a  report  citing 
a  wide  array  of  immediate  and  long-term  governmental  and  industry  actions  that 
could  reduce  the  truck  crash  problem.  Requiring  on-board  recorders  is  among  the 
recommendations. 

1989—The Insurance Institute for Highway Safety petitions the Federal Highway 
Administration  to  require  on-board  recorders  in  motor  carriers  transporting  haz-
ardous materials. 

1990—The  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  recommends  issuance  of  a  Fed-
eral rule to require on-board recorders to monitor the hours-of-service of truck driv-
ers. 

1992—A  survey  by  the  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  indicates  that  the 

majority of long-distance truckers violate work-hour rules. 

1992—The  Federal  Highway  Administration  proposes  to  increase  the  hours  com-

mercial vehicle drivers are permitted to drive. 

1995—The  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  and  five  other  safety  groups 

petition the Federal Highway Administration to require on-board recorders. 

1996—Directed by Congress in 1995 to reassess hours-of-service rules, the Federal 
Highway  Administration  again  considers  relaxing  the  rule,  relying  on  a  driver  fa-
tigue study by the agency and American Trucking Associations. Both the Insurance 
Institute for Highway Safety and a panel assembled by the agency identified numer-
ous weaknesses in the study. 

2000—The newly created Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration announces 
a  proposal  intended  to  reduce  the  problem  of  fatigue  by  requiring  longer  off-duty 
time for truckers and mandatory electronic recorders. 

2003—The Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration announces a rule that in-
creases  the  mandatory  daily  rest  period  by  2  hours,  allows  drivers  to  stay  on  the 
road for an extra hour, and introduces a restart provision to increase allowable driv-
ing hours within a 7- or 8-day period. The rule does not require on-board recorders, 
despite proposing to require them. 

2004—The  U.S.  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  District  of  Columbia  dismisses  the  Fed-
eral  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration’s  action  as  being  ‘‘arbitrary  and  capri-
cious.’’  The  court  specifically  cited  the  agency’s  attempted  justification  for  backing 
off  from  its  proposal  to  require  on-board  recorders.  The  agency’s  attempt  reflects 
‘‘questionable  rationality,’’  the  court  said,  adding  that  it  ‘‘cannot  fathom  . . .  why 
the agency has not even taken the seemingly obvious step of testing existing [record-
ers]  on  the  road’’  to  see  if  they  should  be  required  in  all  truck  rigs.  Public  Citizen 
v. FMCSA, 374 F.3d 1209 (D.C. Cir. 2004). 

2004—Although  the  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  has  permitted 
some  carriers  to  use  recorders  instead  of  paper  logs  since  1985,  the  agency  issues 
an  advanced  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  seeking  public  comment  on  dozens  of 
questions. This further delays mandating the use of recorders by all carriers. 

2005—The  Insurance  Institute  for  Highway  Safety  surveys  find  that  the  Federal 
rule addressing truck drivers’ work hours is not stopping truckers from driving with 
too  little  rest.  The  American  Trucking  Associations  announces  its  conditional  sup-
port for on-board recorders. 

2005—The  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  issues  a  revised  hours- 
of-service rule very similar to the one the court rejected in 2004. Public Citizen and 
others immediately sue to overturn the rule. 

2007—The Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration issues a proposed rule to 

require on-board recorders for a miniscule proportion of truckers. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much, Dr. McCartt. 
Mr. Reiser? 
STATEMENT OF RICHARD S. REISER, ON BEHALF OF THE 
EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT AND GENERAL COUNSEL, 

AMERICAN TRUCKING ASSOCIATIONS, INC. (ATA); 

WERNER ENTERPRISES, INC.; CHAIRMAN, ATA’S HOURS-OF- 

SERVICE COMMITTEE 

Mr.  REISER.  Good  afternoon,  Mr.  Chairman  and  other  members 
of the Subcommittee. Thank you for the opportunity to express the 
American  Trucking  Associations’  views  on  these  important  issues. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

39 

please. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Bring  the  mike  a  little  closer  to  you, 

Mr. REISER. I have to turn it on, too. I’m sorry. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. All right. Start anew. 
Mr.  REISER.  My  name  is  Richard  Reiser.  I’m  the  Executive  Vice 
President  and  General  Counsel  of  Werner  Enterprises,  from 
Omaha, Nebraska. 

Werner  Enterprises  is  a  truckload  motor  carrier  with  a  host  of 
trucking-  and  transportation-related  services.  We  have  a  fleet  of 
more than 8,800 tractors, over 25,000 trailers, and have more than 
14,000  employees  and  independent  contractors.  Our  mission  is  to 
provide  premier  transportation  and  logistics  services  while  main-
taining a high standard of safety, profitability, and integrity. 

Werner  has  operated  a  paperless  electronic  logging  system  since 
1998  under  a  unique  program  and  an  exemption  granted  by  the 
Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration.  For  years  now,  we 
have had the functional equivalent of an EOBR in every one of our 
8,000-plus trucks. As a result, we have a significant amount of ex-
perience  in  designing,  installing,  maintaining,  and  managing  an 
EOBR  system,  as  well  as  designing  and  implementing  a  training 
program for drivers. 

The  costs,  complexities,  and  outcomes  associated  with  using  an 
EOBR  system  are  well  known  to  us.  Although  it  is  disappointing 
to  say,  we  have  not  been  able  to  quantify  an  improved  safety  out-
come  from  using  EOBRs  and  achieving  a  higher  degree  of  hours- 
of-service compliance. Werner’s experience with EOBRs, along with 
other  members  of  ATA,  is  what  drives  ATA’s  position  and  rec-
ommendations on this issue. 

ATA  has  tried  hard  to  avoid  the  rhetoric  surrounding  this  issue, 
and  has  tried  to  be  dispassionate  and  productive  in  its  policy  rec-
ommendations.  ATA  can  see  a  future  state  where  certain  trucking 
operations are mandated to use EOBRs for hours-of-service record-
keeping. 

In  our  written  testimony,  we  have  included  our  full  set  of  policy 
recommendations  aimed  toward  moving  the  regulators  and  the  in-
dustry there. I will highlight three of those: 

First, there should be sound evidence that EOBR use leads to en-
hanced  safety  performance  by  means  such  as  an  accident-rate  re-
duction  or  other  safety  performance  measures  in  addition  to  im-
proved compliance. This data will increase the credibility of EOBR 
systems  as  a  cost-effective  technology  for  motor  carriers.  A  pre-
sumption has been made that EOBR use leads to better safety per-
formance  by  carriers  and  drivers;  however,  there  is  little,  if  any, 
empirical evidence to support that position. Werner’s 9-year experi-
ence  with  EOBRs  bears  that  out.  To  try  to  get  beyond  this  pre-
sumption,  the  regulators  should  partner  with  trucking  to  conduct 
a  pilot  program  of  sufficient  duration  with  adequate  controls  in 
place  to  determine  whether  driver  fatigue  is  reduced  and  if  there 
are real safety benefits to EOBR use. 

I  note  that  CVSA  has  also  recommended  to  the  FMCSA  that  it 
conduct  field  operational  tests  to  more  fully  evaluate  the  safety 
benefits  of  EOBR  use.  Whether  we  call  it  a  pilot  program  or  an 
operational  test,  it  should  be  done,  and  it  should  involve  the  regu-
lators, the industry, and the enforcement community. And it should 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

40 

involve  EOBRs  which  FMCSA  certifies  as  meeting  its  require-
ments. 

This  leads  me  to  our  second  recommendation.  FMCSA  should 
complete  and  issue  updated  and  improved  performance  specifica-
tions  for  EOBRs,  guidelines  for  how  the  technology  works,  what  it 
should  record,  how  often  it  records  the  data,  et  cetera.  Having 
final, or draft final, technology specifications for the device will fa-
cilitate the short-term pilot program I mentioned. It will also facili-
tate  voluntary  adoption  of  this  technology  by  those  carriers  choos-
ing to move from paperwork to electronic logging. 

Our first two recommendations are made to the regulatory agen-
cy, but our third is legislative in nature. We believe that statutory 
language  defining  motor  carriers  as  the  owners  and  primary  con-
trollers  of  the  EOBR-generated  data,  along  with  language  pro-
tecting  the  privacy  rights  of  drivers,  should  be  in  place.  Those 
granted  access  to  this  data  should  make  up  a  limited  list,  and  the 
access  should  be  for  hours-of-service  compliance  verification  and 
enforcement,  if  necessary.  Federal  policy  should  be  clear  on  this 
issue. 

ATA can clearly see the future where certain trucking companies 
are  mandated  by  regulation  to  use  EOBRs  for  documenting  hours- 
of-service  compliance.  Given  the  current  lack  of  empirical  evidence 
showing  a  safety  benefit  EOBR  use,  ATA  understands  FMCSA’s 
proposed  regulatory  approach,  and  generally  supports  it.  More 
meaningful regulatory incentives will help that approach. 

In  order  to  get  to  the  desired  future  state,  though,  ATA  rec-
ommends  a  pilot  program  for  a  goal—with  the  goal  of  producing 
empirical  evidence  that  EOBR  use  has  safety  benefits  and  is  cost- 
effective;  that  the  basic  performance  specifications  for  EOBRs  be 
clearly  defined  and  finalized;  and  that  Federal  policy  captured  in 
statute clearly define data-ownership control and access limits. 

In  closing,  a  comment  on  hours-of-service  limits.  Most  would 
agree that hours-of-service rules are a fairly rudimentary approach 
to addressing the complex issue of human alertness. The transpor-
tation  industry  and  regulators  need  to  move  toward  a  comprehen-
sive  alertness  and  fatigue  management  program  that  better  ad-
dresses this important issue. 

Thank you for the opportunity for ATA to offer its views and poli-
cies. We look forward to working with this Subcommittee, the Con-
gress,  FMCSA,  and  other  reasoned  stakeholders  to  improve  the 
safety and productivity of our Nation’s highway transportation sys-
tem. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Reiser follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD S.  REISER,  ON BEHALF OF THE AMERICAN 
TRUCKING ASSOCIATIONS,  INC.  (ATA);  EXECUTIVE VICE PRESIDENT AND GENERAL 
COUNSEL,  WERNER ENTERPRISES,  INC.;  CHAIRMAN,  ATA’S HOURS-OF-SERVICE 
COMMITTEE 
Introduction 

Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Vice  Chairman  and  other  Members  of  the  Subcommittee, 
thank you for the opportunity to express the American Trucking Associations’ views 
on  the  issues  of  electronic  on-board  recorders  (EOBRs)  and  truck  driver  fatigue.  I 
am Richard S. Reiser, Executive Vice President & General Counsel of Werner Enter-
prises,  Inc.  in  Omaha,  Nebraska.  Werner  Enterprises  is  among  the  five  largest 
truckload  motor  carriers  in  the  U.S.  with  a  portfolio  of  transportation  services  that 
includes:  medium  to  long  haul,  regional  and  local  van  capacity,  temperature-con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

41 

trolled,  flatbed,  dedicated  and  expedited  service.  Werner  is  in  its  51st  year  of  busi-
ness and has a fleet of more than 8,800 tractors, over 25,000 trailers and has more 
than  14,000  employees  and  independent  contractors.  The  principal  types  of  freight 
transported  by  Werner  include  retail  store  merchandise,  consumer  products,  manu-
factured products and grocery items. Werner’s mission is to provide premium trans-
portation  service  while  maintaining  a  high  standard  of  safety,  profitability  and  in-
tegrity. 

Werner  has  operated  a  paperless  electronic  logging  system  since  1998  under  a 
pilot program and exemption granted by the Federal Motor Carrier Safety Adminis-
tration (FMCSA). As a result, Werner has a significant amount of experience in de-
signing,  installing,  maintaining  and  managing  an  electronic  on-board  recorder 
(EOBR) system, as well as designing and implementing a training program for driv-
ers.  The  costs,  complexities  and  outcomes  associated  with  using  an  EOBR  system 
are well known to us. 

It is my pleasure to appear before the Subcommittee today on behalf of the Amer-
ican Trucking Associations, Inc. (ATA). Werner is a longstanding and active member 
of ATA and I am currently the Chairman of ATA’s Hours-of-Service Committee. 

ATA  is  a  united  federation  of  motor  carriers,  state  trucking  associations,  and  na-
tional trucking conferences created to promote and protect the interests of the truck-
ing  industry.  Its  membership  includes  more  than  2,000  trucking  companies  and  in-
dustry suppliers of equipment and services. Directly and indirectly through its affili-
ated  organizations,  ATA  encompasses  over  35,000  companies  and  every  type  and 
class of motor carrier operation. 

ATA  is  encouraged  that  FMCSA  has  initiated  the  process  to  update  regulations 
involving  EOBRs  used  to  record  a  drivers’  hours-of-service.  ATA  is  also  aware  that 
the  agency  is  contemplating  the  promotion  of  several  new  ‘‘safety  technologies’’  to 
be potentially used in the future. As such, the agency and industry have undertaken 
studies  to  determine  what  is  needed  to  motivate  the  industry  to  adopt  and  deploy 
on-board  safety  devices  and  technologies.  The  shared  objective  is  to  reduce  truck- 
involved crashes by deploying proven, effective equipment that has the best return- 
on-investment  (ROI).  Integration  of  these  concepts  in  the  development  of  an  EOBR 
rule would help to produce a useful regulation and provide incentives for implemen-
tation. (See Attachment A for recent research findings). 

In our testimony today, we will: 
• Explain our policies and views on FMCSA’s proposed rule on EOBRs. 
• Offer ATA’s recommendations to make use of EOBRs more viable and effective. 
• Offer an insight into the size of the truck driver fatigue issue and public policy 

development associated with it. 

ATA’s Policy Conditionally Supports a Mandate 

ATA foresees a future state where certain trucking operations are required to use 
EOBRs  for  hours-of-service  recordkeeping.  ATA’s  membership  established  in  Octo-
ber  2005  a  nine-point  policy  regarding  EOBRs  aimed  at  achieving  prudent  utiliza-
tion of this technology. We have attached this policy for the Subcommittee’s review. 
(See Attachment B). 

A  primary  point  within  our  policy  concerns  the  safety  benefits  of  EOBR  usage. 

This is stated as: 

‘‘There  should  be  sound,  consensus-based  evidence  that  EOBR  use  leads  to  en-
hanced  fleet  safety  performance  by  such  means  as  accident  rate  reduction  and 
improved  compliance,  therefore,  increasing  the  credibility  of  EOBR  systems  as 
a cost-effective technology for motor carriers.’’ 

There  is  little,  if  any,  empirical  evidence  showing  that  EOBR  use  reduces  driver 
fatigue,  prevents  accidents,  improves  safety  and  lowers  costs.1 This  empirical  evi-
dence  is  necessary  not  only  to  support  a  regulation  and  its  associated  benefits,  but 
also to provide motor carriers meaningful information in deciding whether to deploy 
such systems in their fleets. 

While the safety benefits are the primary issue, as they should be, investment and 
ongoing  costs  are  also  a  concern  to  ATA’s  members.  When  assessing  the  economic 
impact on a motor carrier of any future proposed requirement for EOBRs, it is nec-
essary not only to consider the cost of purchasing and installing the system in each 
truck  to  record  a  driver’s  hours-of-service,  but  also  other  associated  and  potentially 
significant  ongoing  costs  (See  Attachment  C).  On  this  point,  it  is  unfortunate  that 

1 ‘‘Electronic  On-Board  Recorder  Adoption  In  the  Trucking  Industry:  Issues  and  Opportuni-

ties,’’ September 2006, The American Transportation Research Institute. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

42 

FMCSA’s  Regulatory  Impact  Analysis  (RIA)  did  little  to  help  clarify  the  costs  and 
benefits of the proposed rule, other than finding that costs of EOBRs almost always 
outweigh  the  benefits.  The  RIA  makes  it  clear  that  there  is  a  dearth  of  research 
identifying  safety  benefits  of  EOBR  use,  while  the  costs  of  the  EOBR  systems  used 
in  the  RIA  indicate  that  the  technology  remains  a  significant  investment  for  motor 
carriers. 

Given that FMCSA does not have safety benefit data sufficient to support an over-
all mandate, ATA generally supports the agency’s policy approach to provide incen-
tives to drive voluntary industry adoption of EOBRs, with mandates limited to tar-
geted enforcement against carriers and drivers shown to be historically non-compli-
ant with hours-of-service rules. 

However, ATA believes the agency must make important changes to the proposed 
rule  to  make  it  effective  in  practice  and  to  better  promote  the  voluntary  use  of 
EOBRs. 

This brings us to our next point within ATA’s policy. That is: 

‘‘EOBR  systems  should  be  based  on  the  minimal,  functional  and  performance 
specifications necessary to accurately record and report hours-of-service compli-
ance and assure reliability and utility of operation.’’ 

The industry has asked for uniform, minimum performance criteria for EOBR de-
vices  and  systems,  which  provides  for  flexibility  in  the  design  and  delivery  to  the 
market.  There  needs  to  be  design  and  operational  requirements  that  will  depend-
ably, reliably and comprehensively replace manual logbooks. Without consistent and 
recognizable  specifications  for  EOBR  devices  and  systems,  there  will  continue  to  be 
questions  related  to  utility,  reliability,  tamper-resistance,  accuracy,  durability  and 
effectiveness. 

ATA  members  have  expressed  that  they  are  much  less  likely  to  invest  in  EOBRs 
for  hours-of-service  compliance  until  there  are  accepted,  feasible  and  finalized  per-
formance  specifications.  These  performance  specifications  are  needed  to  firmly  es-
tablish  uniform  and  reliable  EOBR  systems  that  will  accurately  record  and  report 
drivers’ hours-of-service. 

Motor  carriers  must  make  decisions  in  the  course  of  product  selection  and  need 

assurance that: 

• The EOBR design requirements are fully and adequately determined. 
• Performance  specifications  are  recognized  as  the  standard  to  be  met  by  EOBR 

equipment and service providers. 

• The EOBR system will function as expected in a secure environment. 
ATA  recognizes  that  recent  court  challenges  to  the  existing  hours-of-service  rules 
have  also  hindered  progress  in  defining  specific  information  and  parameters  that 
would be entered into EOBRs. The hours-of-service rules need to be stable and firm-
ly  in  place  so  that  this  integral  information  can  be  included  in  the  software  of 
deployable  (‘‘ready-to-use’’)  EOBR  systems,  and  thus  eliminate  the  need  for  rede-
ployment of operational systems in the future. 

Even more immediately significant is that without final, definitive and acceptable 

performance specifications for EOBRs: 

1.  It  is  highly  unlikely  that  motor  carriers  will  invest  in  such  systems  (prefer-
ring to wait and buy the compliant version). 
2.  The  EOBR  vendor  community  will  likely  promote  current  designs  and  sys-
tems  rather  than  make  technological  improvements  (preferring  to  wait  and 
produce a compliant version). 
3. Research that could illustrate the benefits and costs of EOBRs will be placed 
on hold (preferring to model methodology with the new compliant version). 

While  we  addressed  two  of  our  nine  policy  points  above,  we  encourage  a  review 

of the additional points in the attached ATA policy. (See Attachment B). 
ATA’s Recommendations 
Complete the Performance Specifications for EOBRs 

The  importance  of  satisfactorily  completing  and  issuing  final  performance  speci-
fications  should  not  be  underestimated.  This  is  essential  to  deployment  of  EOBRs 
and  ATA  recommends  that  FMCSA  issue  in  the  very  near  future  a  supplemental 
rulemaking  notice  with  better  and  more  technically  sound  performance  specifica-
tions  for  EOBRs.  ATA’s  comprehensive  written  comments  to  FMCSA  included  a 
number of specific recommendations in this area. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

Conduct a Pilot Program 

43 

FMCSA  should  conduct  a  pilot  program  of  sufficient  duration  with  adequate  con-
trols  in  place  to  determine  whether  or  not  driver  fatigue  is  reduced  and  there  are 
real  safety  benefits  to  EOBR  use.  Congressional  oversight  Committees  should  sup-
port this type of pilot program. A presumption has been made that there are safety 
benefits; however, there is little, if any, empirical evidence to support that position. 
The  pilot  program  should  use  a  form  of  EOBRs  which  FMCSA  certifies  as  meeting 
its  requirements.  This  is  critical  since  driver  acceptance  of  the  technology  and  the 
ability  of  drivers  to  understand  and  use  it  will  be  critical  to  the  ultimate  success 
of  any  such  device.  Additionally,  it  should  ensure  that  a  complying  device  is  avail-
able  at  a  cost  which  will  obtain  voluntary  participation  by  carriers  and  which  can 
be used for a benefit-cost analysis. 

Given  the  size  of  the  trucking  industry,  and  the  scope  and  complexity  of  this 
issue, mandating EOBRs without adequate testing through a pilot program may im-
pose a huge financial and operational burden upon the trucking industry, for which 
no real benefit is derived by either the public or the industry. 

ATA  and  several  of  its  members  are  very  much  interested  in  participating  with 
FMCSA in conduct of a pilot program and plans to submit a petition for such a pro-
gram. 
Provide Meaningful Incentives 

If  FMCSA  moves  forward  with  its  current  regulatory  approach,  it  should  offer 
motor carriers more substantial incentives to promote voluntary adoption of EOBRs. 
It  can  directly  encourage  motor  carrier  adoption  of  EOBRs  by  providing  reasonable 
and  defensible  flexibility  in  certain  areas  of  the  hours-of-service  requirements,  and 
offering  administrative  incentives.  For  example,  allowing  the  14  hour  ‘‘running 
clock’’  on-duty  limit  to  be  stopped  for  up  to  2  hours  for  rest  and  meal  breaks,  pro-
viding  flexibility  in  how  drivers  may  take  their  rest  periods  when  using  a  sleeper 
berth,  and  providing  positive  credit  or  points  for  carriers  in  the  criteria  used  to  se-
lect carriers for audits. 

Congress can also assist in stimulating voluntary adoption of EOBRs for improved 
compliance. Two legislative approaches that might be considered are statutory data 
protections and tax incentives. 

Statutory  protections  should  be  afforded  to  motor  carriers  pertaining  to  the  con-
trol, ownership and admissibility/discoverability of data generated and derived from 
EOBRs, and to assure the privacy rights of drivers. The enactment of statutory pro-
tections for data beyond that currently required under 49 CFR Part 395 could allevi-
ate  a  major  impediment  to  industry  acceptance  of  EOBRs.  Government  policy  also 
needs to support data privacy. Without certain protections afforded to motor carriers 
and  drivers,  the  shadow  of  external  access  to  EOBR  collected  data  that  is  outside 
the scope of the hours-of-service rules could serve as a disincentive to motor carrier 
investment. 

Congress should also consider tax incentives (e.g., credits) to encourage motor car-
rier  investment  in  EOBRs  and  to  offset  the  cost  of  purchasing  EOBR  devices  and 
associated  support  systems.  As  noted  in  Attachment  A,  tax  incentives  for  expense 
of equipment are prime ‘‘non-safety’’ motivators for investment. 
Truck Driver Fatigue and Related Issues 

It is important for policymakers to understand the size of the driver fatigue issue 
in  relationship  to  truck-involved  crashes.  The  most  recent  and,  by  far,  most  com-
prehensive  truck  crash  causation  study  was  completed  last  year,  and  a  report  was 
issued  to  Congress  in  March  2006.2 That  study  found  that  fatigue  was  11th  on  the 
list of the ‘‘Top 20’’ associated factors list. This report did not list fatigue as a ‘‘crit-
ical reason’’ or causation factor for the crashes investigated, rather it listed it along 
with other issues as an ‘‘associated factor.’’ Associated factors in the study were de-
fined  as  conditions  or  circumstances  present  at  the  time  of  the  crash,  and  no  judg-
ment was made as to whether it was related to the crash—just that it was present. 
This  study  also  found  that  the  majority  of  truck  crashes  are  multi-vehicles  crashes 
involving  at  least  one  truck  and  one  passenger  vehicle,  and  that  fatigue  was  coded 
as  an  associated  factor  twice  as  often  for  passenger  vehicle  driver  and  speeding 
more often for truck drivers.3 We have included two tables from this report showing 
fatigue  listed  as  an  associated  factor.  (See  Attachment  D).  This  study  was  author-
ized  and  funded  by  the  Congress,  performed  by  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transpor-

2 Report  to  Congress  on  the  Large  Truck  Crash  Causation  Study,  MC–R/RRA,  March  2006, 

U.S. Department of Transportation, Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration. 

3 Ibid, p. 3. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

44 

tation,  and  is  widely  recognized  as  the  most  comprehensive  study  of  truck-involved 
crashes ever performed. 

Of  course,  EOBRs  are  intended  to  assist  companies  and  drivers  record  on-duty 
shifts  and  off-duty  rest  periods  consistent  with  the  applicable  hours-of-service  rules 
in order to minimize the risk of operating while fatigued. These rules have changed 
twice  over  the  last  4  years,  after  remaining  constant  for  more  than  6  decades.  Un-
fortunately,  the  current  rules  are  unsettled  again  because  they  are  the  subject  of 
ongoing  litigation  in  the  U.S.  Court  of  Appeals  for  the  D.C.  Circuit  by  advocacy 
groups  and  organizations  representing  different  parts  of  the  industry.  Depending 
upon  the  outcome,  the  rules  could  change  yet  again.  FMCSA’s  EOBR  rulemaking 
process could well be impacted by the Court’s decision. 

In  addition,  as  a  result  of  the  rapid  change  in  the  hours-of-service  rules  in  the 
last  4  years,  the  jury  is  still  out  on  whether  the  revised  rules  are  achieving  their 
intended safety benefit. But the majority of stakeholders in this debate would likely 
agree that effective hours-of-service rules are only part of a solution aimed at keep-
ing commercial operators alert and safe when working and driving. Managing oper-
ator  alertness  and  fatigue  in  a  trucking  setting  is  a  complex  issue  that  calls  for  a 
more  comprehensive  approach.  ATA  is  hopeful  that  the  national  dialogue  on  this 
issue moves beyond simple on-duty and driving limits toward a more comprehensive 
programmatic approach to managing alertness. This will take years, but movement 
toward this goal needs to begin. 
Summary and Conclusion 

ATA  foresees  and  supports  a  future  state  where  certain  trucking  companies  are 
required  to  use  EOBRs  for  documenting  hours-of-service  compliance.  But  given  the 
lack  of  empirical  evidence  showing  a  safety  benefit  of  EOBR  use,  ATA  understands 
and  generally  supports  FMCSA’s  proposed  regulatory  approach.  In  order  to  get  to 
the desired future state, ATA recommends: 

• A pilot program aimed at producing empirical evidence that EOBR use has safe-

ty benefits and is cost effective, 

• That  the  basic  performance  specifications  for  EOBRs  be  clearly  defined  and  fi-

nalized. 

If  FMCSA  moves  forward  with  its  current  regulatory  approach,  it  should  provide 
meaningful incentives for motor carriers to voluntarily adopt EOBRs for compliance 
purposes. 

In addition, both government and industry need to recognize that hours-of-service 
rules  are  a  fairly  rudimentary  approach  to  addressing  the  complex  issue  of  human 
fatigue  and  alertness.  The  transportation  industry  and  regulators  need  to  move  to-
ward  alertness  and  fatigue  management  programs  that  more  comprehensively  ad-
dress this important issue. 

Mr.  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity 
for  ATA  to  offer  its  views  and  policies  on  EOBRs  and  driver  fatigue.  We  look  for-
ward to working with this Subcommittee, the Congress, FMCSA, and other reasoned 
stakeholders  to  improve  the  safety  and  productivity  of  our  Nation’s  highway  trans-
portation system. 

ATTACHMENT A 

The  Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  (FMCSA)  in  its  2005  report 
‘‘Factors  in  Decisions  to  Make,  Purchase,  and  Use  On-board  Safety  Technologies’’ 
identified  several  recommendations  and  conclusions  in  regards  to  advancing  adop-
tion of safety technologies for commercial motor vehicles.1 This guidance was offered 
by motor carriers, original equipment manufacturers (OEMs), product vendors, driv-
ers, and insurance companies. Some of the key decision points for promoting the use 
of such equipment were determined to be: 

• ‘‘Return on Investment (ROI) for Purchaser (the carrier) is considered an impor-
tant factor for sustained commercial success for on-board safety technologies. A 
positive  ROI  is  a  significant  factor  when  carriers  decide  to  purchase  on-board 
safety technologies according to most of the carriers interviewed.’’ 

• ‘‘Demonstrated Effectiveness to Improve Safety through the use of on-board safe-
ty systems essentially represents the benefits that offset the purchase and other 

1 ‘‘Factors  in  Decisions  to  Make,  Purchase,  and  Use  On-board  Safety  Technologies’’,  Federal 
Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration,  December  2005.  webpage  at:  http://www.fmcsa.dot.gov 
/facts-research/research-technology/report/factors-in-decisions.htm. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

45 

costs  to  yield  a  positive  ROI.  This  factor  is  important  to  all  stakeholders  sur-
veyed.’’ 
• ‘‘Reliability  and  Maintainability  is  also  a  significant  factor  (mentioned  in  a 
number  of  interviews)  and  is  considered  important  to  buyers  (carriers)  and 
manufacturers (OEMs and vendors). On-board safety technologies must be easy 
to  use,  provide  accurate  results,  be  consistently  reliable,  and  be  easy  to  main-
tain.  Any  inconsistencies  or  high  maintenance  requirements  will  discourage 
purchase by carriers.’’ 
• ‘‘Liability  is  a  potential  concern  to  a  number  of  stakeholders  interviewed,  espe-
cially  when  combined  with  the  discoverable  nature  of  the  data  stored  by  some 
on-board safety technologies. While the absence of liability concerns is not suffi-
cient to drive deployment, the presence of other concerns in this area could im-
pede deployment, therefore making it a significant factor as well. Liability con-
cerns  are  an  important  factor  to  carriers,  drivers,  and  manufacturers  inter-
viewed.’’ 
• ‘‘Initial Cost is an important adjunct to ROI. Too high a purchase cost not only 
makes  it  difficult  for  the  purchaser  to  believe  there  is  a  positive  ROI  but  also 
may  strain  the  ability  of  the  purchaser  to  raise  the  needed  capital  for  the  pur-
chase.  The  carriers  interviewed  indicated  that  affordability  and  payback  influ-
ence the decision to purchase the new technology.’’ 
• ‘‘Investment Required for Research and Development of New Technology, such as 
on-board  safety  technologies  for  OEMs  and  vendors,  is  fundamental  to  their 
business  plan.  The  combination  of  investment  needed,  expected  sales  volume, 
purchase cost, and cost of production make up the potential profitability for the 
vendor.’’ 
• ‘‘Market Image is a factor, at least in initial deployment of on-board safety tech-
nologies.  As  the  market  matures,  leveling  the  competitive  playing  field,  this 
may  become  less  significant  as  a  decision  factor.  Carriers  compete  for  cus-
tomers.  Their  image  or  reputation  in  the  business  is  important  to  them.  Run-
ning  a  state-of-the-art  fleet  that  operates  safely  and  efficiently  is  important  to 
carriers’ marketing programs. Crashes cause delays, additional costs, and dam-
aged cargos.’’ 
• ‘‘Driver  Acceptance  is  considered  important  by  a  number  of  carriers.  Drivers 
were receptive to on-board safety technologies, as long as the devices are proven 
effective  in  improving  safety,  are  user  friendly,  and  that  the  recorded  data  will 
not be used to violate their privacy.’’ 
• ‘‘In-Cab  Technology  Interface  Integration  is  an  important  factor  to  a  number  of 
the  stakeholders  interviewed.  This  factor  plays  a  key  role  in  enabling  the  var-
ious stakeholders to realize the value of on-board safety technologies with min-
imum cost, distraction, and potential for errors.’’ 

The  2006  release  ‘‘Synthesis  of  Commercial  Motor  Vehicle  Technology  Surveys: 

What Has Been Learned,’’ 2 reported that: 

‘‘Safety technology systems such as lane departure warning, forward radar, col-
lision warning, adaptive cruise control, rollover and stability control, and many 
others  are  being  investigated  and  promoted  by  FMCSA.  In  an  effort  to  address 
three primary crash types (rear-end collisions, road departures, and lane change 
and  merge  collisions),  FMCSA  and  other  agencies  within  the  U.S.  Department 
of Transportation are working toward integration of collision avoidance systems 
for large trucks.’’ 

This study documented and synthesized the major qualitative survey efforts with-
in  the  U.S.  relating  to  stakeholder  design,  use  and  perspectives  of  on-board  safety 
technologies. An underlying finding of this study was: 

‘‘Determination of ROI and a need for increased safety were the two biggest fac-
tors  associated  with  decisions  to  purchase  safety  technologies  according  to  two 
protocols.  When  assessing  the  technology  to  determine  its  value  and  effective-
ness  once  installed,  tangible  safety  benefits  and  ROI  were  again  the  two  most 
cited factors.’’ 

This  report  further  found  that  the  prime  motivations  for  installations  of  safety 
technology among the motor carriers were—reduce accidents (68 percent), lower in-

2 Virginia  Dick,  Daniel  Murray  and  Amy  Houser,  ‘‘Synthesis  of  Commercial  Motor  Vehicle 
Safety Technology Surveys’’, Transportation Research Record: Journal of the Transportation Re-
search Board No. 1969, Transportation Research Board of the National Academies, Washington, 
DC 2006, pp 107–144. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

46 

surance rates (52 percent), assist drivers (40 percent), and lower maintenance costs 
(40 percent). 

When  motor  carriers  were  asked  ‘‘what  FMCSA  could  do  to  encourage  the  devel-

opment and deployment of these technologies,’’ participants responded: 

• ‘‘Offer tax incentives for the expense of the equipment.’’ 
• ‘‘Make technology more affordable.’’ 
• ‘‘Avoid mandates.’’ 
• ‘‘Encourage public-private partnerships.’’ 
A  2006  study  by  the  American  Transportation  Research  Institute  (ATRI)  entitled 
‘‘Electronic  On-Board  Recorder  Adoption  in  the  Trucking  Industry:  Issues  and  Op-
portunities’’ 3 found crucial indicators about EOBR deployment including: 

• ‘‘. . . there is still a considerable dearth of research and data scientifically link-
ing the various components of the EOBR-to-safety continuum. Ultimately, these 
research gaps form the underlying basis for most industry concerns.’’ 
• ‘‘. . .  numerous  participants  and  respondents  cited  the  need  for  further  docu-
mentation  and  justification  of  the  relationship  between  EOBRs  and  safety.  As 
such, there is a significant need for, and interest in, research that scientifically 
documents  the  linear  relationship  between  EOBRs,  compliance,  fatigue,  and 
safety.’’ 
• ‘‘The study authors determined that EOBR benefits were equally difficult to as-
sess  . . .’’  This  is  likely  due  to  the  lack  of  empirical  data  correlating  the  use 
of  EOBRs  with  reduced  driver  fatigue,  which  is  a  primary  basis  for  IIHS  and 
other  advocacy  groups  to  advocate  for  the  technology  mandate.  (Editor’s  Note: 
IIHS is the Insurance Institute for Highway Safety) 
• ‘‘EOBR  usage  is  typically  rationalized  as  a  compliance  tool  by  both  users  and 
• ‘‘Ultimately, what is needed is a large-scale study that causally (correlationally 
at minimum) links the relationship of fatigue to safety, and the successful man-
agement thereof by HOS regulations.’’ 
• ‘‘Cost, privacy, and the lack of safety nexus are the primary barriers to industry 

nonusers, rather than a safety management system.’’ 

support of EOBR usage and mandates.’’ 

ATA  Policy  on  Electronic  on  Board  Recorders  (EOBRS)  Adopted  October 

2005 

ATTACHMENT B 

1.  There  should  be  sound,  consensus-based  evidence  that  EOBR  use  leads  to  en-
hanced  fleet  safety  performance  by  such  means  as  accident  rate  reduction  and  im-
proved  compliance,  therefore,  increasing  the  credibility  of  EOBR  systems  as  a  cost- 
effective technology for motor carriers. 

Explanation:  An  EOBR  mandate  should  be  based  on  widely  accepted  substan-
tiation that the devices and their support systems result in safety, cost and manage-
ment  advantages  for  carrier  rather  than  be  a  consequence  of  political  decision-
making. 

FMCSA  should  produce  persuasive  evidence  that  EOBR  use  will  reduce  fatigue- 
related accidents and thereby improve truck safety. It should not be presumed that 
there  is  a  correlation  between  electronic  recording  and  accident  reduction.  It  must 
be  documented.  A  belief  that  use  of  these  recorders  will  improve  compliance  does 
not substantiate a conclusion of accident mitigation. The agency will need to provide 
research  and  data  that  shows  that  improved  driver  compliance,  leads  to  safer  per-
formance and a decrease in accident occurrence. 

2.  EOBR  systems  should  be  based  on  the  minimal,  functional  and  performance 
specifications necessary to accurately record and report HOS compliance and assure 
reliability and utility of operation. 

Explanation:  Design  and  operational  requirements  and  their  recording,  reporting 
and  communication  systems  should  be  the  basic  elements  that  are  needed  to  de-
pendably replace manual logbooks. 

What  the  industry  needs  are  uniform,  minimum  performance  criteria  for  EOBR 
devices and systems, which provides for flexibility in the design and delivery to the 
market. If EOBRs are to be further utilized, the emphasis should be on performance 
criteria rather than design specifications. Additionally, there needs to be specific cri-

3 ‘‘Electronic  On-Board  Recorder  Adoption  in  the  Trucking  Industry:  Issues  and  Opportuni-

ties’’, American Transportation Research Institute, September 2006. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

47 

teria  for  what  data  should  be  collected  and  stored  in  an  EOBR.  It  would  be  in  the 
best  interest  of  motor  carriers,  FMCSA,  and  enforcement  personnel  to  define  the 
minimum  records  of  duty  status  (RODS)  format  and  support  system.  This  would 
help  to  remove  all  ambiguity  between  the  different  manufacturers  and  service  pro-
viders, increase the basic utility of EOBRs for trucking companies, and improve the 
efficiency of the auditing process. Without consistent and recognizable guidelines for 
EOBR  devices  and  systems,  questions  related  to  utility,  reliability,  tamper-resist-
ance, accuracy, durability, and effectiveness will be raised. 

3. Statutory protections should be afforded to motor carriers pertaining to the con-

trol and ownership of generated data and to assure the privacy rights of drivers. 

Explanation: Federal policy should support and clarify that motor carriers are the 

owners of, and have exclusive control over the data. 

Government  policy  needs  to  support  data  privacy.  Without  certain  protections  af-
forded to motor carriers, the shadow of external access could serve as a disincentive 
to motor carrier investment. In the case of EOBRs, there needs to be statutory pro-
tections  for  the  control,  ownership,  admissibility,  and  discovery  of  generated  data. 
To help minimize concerns and central to greater acceptance, the motor carrier must 
be  recognized  as  the  entity  that  has  sole  ownership  of  the  EOBR  data.  To  comply 
with and enforce the HOS rules, those granted access to this data should be a very 
limited list composed only of the motor carrier and the agents it designates, FMCSA 
officials,  authorized  state  enforcement  personnel,  and,  possibly,  representatives  of 
the  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  for  the  purposes  of  post-incident  inves-
tigations. 

4. Drivers shall be responsible for operating the EOBR in full compliance with all 

applicable regulations. 

Explanation:  Recordings  are  for  verification  of  drivers’  HOS  compliance.  Drivers 
make these entries and should, therefore, be held responsible for the accuracy of the 
entries  they  make.  Drivers  are  in  the  driver  seat  and  must  comply  with  the  HOS 
requirements. 

Drivers currently complete the manual record of duty status or logs for HOS com-
pliance.  Therefore,  drivers  must  therefore  be  held  responsible  for  correctly  making 
entries into electronic on-board logging systems. 

5. Any EOBR regulation must address the operational diversity of the trucking in-
dustry, continue existing exceptions to the record of duty status, and consider addi-
tional exemptions that balance compliance and the evolving industry diversity. 

Explanation:  If  there  is  sufficient  justification  to  exempt  operational  portions  of 
the industry and HOS compliance can be pre-determined (e.g., Less-than-Truckload 
(LTL), terminal to terminal routes), such operations should not be mandated to use 
EOBRs. Other exceptions currently granted by FMCSA from logbooks should be con-
tinued. 

There  are  industry  segments  and  types  of  operations  that  have  expressed  more 
concern  than  others  regarding  a  potential,  future  requirement  for  EOBR  use.  Some 
ATA members that operate in the LTL segment fall into this category. LTL carriers 
typically  operate  with  a  hub  and  spoke  system  using  pickup  and  delivery  drivers 
in  a  local  area  (i.e.,  they  are  typically  100  air-mile  radius  drivers),  and  in  line-haul 
operations with drivers moving freight over a longer distance between company ter-
minals.  LTL  line-haul  drivers  operate  in  a  tightly  controlled,  closely  supervised 
manner between terminals. In most cases the terminals of LTL carriers are strategi-
cally  located  to  not  only  service  customers,  but  to  ensure  that  the  regularly  sched-
uled  movements  of  freight  are  made  in  compliance  with  the  HOS  rules.  Some  of 
these LTL carriers see little or no compliance and safety performance benefit, of im-
posing  a  more  complex  HOS  recording  system.  Also,  it  is  believed  that  drivers  and 
operations  that  are  not  currently  subject  to  the  logbook  requirements  should  be 
treated similarly in regards to EOBR usage. These include 100 air-mile radius driv-
ers,  drivers  in  the  state  of  Hawaii,  and  certain  drivers  in  agricultural  operations. 
6.  Motor  carriers  using  compliant  EOBRs  should  be  relieved  of  the  burden  of  re-

taining supporting documents for HOS compliance and enforcement purposes. 

Explanation:  If  a  compliant  EOBR  system  is  used,  HOS  supporting  documents 
should  no  longer  be  required.  This  should  reduce  compliance  costs  and  serve  as  a 
strong incentive for carriers to adopt such systems. 

There has been a series of rulemaking by FMCSA on what records are needed to 
verify the recordings made by drivers on HOS logs. The most recent being a Supple-
mental  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  in  November  3,  2004.  There  is  significant 
driver  and  motor  carrier  commitment  in  keeping  the  verifications.  ATA  estimates 
that the total annual requirement for industry to implement the proposed November 
2004  rule  would  be  about  258  million  driver  and  motor  carrier  paperwork 
manhours.  The  potential  overall  costs  could  be  over  $5  billion  annually.  If  FMCSA 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

48 

provides allowances in the electronic generation and storage of data through the use 
of EOBRS, there could be substantial savings in operational time and expenses. 

7.  Any  EOBR  mandate,  if  instituted,  should  be  made  simultaneously  applicable 
to all vehicles of the affected population of motor carriers, it should avoid any imple-
mentation inequities identified, and take measures to eliminate them. 

Explanation:  If  EOBR  adoption  is  required,  it  should  be  on  all  carriers  large  and 
small  within  the  regulated  industry  segment  at  the  same  time.  (The  regulated  seg-
ment  may  include  exemptions  for  a  part  of  the  industry  such  as  proposed  in  ATA 
provision #5.) 

Many ATA members have communicated that any proposed future EOBR require-
ment  should  not  treat  large  and  small  motor  carriers  differently.  To  propose  a  re-
quirement  where  only  trucking  companies  of  a  certain  size  must  implement  EOBR 
systems  will  permit  these  exempted  carriers  to  operate  at  an  economic  advantage 
and  therefore  permit  them  to  provide  service  at  a  lower  cost.  The  same  is  true  if 
a  future  proposal  suggests  that  large  motor  carriers  would  have  to  implement 
EOBRs  on  a  more  accelerated  timeline  than  small  motor  carriers.  Small  and  large 
motor carriers should receive the same consideration in any future rulemaking pro-
posal. 

8.  Any  EOBR  regulation  that  takes  an  incentive-based  approach  should  allow  for 
reasonable and defensible flexibility in the HOS rules for drivers and motor carriers. 
Explanation: A rule encouraging the use of EOBRs should be based on adaptable 

HOS regulations. 

An  example  of  one  aspect  where  of  flexibility  in  the  HOS  rules  could  serve  to  be 
an incentive is in regards to the sleeper berth exemption. ATA members have stated 
difficulty  in  complying  with  the  2005  changes  in  regards  to  this  provision,  particu-
larly,  associated  with  team  drivers.  ‘‘Sleeper-berth’’  flexibility,  if  EOBRs  were  used, 
could serve as an added incentive, particularly, for truckload carriers. 

9.  Tax  incentives  should  be  pursued  as  a  means  to  facilitate  adoption  of  EOBR 

Explanation:  There  should  be  tax  incentives  (e.g.,  credits)  in  Federal  legislation 
to  encourage  carrier  investment  in  EOBRs  and  to  off-set  the  cost  of  purchasing 
EOBR devices and associated support systems. 

Tax  credits  would  serve  to  encourage  motor  carriers  to  invest  in  EOBR  systems. 

systems. 

Costs Associated with Implementation of EOBRs 4 

ATTACHMENT C 

• Airtime  for  transmission  of  data  and  retrieval  of  records  (or  data  cartridge  ex-

traction and transfer). 

• Technical demands that EOBR usage places on drivers. 
• Training program development. 
• Driver training in EOBR usage. 
• Training for manual HOS log entry in the event of EOBR malfunction. 
• Back office manpower and training in EOBR system usage. 
• Training of field enforcement officers in relative aspects of EOBR device(s) and 

• Computer capabilities and redundancy. 
• External report generation. 
• Inspection, maintenance and repairs and required recordkeeping. 
• Calibration of devices. 
• Potential truck downtime. 
• Future hardware and software upgrades and future replacements. 
• Costs  for  some  fleets  of  moving  from  existing  systems  to  new  systems  meeting 

the requirement (i.e., stranded investments). 

system(s). 

4 Costs were identified by ATA’s membership and included in written submissions to FMCSA 
in  response  to  the  Advanced  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  on  Electronic  On-Board  Recorders 
for  Hours-of-Service  Compliance,  Docket  No.  FMCSA–2004–18940,  American  Trucking  Associa-
tions,  Inc.,  November  30,  2004  and  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  on  Electronic  On-Board  Re-
corders  for  Hours-of-Service  Compliance,  Docket  No.  FMCSA2004–18940,  American  Trucking 
Associations, Inc., April 18, 2007. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

49 

ATTACHMENT D 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
e
s
e
r
1
0
5

i

50 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Thank you very much. 
Mr. Olson, we’d be pleased to hear from you. 

STATEMENT OF RICHARD G. OLSON, CEO, 

FIL-MOR EXPRESS, INC. 

Mr.  OLSON.  Thank  you.  My  name  is  Richard  Olson.  I  own  FIL- 

MOR Express, in Cannon Falls, Minnesota. 

We’ve got—our good Senator from Minnesota here—we have 174 
tractors and 234 drivers. We voluntarily installed a logging system 
in our trucks. We studied the system, starting back in July of 2005. 
We  bought—the  first  company  that  we  investigated,  we  bought 
their  system,  and  ran  it  for  about  5  months,  and  my  colleague 
Michelle,  who  is  very  astute  at  the  IT  side  of  this  business,  re-
searched  all  of  the  vendors  that  we  could  find,  and  we  saw  many 
of them going wanting. 

We  discovered  a  small  company  in  Salt  Lake  City.  The  name  is 
DriverTech,  which  is  not  a  household  word  for  anybody  in  this 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
e
s
e
r
1
0
5

i

51 

room, I don’t think. We’ll show you some things that, I think, could 
halfway  amaze  you.  We  voluntarily  put  these  in  our  trucks.  We 
started  them  about  a  year  and  a  half  ago.  We  ran  them  with  dual 
logs, with paper logs and with the device that we’re currently oper-
ating.  January  1  of  this  year,  we  went  full-blown  with  all  of  our 
trucks,  and  we’re  100  percent  active  with  the—I  call  them 
paperless  logs,  electronic  logs.  And  our  results  have  been  out-
standing. 

And  what  we’ve  seen,  in  all  of  the  carriers  that  we’ve  talked  to, 
big  and  small,  that  calls  her  on  a  regular  basis  and  say,  ‘‘How  do 
you  do  that?’’  And  she  tells  them.  Or  they  want  to  know  how  we 
can get the kind of success that we’ve had. 

In  the  last  2  weeks,  we’ve  had  zero  violations  with  all  of  our 
trucks.  We’ve  had  26  violations,  total,  since  the  first  of  the  year; 
many  of  those,  for  a  minute  and  22  seconds,  4  minutes,  2  minutes 
and  16  seconds.  You  can’t  draw  a  line  on  a  paper  log  today  to  re-
flect that kind of a difference. 

Having said that, we’ll show you how we do it. 
By  the  way,  we  have  a  electronic  presentation  that  we’ve  been 
doing with the state patrols around the country and with the local 
DOT  representatives,  and  Michelle  will  do  a  second  presentation 
with  the  Minnesota  State  Patrol  on  May  9th  to  do  an  in-service 
with all the State Troopers. 

They’re  enthused  with  what  they  see.  They  are  impressed  with 
the  accuracy.  And  the  accuracy  is  there,  and  it  comes  from  what 
you  see  in  front  of  you.  We’ve  got  a  computer—the  same  kind  of 
a  computer  that  you  may  have  on  your  office  desk  today  to  start 
with,  it’s  Windows  XP,  400  gigabytes  on  the  hard  drive,  256  of 
RAM, 1 gigahertz processor, and there are 15 ports. And we’ll show 
you exactly what the device looks like. 

But in our presentation with the state patrols and the DOT—our 
regulators, that we’re dealing with, when we show them what this 
will do, they see this kind of a device—the three ports that you see 
on  that  picture,  run  three  cameras.  And  we  do.  We  can  shine  a 
camera down the right side of the truck in the so-called blind spot 
that  everybody  deals  with.  I  have  a  major  beer  customer  that  told 
us  that  we  were  having  trouble  with  shifting  loads,  and  we  loaded 
our little camera in the front end, closed the doors. It was infrared 
technology.  There’s  a  little  thing  called  a  ‘‘graph,’’  that  measured 
the  shake  of  the  trailer  forward,  back,  up  and  down,  and  then  we 
coordinated  it  with  this,  and  pinged  the  truck  every  3  minutes,  so 
we  knew  exactly  when  that  load  shifted,  or  didn’t.  We  knew  the 
exact  location.  And  this  technology,  as  Dr.  McCartt  said  earlier, 
this  is  a  day  in  the  United  States  that  we’ve  got  this  kind  of  tech-
nology,  whether  it’s  iPods  or  whatever,  and  we’re  carrying  this 
around in our truck. I’ll show you, in a few minutes, it’s not expen-
sive. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. How much? 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  OLSON.  I’ll  show  you,  in  just  a  moment.  I’m  sorry,  Senator. 

I’ve got a chart that shows how we arrive at that. 

In  addition  to  the  cameras,  we  can  run  ports  that  measure  the 
pressure and temperature of the tires going down the road at each 
wheel  position.  This  is  better  than  iPods,  by  the  way.  The  rubber 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

52 

that you see on the road, you have lower inflation in the tires, you 
have  poorer  fuel  economy,  you  possibly  can  prevent  an  accident, 
you can clearly stop the tire from going flat on the road. That data, 
when  it  reads  on  the  screen  with  the  driver,  gets  transmitted  into 
our  dispatch  office  and  to  our  shop,  and  technically  we  could  see 
the truck pull into a filling station or a truckstop and we could see 
the  inflation  on  that  tire  going  up.  This  is  what  we  can  do  today. 
Everybody  knows  what  Wal-Mart  is  doing  with  devices  that 
measure  inventory,  RFID.  We’ve  got  this  tag,  that’s  now  being  in-
stalled—we’ve got 20 of them that are on the truck. We’ve done the 
programming,  and  we’ve  got  the  antenna  coming  out  of  our  box 
that you saw earlier. And this will have the trailer number loaded 
on  this  RFID  in  the  front  of  the  trailer  It  will  download  the  data, 
the  trailer  number,  to  the  driver’s  log,  which  is  required;  it’ll 
download  into  dispatch  and  show  which  trailer  the  driver  has.  If 
he was told to pick up trailer number 4000, and he backs into trail-
er  number  5000,  it  says,  ‘‘You’ve  got  the  wrong  trailer.’’  Now,  I’ve 
told this story to many of our friends in the trucking industry that 
are trying to see how this thing works, and I say, ‘‘There isn’t any-
body  in  the  industry  who  hasn’t  shipped  a  trailer  to  New  York 
when  it’s  supposed  to  be  in  Los  Angeles.’’  And  everybody  laughs. 
And  the—one  large  company  said,  ‘‘Yes,  and  the  one  in  New  York 
is  empty.’’  I  mean,  the  reason  it’s  funny  is,  it  happens.  And  here 
is  the  technology,  right  here,  that  can  help  prevent  those  kind  of 
things. 

This—go ahead—— 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Thank  you.  Can  you  wrap  up  with  that 

next poster? 

Mr. OLSON. Wow. Yes. We can also do seatbelt monitoring. 
Did I go over the 5 minutes already? I’m sorry, I wasn’t—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Well, time flies when you’re having fun. 
Mr. OLSON. Yes. Yes, it does. 
[Laughter.] 
Mr.  OLSON.  We’ve  got  a  potential  of  doing  seatbelt  monitoring. 
The Federal law says that a truck driver has to be wearing a seat-
belt. The officers that we talk with on a regular basis say the seat-
belt  monitor—or  the  seatbelt  use  is  a  big  factor  in  safety.  If  we 
can’t  convince  the  driver  that  he—after  he  gets  the  sensor,  we 
could  put  a  camera  on  him.  Now,  we  don’t  want  to  do  that.  But 
we’ve got the ability to do and see those kinds of things. 

First of all, we’re very happy with what’s going on with this. We 
think  this  is  important,  because  we  don’t  think  anybody  in  this 
room has seen this kind of technology out there. We took the posi-
tion, when we put this together with DriverTech—and I heard peo-
ple talk about that, earlier, in this room today—that the issue was, 
how  do  you  stop  a  violation  from  happening?  And  that’s  exactly 
what  we  built  into  our  system.  Everybody  that  came  to  us  says, 
‘‘We’ll give you a list of your violations the next day.’’ I don’t want 
a list of violations, I want the help built into this system that tells 
the  driver  that  he’s  got  to  stop  in  an  hour,  he’s  got  to  stop  in  30 
minutes.  If  he  logs  in  too  early  on  his  10  hour  rest,  it  tells  him, 
‘‘Don’t  log  in.  Don’t  start  the  truck,’’  et  cetera,  et  cetera.  So,  we’ve 
started with that kind of a premise. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Olson follows:] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

PREPARED STATEMENT OF RICHARD G. OLSON, CEO, FIL-MOR EXPRESS, INC. 

53 

This  is  FIL-MOR  Express  Inc.’s  follow  up  statement  from  the  May  1,  2007  Hear-
ing on Electronic On-Board Recorders and Truck Driver Fatigue. Because of the rel-
atively  short  presentation,  the  Committee  suggested  I  finish  my  testimony  with 
written comments. 

FIL-MOR Express is a voluntary user of EOBR’s for our entire fleet since January 
2007.  Our  experience  developing  our  current  system  since  July  2005  has  shown  us 
that there is a great deal of misunderstanding by many parties including regulators, 
motor carriers both big and small, enforcement and perhaps legislators. 

Our  experience  developing  our  plan  for  the  recorders  has  brought  us  in  contact 
with  the  various  groups  listed  above,  and  our  testimony  hopefully  will  shed  some 
light on this very important safety subject. 

There are four general areas I will speak to: 

a. mandatory policy 
b. incentives 
c. substantial and reliable devices 
d. statutory protection of data 

The  current  proposal  relies  on  a  voluntary  implementation  coupled  with  vigorous 
enforcement for a limited population with enforcement issues. This direction is pen-
alty driven for a small group of carriers with no incentives for large scale participa-
tion. Presented as a mandate more electronic manufacturers would participate, lead-
ing to greater quality and technical equipment at a lower cost. 

Clearly  one  of  the  major  misunderstandings  by  all  is  the  cost  or  return  of  these 
devices  for  the  carrier.  Our  experience  has  shown  costs  reductions  in  transmission 
costs  alone  of  $11,000.00  per  month.  In  addition  we’ve  eliminated  one  position  for 
a  total  of  $182,000  per  year  or  an  18  month  payback  for  those  two  cost  areas.  The 
precise  data  we  now  have  has  allowed  us  to  reconfigure  our  routes  and  relay  loca-
tions to more than pay for our recorders in the first year. 

With  an  incentive  program  for  tax  relief  in  the  form  of  tax  credits  or  accelerated 
depreciation  coupled  with  true  incentives  such  electronic  matching  of  documents 
would help carriers bridge the original investment gap. We did this on our own vol-
untarily.  It  was  one  of  the  best  decisions  we’ve  made!  Clearly  others  would  move 
more quickly if mandated and incentives drove the proposal. 

An  additional  misunderstanding  and  incentive  is  the  accuracy  and  control  of  the 
EBOR—that’s good news! However, any voluntary user is at a distinct disadvantage 
to  the  paper  log  user.  The  first  41⁄2 months  of  2007  FIL-MOR  had  32  violations  for 
all drivers. Sixty percent were under 5 minutes. None of these violations would have 
shown up with a paper log. 

Interruptions during the 10 hour reset to move a trailer at a customer, truckstop, 
or  rest  area  is  recorded  electronically,  but  not  on  paper.  Fuel  stops  with  paper  are 
averaged  at  15  minutes.  Spotting  a  trailer  at  a  customer,  or  multiple  deliveries  in 
one  city  get  logged  differently  today.  Carriers  need  a  variance  of  some  type  to  pro-
vide for these experiences. We end up majoring in minors and lose site of the overall 
benefits of the EOBR. 

Further  discussion  and  comments  between  carriers  and  regulators  need  develop-

ment as we learn from the accuracy of these devices as compared to paper logs. 

Another  major  misunderstanding  is  the  adequacy  of  existing  technology.  We  re-
searched  the  available  equipment  in  the  market  and  found  the  specifications  of 
395.16  could  not  be  met.  However,  through  our  due  diligence  we  found  DriverTech 
in Salt Lake City with the basic technology and skills to program 395.15 and 395.16. 
This equipment is substantial and I’m confident it will meet the requirements of the 
current  proposal.  On  the  other  hand  there  are  a  number  of  devices  on  the  market 
that do not perform in an adequate way. 

The  final  rules  must  spell  out  specific  performance  specifications  for  the  EOBR. 
Finally  a  mandated  proposal  must  provide  statutory  protection  of  the  data.  A 
mandated  proposal  coupled  with  incentives  and  data  protection  will  alleviate  the 
majority of carrier concerns and take advantage of this huge safety opportunity! 

FIL-MOR  Express  has  been  working  with  a  small  coalition  of  carriers  that  share 
our views on highway safety. In each instance these carriers are far more advanced 
than  our  company  on  this  subject.  They  have  agreed  to  share  their  views  with  you 
through  this  statement.  This  small  group  represents  a  substantial  number  of  trac-
tors and drivers, and shows the deep interest shared by motor carrier fleets for the 
broad support of the EOBR. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

54 

ATTACHMENT A 

FIL-MOR EXPRESS, INC. 

Cannon Falls, MN. 

Hon. JOHN HILL, 
Administrator, 
Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administration, 
Washington, DC. 

Docket No. FMCSA–2004–18940; Electronic On-Board Recorders for Hours-of- 
Service Compliance; Proposed Rule—RIN–2126–AA89 

Dear Mr. Hill: 

My  name  is  Richard  Olson,  I  am  CEO  of  Fil-Mor  Express,  Cannon  Falls,  Min-
nesota. We operate 174 tractors, 550 trailers, with 234 drivers. We’ve been in busi-
ness  about  25  years.  July  2005,  we  researched  the  market  and  looked  at  the  major 
players  offering  EOBRs  and  did  not  find  anyone  immediately  that  met  Federal  re-
quirements. 

In  January  2006,  we  learned  of  a  company  that  was  in  the  development  stage 
with  adequate  controls  and  the  precision  to  meet  our  requirements.  We  learned  we 
had  to  work  closely  with  them  since  they  were  an  electronic  company  and  did  not 
understand  fully  all  of  the  hours-of-service  requirements.  We  purchased  their  sys-
tem  in  April  of  2006  and  worked  closely  with  their  programming  and  mechanical 
people  through  October  of  2006  when  we  installed  174  units  in  all  of  our  trucks. 
A  substantial  portion  of  the  programming  was  completed.  In  January  2007,  after 
running a dual operation of paper logs and electronic logs, we went ‘‘paperless’’ with 
the system on January 1, 2007. This was one of the best decisions our company has 
made. 

The  cost  to  own  and  operate  this  EOBR  is  outstanding  with  a  payback  of  about 
12 months as currently configured. Added operational and monitoring systems such 
as  tire  pressure  and  temperature  monitoring  by  each  wheel  position  is  now  in  test. 
The cost of safety benefits has not yet been determined but we’re expecting fuel and 
tire  cost  improvements  as  well  as  safety  improvements.  The  technology  to  monitor 
seat  belt  compliance  is  a  sensor  and  program  away.  One  person  buckled  in  and 
saved is worth it, just ask any law enforcement officer. 

Here are our comments regarding the NPRM Mandatory Compliance: 
1. All EOBRs should be mandatory for all carriers regardless of size. The present 
positioning  of  the  rule  targets  a  limited  number  of  vehicles  which  will  have  a  min-
imum  impact  on  safety  and  no  real  incentives  for  voluntary  participation.  We  vol-
untary  participated  with  no  second  thoughts.  Positioned  properly,  this  is  a  very 
large idea to bring together a safety coalition of motor carrier industry participants 
and  Washington  safety  proponents.  This  would  be  a  strong  and  unusual  coalition 
with congressional backing. 

2. Equipment Specifications—FMCSA approved EOBRs should be substantial with 
total  accuracy,  tamper  proof,  and  tethered.  Specifications  should  also  be  mandated 
by FMCSA. 

3.  Mileage  Exemptions—Docket  No.  FMCSA–2003–15818  provides  an  exemption 
renewal for a 2 mile exemption. ‘‘The FMCSA believes that with the terms and con-
ditions  in  place,  llll  will  maintain  a  level  of  safety  that  is  equivalent  to  or 
greater  than,  the  level  of  safety  that  would  be  obtained  by  complying  with  the  re-
quirements for written RODS’’. 

4.  We  concur  with  the  mileage  exemption!  Our  operating  experience  with  the 
EOBR  has  given  us  insight  into  the  total  accuracy  of  a  solidly  designed  and  built 
recorder. Here’s what we’ve experienced: 

A. The miles are recorded from the ABS system which flows through the engine 
ECM. When the wheels turn, driving is recorded. It’s tamper proof with no way 
for a driver to change it. It works! 
B. A fuel stop moves to On Duty, Not Driving and actual fuel time is recorded— 
not  the  15  minutes  paper  log  entries  show.  It  may  be  6  minutes,  8  minutes,  or 
12 minutes. 
C.  If  a  driver  is  parked  at  a  shipper  or  receiver  on  a  10  hour  break,  and  the 
customer asks the driver at anytime to back the vehicle into the dock, the move-
ment  is  detected,  miles  are  recorded,  and  the  driver  with  an  accurate  EOBR  is 
in violation while a driver with a paper log at the next dock door backs in and 
logs  nothing.  This  is  a  competitive  disadvantage  for  a  voluntary  EOBR  user.  It 
happens! 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

55 

D.  The  same  situation  develops  at  truck  stops  or  rest  areas  if  the  driver  is 
asked or told to move. Is our driver less safe? 
E.  When  a  driver  enters  a  receiver’s  yard  and  must  move  3  or  4  limited  times 
to  position  a  trailer  in  a  lot  or  at  a  door,  the  grid  becomes  a  1/8″  thick  line  on 
the  recorder  and  the  miles  are  recorded  on  the  EOBR.  Who  knows  what  the 
paper logs show? 

The point is the EOBR is so accurate as compared to the paper log that the EOBR 
user  is  at  a  competitive  disadvantage  to  a  paper  log  where  in  fact  an  exemption 
should  be  provided  so  as  an  incentive  for  voluntary  use.  We  feel  strongly  that  a  1 
percent  total  driving  mileage  exemption  should  apply.  As  an  example,  a  550  mile 
driving  day  with  the  exemption  would  be  5.5  miles  which  would  equalize  paper  log 
differentials and serve as an incentive. 

Other  incentives  should  include  accelerated  deprecation  or  tax  credits  for  further 
encouragement  of  use.  I  recognize  the  IRS  would  have  to  be  involved  with  those 
types of incentives but the dialogue should begin. 

I read over 500 comments to the NPRM and the various studies in your preamble. 
After  operating  our  outstanding  EOBR  with  the  results  I’ve  seen,  I’m  convinced 
there is a lack of factual understanding of cost, opportunities, and accuracy of a well 
developed EOBR. It’s the best decision we’ve made and I encourage you to move this 
enormous opportunity ahead for better safety. 

Sincerely, 

RICHARD G. OLSON, 

CEO. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  your  testimony  is  compelling,  and  I 
wish  we  had  more  time.  Unfortunately,  it  would  be  unfair  to  the 
others  and  to  my  colleague  Senator  Klobuchar,  who  we’re  very 
proud  of.  She’s  a  new  member  of  the  U.S.  Senate.  Also,  like  you, 
Mr.  Olson,  she  has  lifted  the  spirits  of  the  environment  that  she’s 
in, and we’re pleased to see her here, and would turn the program 
over to you. 

STATEMENT OF HON. AMY KLOBUCHAR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM MINNESOTA 

Senator  KLOBUCHAR.  Well,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman 

and all of you. Welcome to the Committee. 

I’m  going  to  preside  over  the  Senate,  which  is  always  an  honor, 
and  so,  I’m  not  going  to  be  able  to  ask  questions  here.  But  I  just 
wanted to thank all of you for coming. 

And  I  wanted  to  thank  you,  Mr.  Olson.  You  would  be  glad  to 
know  that  another  Minnesotan,  Garrison  Keillor,  was  here  today, 
and,  as  you  talked,  I  thought  of  his  words,  ‘‘Minnesota,  where  the 
women  are  strong,  the  men  are  good  looking,  and  all  the  children 
are  above  average.’’  You  are  clearly  above  average,  Mr.  Olson,  and 
I want to thank you for the good work that you’re doing. 

Sadly,  I  was  reading  about  the  case,  this  morning,  on  the  com-
puter,  out  in  Minnesota,  where  the  truck  driver’s  truck  had  over-
turned and hit a bus containing members of the Chippewa band in 
Wisconsin, five of them were killed. The case went to trial. He was 
acquitted.  I  don’t  know  the  details  of  the  case  or  what  was  right 
or  wrong,  but  I  know  one  of  the  allegations  was  that  he  may  have 
been  tired.  And  I  wanted  to  thank  you  for  being  so  proactive.  And 
certainly,  there  must  be  a  way  to  take  the  work  that  you’ve  done 
here and to look at how we can bring these kind of safety measures 
throughout the industry. 

And  I  will  tell  you,  also,  there  have  been  some  small-business 
truckers  that  have  called  our  office,  concerned.  And  I  guess  my 
opening  question  I’d  ask  of  the  panel  before  I  have  to  leave  here 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

56 

is  how  you  think  that  we  could  fashion  this  in  a  way  that  would 
take  account  for  the  concerns  of  some  of  the  small  business  truck-
ers. Any thoughts on that? 

Mr. GABBARD. I would suggest that a minimally compliant device 
that’s  been  suggested  in  our  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  com-
ments  and—is  a  way  to  address  this.  For  a  trucker,  a  dollar  spent 
has  to  be  a  dollar  of  income  in  the  truck,  so  they’re  very  cost-con-
scious  about  investing  in  their  livelihood.  And  if  you  could  put  a 
cost-effective,  minimally  compliant  hours-of-service  recording  de-
vice  in  their  truck,  it  reduces  the  time  that  it  takes  to  fill  out  the 
paper log document. His time can be better spent driving the vehi-
cle rather than filling out a paper log. So, it’s a cost-effective alter-
native. 

And if the rule is properly deployed, it also will potentially elimi-
nate  the  supporting  documents,  which  is  a  big  cost  of  doing  busi-
ness for a trucker. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And then, Mr. Olson, how much did you say 

this costs per truck? 

Mr.  OLSON.  It  was  around  a  quarter  of  a  million  dollars,  the 
original purchase. It’s—we started it in the first of January of this 
year—it’s completely paid for itself. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. And how has it paid for itself? 
Mr. OLSON. Pardon me? 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. How has it paid for itself? 
Mr. OLSON. Yes. 
Senator KLOBUCHAR. How has it paid—— 
Mr. OLSON. The—first of all, the transmission time in the system 
that  we  had  before  was  a  satellite  transmission,  and  the 
DriverTech—my  cost  per  month  went  from  $14,500  a  month  to 
$3,500.  Big  amount  of  money.  It  saved  one  labor  position,  because 
somebody  wasn’t  sorting  through  paper  logs  all  day  long.  And  the 
analysis  that  we  can  now  do  as  to  what  our  routes  look  like,  I— 
it was a large amount of money, I’ll put it that way. It was greater 
than we spent—and this just happened in the last 10 days. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much. 
Mr. REISER. Senator, if I could address your first question, there, 
that  you  asked  of  the  panel,  just  briefly,  I  think  one  thing  that 
would  help  in  getting  the  small  truckers  interested  in  the  tech-
nology and using it is if they were—if they could see, and were con-
vinced,  that  there  is  a  true  safety  benefit,  in  terms  of  accident  re-
duction  from  using  the  technology.  I  think  there’s  a  great  deal  of 
apprehension  and  skepticism  that  rigid  adherence  to  the  hours-of- 
service  will  result  in  reduced  accidents  on  the  highway.  And  I 
think if they were convinced of that, they would be much more will-
ing to move towards that technology. 

Senator KLOBUCHAR. Thank you very much. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Senator Klobuchar, for being with 
us. Mr. Olson, we appreciate your views considering you have a rel-
atively  small  company  but,  in  terms  of  equipment,  et  cetera,  it’s  a 
pretty  good-sized  operation.  And  we  admire  the  fact  that  you  got 
into  this  thing  with  so  much  gusto,  if  I  can  call  it  that.  And  the 
results that you talk about are very comforting. 

Now,  compared  to  Mr.  Reiser’s  company  experience,  in  which  I’d 
say,  Mr.  Reiser,  if  I  understood  your  testimony  correctly,  you  were 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

57 

not  very  excited  about  the  results  obtained.  Am  I  correct  in  that 
assessment? 

Mr. REISER. No—— 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Because  I  didn’t  hear  you  say—I  thought 
you  said  very  little  by  way  of  safety  evidence,  very  little  by—very 
little  advantage  here,  there,  and  everywhere.  And  I  wonder  what 
the difference is. 

Mr. REISER. Senator, that—actually, my comment was limited to 
seeing a direct result in accident reduction as a result of using the 
technology.  We  have  achieved  a—an  excellent  driver  out-of-service 
number.  Our  number,  on  a  percentage  basis,  runs  about  1.5  per-
cent.  The  national  average  is  6.8  percent.  So,  in  terms  of  compli-
ance,  which  is,  you  know,  a  significant  factor  to  our  business,  we 
are  very  compliant  with  the  hours-of-service  rule.  So,  that’s  cer-
tainly  a  benefit  to  us.  If  we  get  a  compliance  review,  our  drivers 
are  doing  a  good  job.  It’s  also,  I  think,  a  benefit  to  us  that  we  are 
controlling the hours-of-service from the standpoint of accident liti-
gation.  That’s  a  positive  for  us,  that  we  don’t  have  the  situation 
where  some  companies  find  themselves  with  a  driver  who  is  seri-
ously  over  on  the  hours-driving  time,  at  the  time  of  the  accident, 
because  we’re  doing  a  better  job—we’re  able  to  control  that  on  the 
front end. So, we do see some benefits. 

But  my—the  distinction  I  guess  I’m  trying  to  make  is  we  have 
not been able to say, ‘‘Because we put this in, we are seeing a bet-
ter accident rate than we were before.’’ 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  So,  essentially,  you’re  saying  that  fatigue, 
et cetera, hours-of-service, as far as you can see, it doesn’t improve 
safety  records.  So,  should  we  discard  all  this  and  say,  ‘‘Look,  it 
doesn’t matter’’? I mean, if compliance is your mission, that’s a dif-
ferent goal than I would have imagined, because obeying the rules 
is usually good for your health and well-being. 

Mr. Olson, we learned a very sad lesson in the State of New Jer-
sey a couple of weeks ago, when my dear friend, and our Governor, 
was  in  a  very  serious  accident,  and  he  wasn’t  wearing  his  seatbelt 
and was seriously injured as a result. So, we put the two together, 
anyway and—— 

So, Dr. McCartt, what do you think of the little dialogue that we 

just had here? 

Dr. MCCARTT. Well, I think one—first of all, I would say that—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Push your button, please. 
Dr.  MCCARTT.  First  of  all,  I  would  agree  with  comments  several 
people  have  made.  It’s  very  difficult  to  determine  whether  or  not 
a  particular  crash  involved  fatigue.  And  I  think  a  problem  with 
looking  at  on-board  recorders  and  seeing  a  difference  in  crashes  is 
that,  as  you’ve  heard  today,  the  carriers  who  are  using  these  de-
vices  tend  to  have  good  safety  records  already.  And  so,  you  know, 
it’s—if  they’re  already  obeying  the  rules,  and  already  have  low 
crash  rates,  then  it  may  be  the  case  that  on-board  recorders  won’t 
make a significant difference. 

But  I  guess  the  other  thing  I  would  say  is  that  the  purpose  of 
on-board recorders is to have people follow the work rules. And it’s 
the  Institute’s  belief,  and  many  others’  belief  that  the  work  rules 
already allow very arduous schedules. And we can argue about the 
percentage  of  crashes  due  to  fatigue,  but  I  don’t  think  there’s  any 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

58 

debate  about  the  fact  that  fatigue  in  truck  crashes  is  a  significant 
factor.  And  so,  we’ve  developed  these  work  rules  to  try  to  address 
fatigue.  And  the  purpose  of  recorders,  again,  is  to  achieve  compli-
ance  with  that.  So,  I  don’t  think  the  burden  of  proof  really  should 
be  that  the  recorders  reduce  crashes,  per  se,  because  we  know 
there’s  fatigue,  we  know  that  the  work  rules  already,  even  if 
they’re followed legally, are very arduous. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Mr. Gabbard, what do you think? 
Mr.  GABBARD.  I  would  like  to  add  a  comment  that  the  system 
that  Mr.  Olson  is  talking  about—and,  I  believe,  the  systems  that 
Mr.  Reiser  is  running  in  his  fleet—are  a  somewhat  more  com-
plicated and much more extensive system than a minimally compli-
ant  EOBR  device  would  be.  An  hours-of-service  recording  device  is 
intended  to  record  time  and  distance  and  location.  It’s  not  dealing 
with some of the other functions that could be put into a fleet man-
agement  system,  because  there  is  still  a  lot  of  confusion  about  a 
fleet  management  system  and  a  minimally  compliant  electronic 
hours-of-service recording device. They’re two different beasts. 

A minimally compliant device has to be—in order to be effective, 
it  has  to  be  standardized.  The  systems  that  we’re  talking  about— 
and  you  can  just—and  Mr.  Olson’s  system,  which  is  quite  extrava-
gant  and  extensive  in  its  functionality—is  beyond  what  a  mini-
mally compliant hours-of-service recording device is perceived to be. 
I’m not saying that those benefits are not good, because they’re out-
standing. He’s making a significant contribution to road safety and 
driver safety. But he’s somewhat unique in that characteristic. 

But I would say there is a minimally compliant, simple device to 
replace paper logbooks and to get a tamperproof system in place to 
eliminate the paper logbooks that are sometimes referred to in the 
industry as comic books. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. I think that the most important thing with 
compliance  is  to  improve  safety,  it’s  not  simply  to  regulate  behav-
ior.  It’s  to  regulate  behavior—for  what  reason?  And  the  reason  is 
to make the roads safer. And so, whether it’s as elaborate a system 
as  you  suggest—that  Mr.  Olson  says,  or  the  one  that’s  simpler, 
plainer, that you have, the fact is that whatever brings about com-
pliance  can’t  help  but  bring  around  improved  safety,  reduce  risks 
for those on the highway. We’re stunned when we hear about rear- 
ending a car, as we had in New Jersey, a little SUV, a woman and 
two children, and a truck came down the hill, the driver not paying 
attention, for whatever reason, just killed the three of them. These 
are such painful things to observe. And when you take these behe-
moths, these big trucks, 10,000 pounds and over, coming down and 
not  being  sure  that  the  driver  of  the  vehicle  is  in  good  shape  a  la 
hours  of  work,  not  extended  beyond  one’s  ability  to  think  clearly— 
look  at  what  happens  with  pilots.  I  mean,  they  don’t  want  pilots 
up there, because they know that there is a fatigue factor that en-
ters in with too much time spent at the stick, I’ll say. 

And,  in  terms  of  tamperproof,  I  was  just  in  a  visit  out-of-state, 
and I was introduced to an operation that had 400 employees. Now, 
before  I  came  to  the  Senate,  I  ran  a  company;  I  was  co-founder  of 
a  company  called  ADP,  pretty  big-sized  company  today,  and  our 
specialty was payroll. And I know that the company now processes 
payroll  for  some  35  million  people  every  pay  period.  The  figure’s 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

59 

enormous. And what I saw at this company that I visited, they had 
a  handprint  for  timecards.  Very  simple.  Put  it  down,  and  nobody 
else  could  use  that  timecard.  And  it’s  readily  available.  This  is  a 
nice-sized  company,  but  these  are  not  people  who  are  billionaires 
or whatever. And so, they bought these machines to make sure that 
the recording was easier. And if that can be so easily—an identifier 
for  people,  that  there  are  things  that  you  can  do  that  would  make 
these things fairly tamperproof. 

Dr.  McCartt,  does  the  insurance  industry  offer  lower  insurance 
rates  or  any  other  benefits  to  trucking  companies  that  use  the 
EOBR systems? 

Dr.  MCCARTT.  I  can’t  really  address  that.  Our  Institute—I  can’t 
answer  that  question.  The  Institute  does  research,  and  dissemi-
nates  the  research.  We’re  funded  by  insurers,  but  we’re  not  in-
volved in the business—their business—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Anybody else have any commentary about 

that? Insurance rates? No? 

Mr. Gabbard, you would—— 
Mr. GABBARD. I’m aware of a fleet in the United States that has 
reduced  their  insurance  rates  by  installing  a  European  version  of 
this device, which has been referred to in this testimony as a tacho-
graph.  They  have  chosen  to  go  self-insured,  because  their  results 
from running the system has proven to be extremely beneficial, ex-
cept for major liability insurance. They dropped a lot of their actu-
arial  carrier  insurance,  so  that  particular  fleet  claims  to  be  saving 
quite  a  few  dollars  in  insurance  rates,  because  he  feels  he’s  modi-
fied the behavior of this drivers. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  I  think  you  said,  earlier,  that  if  the 
systems were used more universally in the United States, that the 
prices would come down substantially. Is that correct? 

Mr. GABBARD. Yes, our assumption is, if you create a broad mar-
ket  you  can  attract  enough  competitive  electronic  manufacturers, 
such  as  ourselves,  to  the  marketplace,  that  the  law  of  supply  and 
demand  will  weigh  in,  and,  therefore,  the  price  of  the  device  will 
go down with time. As long as the people are meeting the minimal 
design  requirements  and  meeting  the  specifications  of  the  regula-
tion. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. What does the recorder that your company 

makes cost? 

Mr.  GABBARD.  Today,  because  the  market  does  not  exist  in  the 
United  States,  we  are  not  producing  a  device  nor  selling  a  device, 
because  the  market,  in  theory,  for  a  minimally  compliant  device 
really  does  not  exist.  There  is  a  market  for  fleet  management  sys-
tems, and there are a lot of very competent suppliers that are sup-
plying those to the industry. 

We would project, based upon some limited—based upon the un-
derstanding  of  what  the  rule  is  requiring  today,  which  requires 
GPS  for  location,  and  requires  wireless  messaging  capability.  That 
we would be able to sell the device in the marketplace for $450. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. And the—— 
Mr. GABBARD. That’s what we would project—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. And the cost for wireless operational—like 

that of a telephone or anything else is—— 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

60 

Mr.  GABBARD.  Yes,  that  adds  costs  to  the  system.  As  we  know 
with  our  telephone,  the  cost  of  buying  the  hardware  is  the  begin-
ning of your cost—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Sure. 
Mr.  GABBARD.—with  any  wireless  tool,  because  you’re  going  to 

pay your monthly fees—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Mr. GABBARD.—to maintain that system on the airways. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes.  Well,  once  you  buy  the  fishing  pole, 

then the cost starts going up. If you—— 

Mr. GABBARD. Unfortunately, that’s true. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  The—Mr.  Gabbard,  many  have  said  that 
that  FMCA’s  analysis  of  costs  and  benefits  of  using  electronic  on- 
board  recordings  is  flawed.  Do  you  believe  that  their  cost-benefit 
analysis for these devices under this rule is accurate? 

Mr. GABBARD. I believe the—what they’ve chosen to use as their 
foundation  is  accurate  data,  but  I  do  not  feel  that  they  have  fol-
lowed  enough  of  the  marketplace  and  really  paid  attention  to  the 
ATRI  study,  which  was  done  about  2  years  ago.  This  study  did  a 
good  cross-section  study  of  data,  of  potential  devices  that  were 
available, and, therefore, they chose to use a higher price point for 
the  function.  That  price  point  does  exist  in  the  marketplace  for  a 
fleet  management  system,  but  the  price  point  that’s  used  in  that 
analysis is not a minimally compliant hours-of-service recording de-
vice.  We  are  confusing  two  basic  tools,  a  fleet  management  system 
and  an  hours-of-service  recording  device,  or,  as  this  industry  is  re-
ferring to it, as an EOBR. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  thank  all  of  you  for  your  testimony. 
You’ve  been  very  helpful,  to  me  anyway,  and,  I  think,  to  the  Sub-
committee  and  to  the  Committee,  in  terms  of  focusing  in  on  this 
problem,  because  the  problem  certainly  exists,  whether  the  system 
to  put  a  check  on  it,  to  reduce  these  horrible  accidents  that  do 
occur,  when  there  are  5,000  of  them  in  a  year,  that’s  far,  far  too 
many  than  what  we  should  have  to  deal  with.  So,  we  thank  you 
all. 

And, with that, this Subcommittee hearing is concluded. 
[Whereupon, at 4:20 p.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF JOE RAJKOVACZ, MEMBER, BOARD OF DIRECTORS, 

OWNER-OPERATOR INDEPENDENT DRIVERS ASSOCIATION 

EXECUTIVE SUMMARY 

EOBRs  Are  No  Better  Than  Paper  Logs  for  Ensuring  Hours-of-Service 

(HOS) Compliance 

The  hours-of-service  rules  require  a  record  to  be  kept  of  both  driving  time  and 
all  non-driving  work  activity  (waiting  to  load  and  unload,  inspecting/repairing  the 
truck,  performing  the  loading  and  unloading,  looking  for  the  next  load,  receiving  a 
dispatch, doing paperwork, performing compensated work at another job, etc.) Even 
though  an  EOBR  can  record  how  long  someone  has  operated  a  truck,  if  the  driver 
does  not  manually  enter  his  non-driving  work  time  into  the  EOBR,  the  EOBR  will 
show  the  driver  as  available  to  drive  when  he  is  not  under  the  HOS  rules!  In  fact, 
EOBRs  will  still  permit  someone  performing  compensated  work  for  a  person  other 
than the motor carrier to drive, without showing a violation. 
EOBRs Do Not Address the Cause of Driver Fatigue: Economic Pressure 

Drivers do not always know in advance how much uncompensated time a shipper 
or  receiver  will  demand  of  them.  Nor  do  drivers  always  know  whether  they  will  be 
expected  to  do  the  physical  work  of  loading  or  unloading  their  truck  or  whether 
there  will  be  proper  equipment  to  do  the  job.  Many  drivers  are  forced  to  spend  be-
tween 18 and 44 hours per week at the loading docks. How can drivers facing such 
wild  cards  be  expected  to  plan  their  work/rest  schedule  and  manage  their  fatigue? 
The  majority  of  drivers  are  paid  either  a  flat  amount  per  load-hauled,  a  percent-
age  of  freight  charges  or  per  mile-driven.  Working  under  such  an  unpredictable 
schedule,  some  drivers  must  minimize  the  recording  of  their  non-driving  work  in 
order  to  drive  enough  to  make  a  basic  living.  EOBRs  will  do  nothing  to  address 
these  problems.  And  as  described  above,  they  will  permit  drivers  to  manage  this 
problem  as  they  always  have—not  logging  all  of  their  on-duty,  not-driving  time.  If, 
on the other hand, driver compensation were correlated to both the amount of driv-
ing and the amount of non-driving work performed, not only would the incentive to 
maximize  driving  time  be  eliminated,  but  drivers  would  have  a  powerful  incentive 
to log every hour of non-driving work required of him or her. 
EOBRs Can Be Used To Exacerbate Driver Fatigue 

As FMCSA touted in its proposed rule, EOBRs will permit motor carriers to mon-
itor, in real-time, the location and duty-status of their drivers. Carriers will be able 
to  notice  whenever  a  driver  has  stopped  the  truck  during  their  on-duty  time.  Per-
haps  the  driver  has  decided  to  take  a  break  and  get  rest.  Such  breaks  do  not  sus-
pend  the  running  of  the  14  hour  work-day  under  the  HOS  rules.  The  carrier  will 
be  able  to  instantly  instruct  the  driver  to  return  to  the  road  and  maximize  his  or 
her driving time. Carriers will also be able to instruct drivers, whenever they want, 
to  log  their  on-duty,  not-driving  work  as  off-duty,  thereby  preserving  their  on-duty 
driving  time.  Both  practices  remove  what  little  discretion  drivers  have  today  to  re-
sist the economic pressure discussed above. 
Mandating EOBRs Would Be an Unconstitutional Invasion of Privacy 

Truck drivers are widely offended by the invasion of privacy presented by 24 hour 
a  day  electronic  monitoring  by  EOBRs  of,  for  many,  their  home  away  from  home. 
The  use  of  EOBRs  would  be  a  warrantless  search  prohibited  by  the  U.S.  Constitu-
tion. An EOBR mandate for HOS enforcement would not pass the Supreme Court’s 
standards  for  a  search  of  a  pervasively  regulated  business  or  a  search  under  the 
special  needs  exception  in  Fourth  Amendment  jurisprudence.  Truck  drivers  feel  as 
though  EOBRs  represent  the  government’s  categorical  ‘‘sentencing’’  of  thousands  of 
persons  to  the  ‘‘wearing’’  of  electronic  ankle  bracelets  without  suspicion,  probable 
cause, due process or any finding of wrongdoing. 

(61) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

62 

OOIDA encourages lawmakers to seek solutions to motor carrier safety issues that 
are  much  less  intrusive  and  much  more  effective:  mandating  comprehensive  driver 
training,  resolving  problems  at  the  loading  docks,  revising  methods  of  driver  com-
pensation,  creating  more  flexible  hours-of-service  rules,  and  providing  adequate 
truck parking in those areas around the country where drivers who wish to rest can-
not find such parking today. 

(See ‘‘Rigs Keep On Trucking, Searching for Parking’’ the The Wall Street Journal, 

page B1, May 1, 2007) 

TESTIMONY OF JOE RAJKOVACZ 

I was an Owner-Operator for over two decades. I owned both my truck and trailer 
and lease them along with my driving services to a motor carrier. I was also a rep-
resentative  of  a  group  of  owner-operators  who  collectively  haul  a  majority  of  Amer-
ica’s  fresh  foods.  Meat,  dairy  products,  and  produce  are  primary  examples  of  what 
I  would  haul.  I  love  what  I  did.  However,  I  also  hated  what  I  did.  Unfortunately, 
this  testimony  outlines  what  it  is  I  hated  in  the  industry.  It  is  abuse  of  truckers 
at loading docks around this country and by implication, why many truckers do not 
account for time spent unloading or loading in the log books. 

I  appreciate  the  Committee  reviewing  my  testimony  and  look  forward  to  any  op-
portunity  to  interact  with  Committee  Members  and  staff  on  these  critically  impor-
tant trucking issues. I believe it would have been prudent for the Committee to first 
explore  the  substantial  and  overwhelming  problems  facing  truck  drivers  in  com-
plying with the hours-of-service rules, which I have detailed in the below testimony. 
Hopefully my testimony will shed some light on these critical issues, in light of the 
fact  that  it  appears  the  Committee  may  have  jumped  to  the  conclusion  that  Elec-
tronic On-Board Recording Devices (EOBRs) are the solution to the problems truck-
ers face. I trust that future hearings will involve the voice of the professional truck-
ers. 

Although my testimony may be anecdotal in nature, what happens to truckers has 
a profound effect on highway safety, driver health, and our country’s economy. Load-
ing  and  unloading  abuse  begins  at  the  point  of  dispatch  for  a  driver.  Often,  the 
schedules given to me were not achievable within the Federal hours-of-service regu-
lations.  Most  shippers  and  receivers  require  appointments  for  loading  and  unload-
ing.  They  tell  truckers  when  to  arrive  and  are  not  concerned  whether  a  driver  can 
do it legally. They utilize a form of hidden coercion. 

For  example,  I  may  have  been  required  to  make  an  appointment  no  earlier  than 
8 AM on a given Monday. But, they wanted me there at 2 a.m. If I said that won’t 
work,  they’d  respond  that  the  next  available  date  for  delivery  is  Wednesday—an 
extra  2  days  for  which  their  load  will  sit  on  my  truck,  but  I  receive  no  extra  com-
pensation.  Thus,  I  am  compelled  to  accept  a  time  I  knowingly  cannot  make  legally. 
Remember,  most  truckers  are  paid  by  the  mile  or  by  a  percentage  of  whatever  a 
load pays, not by the hour. 

Earlier last year, I was given a delivery schedule spanning 22.5 hours to drop part 
of  my  freight  at  six  different  locations.  After  22.5  hours,  I  was  scheduled  to  drive 
800  miles  to  the  next  morning’s  appointment.  Federal  regulation  only  allows  me  to 
be  on  duty  for  fourteen  consecutive  hours  at  which  time  I  must  take  a  10  hour 
break.  I  objected  to  the  scheduling  and  was  told  the  usual,  ‘‘do  the  best  you  can.’’ 
I  was  not  told,  ‘‘sorry  Joe,  do  it  legally.’’  Upon  leaving  my  terminal,  my  mood  was 
flustered  and  my  anxiety  level  was  high,  because  I  knew  I  was  ‘‘screwed’’  with  an 
impossible schedule. 

The  majority  of  truckers  are  very  conscientious  about  appointments.  They  know 
to  miss  an  appointment  can  yield  a  fine  by  the  shipper  or  receiver  and  being  re-
scheduled  to  another  day.  An  increasing  number  of  receivers  are  imposing  ‘‘late 
fees’’ for missed appointment times. The charge is usually $150. To wait for another 
day  would  mean  more  uncompensated  time  away  from  the  family.  That  is  a  great 
motivator  to  be  on-time  regardless  of  the  regulations.  Everyone  in  this  room  has 
been  late  for  work  at  one  time  or  another  for  reasons  beyond  your  control.  Traffic 
accidents,  bad  weather  and  vehicle  break-downs  are  primary  examples.  Your  em-
ployer may take action against you if a pattern develops. However, none of you risk 
losing  a  day’s  pay  because  you  got  caught  behind  an  accident.  Truckers  do.  The 
stress  to  make  schedules  is  immense  on  drivers.  Fines  and  rescheduled  appoint-
ments  for  days  late  are  an  unconscionable  burden  imposed  by  shippers  and  receiv-
ers. It is ironic that when I showed up on-time to deliver, for example, three pallets 
of  freight,  and  5  hours  later  I  finally  left  the  dock,  the  same  receiver  threatened 
me with ‘‘late fees’’ and refused to pay me for my wasted time. Neither the FMCSA 
nor  Congress  has  studied  this  issue  or  searched  for  solutions  in  over  twenty-five 
years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

63 

Delays in unloading cause a cascade effect where other appointments are missed. 
The  primary  cause  of  unloading  delays  is  that  time  spent  at  a  dock  does  not  rep-
resent  a  cost  to  the  receiver.  They  have  no  economic  incentive  to  use  drivers’  time 
productively.  Their  trucks  become  rolling  and  sitting  warehouses  with  the  driver 
spending  as  much  time  babysitting  the  freight  as  moving  it  from  point  to  point.  It 
is a huge inefficiency in our economy, favoring shippers and receivers. 

At  the  beginning  of  last  year,  I  made  two  deliveries  to  a  distribution  center  in 
Anniston, Alabama. The first time I was to deliver two pallets of cottage cheese and 
the  second  time  I  had  only  one  pallet,  of  all  of  the  pallets  on  my  truck.  I  was  on- 
time for both appointments. I spent 6.5 hours and 4.75 hours respectively to deliver 
that freight. That is 11.25 hours for three pallets of freight. I was not paid for that 
excessive  time  and  caused  me  to  miss  other  appointments.  How  is  this  productive 
for me or our economy? 

An  absolute  maxim  of  economic  theory  is,  ‘‘if  something  is  free,  it  will  be  used  to 
excess,  regardless  of  the  hidden  costs.’’  There  are  hidden  costs.  Drivers  do  not  ac-
count  for  those  hours  as  I  described  because  they  are  not  paid  for  them.  Because 
EOBRs  require  manual  input  from  a  driver  to  account  for  such  time,  drivers  will 
still  be  able  to  continue  to  not  log  this  time,  mostly  as  a  result  of  subtle  coercive 
pressure  from  motor  carriers,  shippers,  and  receivers.  Drivers  sacrifice  their  health 
putting in 20 hour days because of an inequitable system that quietly coerces them 
to do so. EOBRs will not affect this coercion. 

Most receivers I frequented required me to enter their property through a security 
gate. They scheduled the appointments and grouped more trucks together than they 
could  unload  during  a  given  time.  Trucks  are  usually  not  allowed  on  the  property 
until  1  hour  prior  to  an  appointment.  This  creates  bottle-necks  of  trucks  in  line  at 
the  same  time.  I  have  spent  hours,  just  creeping  forward  to  the  gate,  waiting  for 
my  turn  at  the  guard  shack,  only  to  get  there  and  be  told  I  am  late.  This  time  is 
never  logged.  The  receiver  has  no  incentive  to  use  my  time  productively,  because 
my time is free. 

When  I  finally  arrived  at  the  receiving  office  all  of  those  trucks  ahead  of  me  at 
the  gate  were  now  in  line  ahead  of  me  at  the  single  receiving  window  to  check  in. 
A  particular  receiver  in  Puyallup,  Washington,  requires  all  drivers  to  check  in  at 
2  a.m.  I  have  spent  hours  standing  in  line,  outside  in  a  cold  drizzle,  snaking  my 
way  in  line  to  the  one  receiving  window.  No  drivers  report  this  waste  of  time,  be-
cause  they  are  not  paid  for  it.  Hopefully,  once  I  checked  in  with  the  receiver  I’d  be 
given  a  dock  assignment.  Unfortunately,  because  of  over-booking  and  unproductive 
use  of  truckers  ahead  of  me,  I’d  have  to  wait  for  a  dock  to  become  available  for  1, 
2,  3,  and  8  or  more  hours.  I’ve  experienced  it  all.  I’m  on-time,  yet  I  sit.  No  driver 
accounts  for  these  delays  in  their  log  books,  and  they  won’t  be  accounted  for  on 
EOBRs. 

Finally,  I’d  back  in,  ready  to  unload  my  freight.  However,  the  receiver  would  not 
use  their  powered  equipment  to  remove  my  pallets  unless  I  paid  their  employees 
to unload their own freight. In the grocery distribution business, drivers are an easy 
target  and  a  profit  center  for  the  receiver.  Nearly  every  grocery  chain  in  America 
plays this game. Grocery distribution centers contract with unloading services driv-
ers  call  ‘‘lumpers.’’  Lumping  services  never  have  one  person  for  each  dock  maybe 
one for every five docks. 

To  keep  from  totally  running  afoul  of  the  law,  the  receiver  may  make  a  manual 
hand-jack  available  for  a  driver  to  pull  pallets  off  the  trailer  onto  their  dock.  How-
ever, they may have only one jack for twenty doors, or worse, the jack is so decrepit 
that  its  unusable.  Drivers  are  given  a  choice  without  a  distinction  and  coerced  into 
paying for unloading. 

An  average  pallet  of  freight  often  exceeds  2,000  pounds.  This  represents  a  phys-
ical impracticality for most drivers to manually remove. If a driver is lucky enough 
to  have  a  load  called  a  ‘‘straight  pull’  (the  palletized  freight  simply  needs  to  be 
pulled  from  the  trailer  and  placed  on  the  dock  and  counted)  unloading  by  manual 
pallet jack can takes hours. 

The situation is worse if a load needs to be ‘‘broken-down’’. Break-downs represent 
the  majority  of  freight  I  hauled.  I  performed  this  task  myself  or  hired  the  lumpers 
to  do  it.  An  example  of  a  break-down  is  palletized  butter  that  I  haul.  The  shipper 
stacked  it  four  boxes  high  on  the  pallet,  but  the  receiver  wanted  one  or  two  boxes 
taken  off  and  placed  on  a  separate  pallet.  If  I  could  not  do  the  break  down,  I  had 
to  pay  a  lumper  a  minimum  of  $45  for  one  pallet.  This  would  often  lead  to  a  cost 
of  hundreds  of  dollars  for  an  entire  trailer  load.  That  is  a  steep  enough  price  to 
make  me  labor  for  endless  hours  on  a  dock  to  avoid  paying  for  unloading.  Drivers 
spend many hours engaged in physical labor on docks and do not record any of that 
time against hours-of-service. It is because drivers are not paid. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

64 

It  is  the  classic  catch  22  situation.  Comply  with  Federal  regulations,  burning 
hours  for  no  compensation.  A  driver  can  hide  that  time  wasted  at  docks  so  that  a 
he has hours left for driving, where the money is made. 

Some  in  Washington  believe  that  mandating  electronic  on-board  recorders 
(EOBRs) will stop this coerced driver behavior. Supporters include those without ex-
perience  driving  a  truck,  motor  carriers  who  seek  to  use  EOBRs  to  maximize  the 
efficiency  of  their  fleet,  and  of  course,  EOBR  equipment  manufacturers.  None  are 
truck drivers. 

An EOBR is dependent on a driver’s input. If he is not paid for all the above men-
tioned  wasted  time  he  will  not  start  the  EOBR  until  loading  or  unloading  is  com-
pleted, thus saving hours for driving. All of this has obvious repercussions on high-
way  safety,  driver  health  and  our  economy.  Another  economic  axiom  is,  ‘‘there  are 
no free lunches.’’ Truckers pay a huge hidden price with their health for this abuse 
at docks. Now they are being asked to bear the additional burden of EOBRs, an un-
constitutional  invasion  of  their  privacy.  This  would  be  nothing  more  than  the  gov-
ernment’s  categorical  ‘‘sentencing’’  of  thousands  of  persons  to  the  ‘‘wearing’’  of  elec-
tronic ankle bracelets without suspicion, probable cause, due process or any finding 
of  wrongdoing.  I’ve  read  where  electronic  monitoring  adds  precipitously  to  worker 
stress levels. 

For  many,  the  sleeper  berth  in  the  truck  is  home  away  from  home.  If  EOBRs 
record everywhere drivers go and when they go there, such data would reveal their 
routes,  the  houses  of  friends  and  relatives,  and  other  places  they  may  visit  while 
in  their  truck:  book  stores,  restaurants,  motels,  libraries,  casinos,  truck  stops,  law-
yers’  offices,  doctors’  offices,  health  clinics,  therapist  offices,  places  of  worship,  cus-
tomers,  and  possible  future  employers.  None  of  this  information  is  necessary  to  en-
force any motor carrier safety rule and none of it is anybody else’s business. 

EOBRs are not the panacea to compel better adherence to HOS regulations. If the 
objective  is  more  effective  recording  of  drivers  hours  and  improving  safety,  how, 
without  addressing  loading  and  unloading  abuse  is  this  to  be  accomplished?  Amer-
ica’s  hard  working  truck  drivers  deserve  better  from  their  government.  If  this  were 
addressed properly, benefits to safety and improvements in warehousing and truck-
ing efficiency would logically follow. 

You may ask yourself, if the trucking business is so bad, why did I continue truck-
ing  for  so  many  years?  For  as  much  as  I  hated  the  treatment  that  I’ve  described, 
I  knew  that  eventually  I’d  be  rolling  down  the  highway,  across  the  mountains,  see-
ing what others only see in dreams. Truckers personify that undefeatable American 
spirit of freedom and independence. They have an optimism that all things pass and 
tomorrow  can  be  better.  I  urge  you  to  put  the  proposal  of  EOBRs  aside,  and  give 
drivers  the  hope  that  Congress  will  pursue  real  solutions  that  address  the  actual 
causes  of  drivers’  problems  in  the  workplace.  Thank  you  for  your  attention  to  my 
comments. 

Joe  Rajkovacz  has  been  a  truck  driver  for  29  years  and  a  member  of  the  Owner- 
Operator  Independent  Drivers  Association  Board  of  Directors  for  7  years.  OOIDA 
has  submitted  extensive  comments  to  the  FMCSA’s  Advanced  Notice  of  Proposed 
Rulemaking  detailing 
its  Constitutional  arguments  against  EOBRs:  http:// 
dmses.dot.gov/docimages/pdf90/306665lweb.pdf  and  presenting  drivers’  critical 
review  of  Werner  Enterprises’  experience  with  such  devices.  See:  http:// 
dmses.dot.gov/docimages/pdf90/306665lweb.pdf  and  to  FMCSA’s  Notice  of  Pro-
posed  Rulemaking  detailing  several  legal  deficiencies  in  the  agency’s  proposed 
EOBR rule, See: http://dmses.dot.gov/docimages/pdf101/466044lweb.pdf. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

HON. JOHN H. HILL 

Question  1.  Why  doesn’t  your  proposed  rule  make  use  of  the  results  of  the  3  mil-
lion  roadside  inspections  performed  every  year  to  identify  the  motor  carriers  that 
are violating hours-of-service? 

Answer.  Under  FMCSA’s  electronic  on-board  recorders  (EOBRs)  proposal,  motor 
carriers that have demonstrated a history of serious noncompliance with the hours- 
of-service (HOS) rules would be subject to mandatory installation of EOBRs meeting 
the  new  performance  standards.  If  FMCSA  determined,  based  on  HOS  records  re-
viewed  during  each  of  two  compliance  reviews  (CRs)  conducted  within  a  2  year  pe-
riod, that a motor carrier had a 10 percent or greater violation rate (‘‘pattern viola-
tion’’) for certain HOS-related regulations, FMCSA would issue the carrier an EOBR 
remedial directive. 

Such carriers would have already demonstrated repeated noncompliance with the 
HOS regulations after being afforded an opportunity to improve. The Agency’s exist-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

65 

ing compliance oversight processes would already have singled out these carriers for 
FMCSA’s  attention  because  safety  violations  found  during  roadside  inspections, 
crash  involvement,  or  both,  placed  them  statistically  well  outside  the  norm  at  the 
time  of  the  second  CR.  The  Agency  would  also  have  provided  recommendations  to 
these  carriers  following  the  first  CR  to  guide  them  toward  improving  their  safety 
performance and regulatory compliance. 

FMCSA  considered,  but  rejected,  approaches  for  a  remedial  directives  trigger 
based  on  roadside  inspections  or  other  non-CR  procedures.  Far  more  roadside  in-
spections than CRs are performed, and these inspections generate a significant vol-
ume  of  HOS  compliance  data.  However,  certain  of  the  Agency’s  algorithms  using 
these data, such as the Driver Safety Evaluation Area (SEA) component of SafeStat 
scores,  incorporate  both  HOS  and  some  non-HOS  violations,  such  as  commercial 
driver’s  license  violations.  In  addition,  roadside  inspections  are  designed  to  deter-
mine the safety status of a driver or vehicle at a given point in time, not to provide, 
on the basis of a single examination, a broad assessment of a motor carrier’s general 
operations and safety management controls. 

CRs, by contrast, are intended to provide a broad assessment of a motor carrier’s 
overall  operations  and  safety  management  controls.  They  are  ordinarily  conducted 
at  a  motor  carrier’s  place  of  business,  involve  larger  samples  of  records,  examine 
multiple vehicles and drivers’ RODS, and typically produce a series of violation find-
ings. Motor carrier safety ratings are based largely on CR data. Given the potential 
for  an  EOBR  remedial  directive  to  place  a  serious  financial  burden  on  a  motor  car-
rier, we believe such a directive should be issued only on the basis of a broad scope 
of operational examination and extensive record review inherent to the CR process. 
Although  the  Agency  will  continue  to  compile  and  use  non-CR  data  as  in  the  past 
and  may  consider  cumulative  roadside  data  in  the  future,  FMCSA  is  proposing  to 
use only CR-based violations as direct grounds for issuance of EOBR remedial direc-
tives. The Agency would continue to capture and make use of this valuable roadside 
input by using SafeStat results as a basis for selecting carriers for CRs. 

The  FMCSA  believes  the  proposal  to  use  CR  results  was  appropriate,  based  on 
the information available at the time the proposed rule was published. The FMCSA 
is  reviewing  the  public  comments  to  its  EOBR  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking  and 
will consider whether different criteria should be used for triggering the mandatory 
use of EOBRs. 

Question  2.  Hasn’t  your  Compliance  Review  (CR)  system  been  severely  and  re-
peatedly  criticized  for  poor  data  and  mistaken  identification  of  the  more  dangerous 
motor carriers? If you propose using the data from CRs, how are you going to quick-
ly correct these defects? 

Answer.  As  part  of  FMCSA’s  recent  Notice  of  Proposed  Rulemaking,  motor  car-
riers  that  have  demonstrated  a  history  of  serious  noncompliance  with  the  hours-of- 
service  rules  would  be  subject  to  mandatory  installation  of  EOBRs.  Serious  non-
compliance  would  be  determined  based  on  hours-of-service  records  reviewed  during 
compliance reviews conducted onsite at the motor carrier’s place of business. 

The  underlying  violation  data  resulting  from  compliance  reviews  has  not  been 
routinely  criticized.  To  the  contrary,  a  recent  draft  Government  Accountability  Of-
fice  (GAO)  report  found  that  FMCSA’s  management  of  our  compliance  review  pro-
gram met their standards for internal controls, thereby promoting thoroughness and 
consistency. 

The  FMCSA’s  Safety  Status  Measurement  System  (SafeStat)  used  to  identify 
which  carriers  should  be  subjected  to  an  onsite  compliance  review  has,  however, 
been  the  subject  of  recent  reviews  that  have  identified  problems  primarily  associ-
ated  with  the  completeness  of  state-reported  crash  data.  In  response,  FMCSA  has 
implemented  a  number  of  data  quality  initiatives  that  have  resulted  in  improve-
ments. 

While  FMCSA  works  continually  to  improve  SafeStat’s  effectiveness,  the  system 
is still an efficient, effective, and useful tool for identifying high-risk motor carriers. 
The 2004 Office of Inspector General (OIG) report noted that compliance review re-
sults  support  the  ability  of  SafeStat  to  identify  high-risk  carriers.  In  addition,  a 
2007  GAO  report  indicated  that  SafeStat  works  twice  as  well  as  selecting  carriers 
randomly and, therefore, has value for improving safety. 

The crash data quality issues identified in recent GAO and OIG reports have the 
potential to allow some high-risk carriers to escape scrutiny. They do not, however, 
mean that the carriers FMCSA has identified are not high-risk. 

With  respect  to  the  EOBR  proposed  rule,  an  important  point  is  that  any  motor 
carrier that would be subject to mandatory installation would have had their hours- 
of-service  problems  documented  through  more  than  one  on-site  compliance  review 
and  would  have  been  afforded  full  due  process  before  being  required  to  install 
EOBRs. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

66 

Question  3.  If  you  are  concerned  about  U.S.  motor  carriers  and  drivers  violating 
hours-of-service and falsifying logbooks, why aren’t you requiring electronic on-board 
recorders for all Mexico-domiciled motor carriers? 

Answer.  The  FMCSA’s  proposal  to  require  the  mandatory  use  of  EOBRs  by  cer-
tain  motor  carriers  is  intended  to  serve  as  a  corrective  measure  for  motor  carriers 
that  have  demonstration  a  history  of  serious  noncompliance  with  the  hours-of-serv-
ice rules. The FMCSA is not aware of any information that would suggest that Mex-
ico-domiciled motor carriers, as a group, have a demonstrated history of serious non-
compliance with the hours-of-service regulations. 

The FMCSA requires that all motor carriers operating commercial motor vehicles 
within the United States comply with the applicable HOS requirements. The Agency 
recognizes  that  there  are  differences  between  the  HOS  requirements  of  the  United 
States  and  Mexico.  However,  the  fact  that  Mexico-domiciled  carriers  operating  in 
Mexico  are  not  subject  to  FMCSA’s  requirements  while  they  operate  within  Mexico 
does not mean these carriers have a history of serious noncompliance with FMCSA’s 
hours-of-service rules. 

Question  4.  Is  there  data  that  shows  that  truck  drivers  working  nearly  100  hour 
weeks are just as safe and healthy as workers who work more conventional jobs re-
quiring 40-hour work weeks? 

Answer.  On  August  25,  2005,  FMCSA  published  a  final  rule  revising  its  hours- 
of-service regulations or drivers of property-carrying commercial motor vehicles. The 
2005 HOS rule provides increased opportunities for drivers to obtain necessary rest 
and restorative sleep, while also recognizing the need to provide motor carriers with 
flexibility  to  move  products  and  while  ensuring  safe  operations.  The  FMCSA’s  re-
vised  HOS  rule  balanced  considerations  of  driver  and  public  safety,  driver  health, 
and  costs  and  benefits  to  the  public  and  the  motor  carrier  industry—all  factors  the 
Agency is statutorily required to consider under 49 U.S.C. 31136. 

On July 24, 2007, the United States Court of Appeals for the D.C. Circuit vacated 
those  portions  of  the  2005  final  rule  that  increase  the  daily  driving  limit  from  10 
to  11  hours,  and  that  permit  an  off-duty  period  of  34  hours  to  restart  the  weekly 
on-duty  limits.  Therefore,  motor  carriers  employing  drivers  of  property-carrying  ve-
hicles  no  longer  have  the  opportunity  to  use  the  restart  provision.  Other  portions 
of  the  rule  that  remain  in  effect  include:  a  more  stringent  sleeper  berth  provision 
that  bars  drivers  from  splitting  their  off-duty  sleep  period  by  requiring  one  8-hour 
rest  period;  the  10  hour  off-duty  requirement  to  enable  8  hours  of  continuous  rest; 
and  a  more  restrictive  14  hour  non-extendable  duty  tour  ‘‘driving  window.’’  The 
FMCSA  is  analyzing  the  court’s  opinion  regarding  driving  time  in  light  of  its  man-
date to protect the health and safety of drivers. 

Question 5. FMCSA stated in the proposed rule that falsifying logbooks is a perva-
sive  and  chronic  problem.  These  rules  exist  to  prevent  accident  and  injury.  Why 
isn’t  the  FMCSA  using  every  technology,  including  requiring  on-board  recorders  in 
all large commercial motor vehicles to stop these violations? If FMCSA can’t justify 
enforcing the rules, can the rules themselves be justified? 

Answer. The FMCSA recognizes the views of many in the highway safety commu-
nity  and  the  general  public  about  mandating  EOBRs  for  the  entire  motor  carrier 
industry.  However,  there  are  several  million  trucks  and  buses  on  America’s  roads 
today. The FMCSA’s estimated safety benefits of mandating EOBRs on each of these 
vehicles  was  far  less  than  the  estimated  costs  of  doing  so,  at  the  time  the  Agency 
published  the  NPRM.  Therefore,  the  Agency  focused  on  finding  other  ways  to  get 
more  of  these  units  on  commercial  motor  vehicles,  while  targeting  those  with  the 
greatest safety risk, without creating an unreasonable burden. This is why the pro-
posed rule would encourage industry-wide use of EOBRs by providing incentives for 
voluntary use, rather than mandating the devices for the entire industry. 

Question 6. How are you going to stop hours-of-service violations and logbook fal-
sification  by  only  requiring  about  one  one-hundredth  of  1  percent  of  motor  carriers 
each year to have to install and use electronic on-board recorders? 

Answer. The Agency is aware of comments suggesting the final rule should cover 

more motor carriers, and is considering how to address such comments. 

The FMCSA focuses on those companies that are most likely to be a safety hazard 
on the road in its enforcement activities. Under this proposed rule, only those truck 
and bus companies with a history of serious hours-of-service violations would be re-
quired  to  install  electronic  on-board  recorders  in  all  of  their  commercial  vehicles. 
Within  the  first  2  years  that  the  rule  would  be  enforced,  we  estimate  that  about 
930 carriers with 17,500 drivers would fall under this requirement. 

The FMCSA, based on its safety research, believes that motor carriers whose driv-
ers routinely exceed HOS limits have an increased probability of involvement in fa-
tigue-related  crashes  and  therefore  present  a  disproportionately  high-risk  to  high-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

67 

way  safety.  Based  on  the  agency’s  analysis  of  its  Motor  Carrier  Management  Infor-
mation System (MCMIS) data from CRs conducted since 1995 on motor carriers op-
erating  in  interstate  commerce,  carriers  to  which  a  remedial  directive  would  apply 
under  this  proposal  have  crash  rates  that  are  87  percent  higher  than  average.  The 
crash  rate  for  these  carriers  is  an  indication  that  they  should  be  a  top  priority  for 
the Agency. 

The  FMCSA  recognizes  the  views  of  many  in  the  highway  safety  community  and 
the  general  public  about  mandating  EOBRs.  However,  there  are  several  million 
trucks and buses on America’s roads today. The FMCSA’s estimated safety benefits 
of mandating EOBRs on each of these vehicles was far less than the estimated costs 
of doing so, at the time the Agency published the NPRM. Therefore, the Agency fo-
cused  on  finding  other  ways  to  get  more  of  these  units  on  commercial  motor  vehi-
cles, without creating an unreasonable burden with a government mandate. This is 
why  the  proposed  rule  would  encourage  industry-wide  use  of  EOBRs  by  providing 
incentives for voluntary use, rather than mandating the devices for the entire indus-
try. 

Question  7.  Why  aren’t  you  preventing  fraud,  misuse,  and  tampering  by  setting 

enforceable requirements in your EOBR proposed rule? 

Answer. The FMCSA believes the proposed performance standards for EOBRs are 
enforceable. However, while the Agency has authority to regulate motor carriers and 
drivers,  it  does  not  have  direct  regulatory  authority  over  EOBR  manufacturers.  In 
developing  the  proposed  requirements  for  EOBRs,  FMCSA  focused  its  attention  on 
seven  research  factors  listed  in  the  ANPRM:  (1)  Ability  to  identify  the  individual 
driver;  (2)  Tamper  resistance;  (3)  Ability  to  produce  records  for  audit;  (4)  Ability  of 
roadside  enforcement  personnel  to  access  the  HOS  information  quickly  and  easily; 
(5)  Level  of  protection  afforded  other  personal,  operational,  or  proprietary  informa-
tion; (6) Cost; and (7) Driver acceptability. 

The  FMCSA  proposed  that  the  EOBR  record  basic  information  needed  to  track 
duty status, including the identity of the driver, duty status, date and time, location 
of  the  CMV,  distance  traveled,  and  other  items  that  the  driver  would  enter  (such 
as  truck  numbers  and  shipping  document  numbers).  The  EOBR  would  be  required 
to identify the driver, although FMCSA does not propose mandating a specific iden-
tification  method.  This  approach  would  allow  carriers  to  use  existing  identification 
systems or implement newer technologies as they become feasible. 

While  many  of  the  proposed  requirements,  such  as  that  for  tamper  resistance, 
parallel  the  requirements  for  AOBRDs,  others  would  extend  the  AOBRD  require-
ments  based  on  our  expectation  that  the  EOBR  will  have  a  high  degree  of  reli-
ability.  For  example,  FMCSA  proposed  that  the  EOBR  would  not  need  to  be  inte-
grally synchronized to the engine or other vehicle equipment. An EOBR must, how-
ever,  have  GPS  or  other  location  tracking  systems  that  record  location  of  the  CMV 
at  least  once  a  minute.  EOBRs  could  still  use  sources  internal  to  the  vehicle  to 
record distance traveled and time. EOBRs must perform a power-on self-test on de-
mand and must also warn the driver if the device ceased to function. Maintenance, 
recalibration,  and  self-certification  requirements  would  be  similar  to  those  for 
AOBRDs. 

Question  8.  How  are  you  going  to  prevent  fraud  and  misuse  by  allowing  portable 
cell  phones  to  be  used  for  showing  hours-of-service  compliance  and  without  linking 
an EOBR with engines and electronic control modules? 

Answer. The purpose of an AOBRD or EOBR is to accurately record a driver’s se-
quence  of  duty  statuses,  the  time  the  driver  is  engaged  in  a  given  duty  status  cat-
egory, and the sequence of dates, times, and locations that make up a trip. Histori-
cally,  the  only  information  available  from  a  source  not  directly  controlled  by  the 
driver was the driving time and distance, both of which were obtained from a source 
on  the  vehicle.  Change-of-duty  status  locations  had  to  be  entered  manually.  In  the 
20 years since AOBRDs were first used, communications and logistics management 
technologies have evolved to enable a more fundamental item of information vehicle 
location to be tracked and recorded. The precision and accuracy of this recording has 
come to rival or surpass that of distance-and-time records from the CMV. 

FMCSA believes it is appropriate to offer an alternative, performance-oriented ap-
proach that allows motor carriers and EOBR developers to take advantage of emerg-
ing  technologies.  Specifically,  FMCSA  now  believes  that  an  EOBR  does  not  nec-
essarily  have  to  be  ‘‘integrally  synchronized’’  with  the  CMV  to  provide  an  accurate 
record of driving time, equivalent to that of an electronic odometer or the time func-
tion contained in an ECM. The Agency is proposing to allow two ways to record dis-
tance  traveled  and  time:  (1)  via  sources  internal  to  the  vehicle  (i.e.,  the  ECM  with 
an  internal  clock/calendar)  to  derive  distance  traveled,  or  (2)  via  sources  external 
to the vehicle (i.e., location-reference systems—GPS, terrestrial, or a combination of 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

68 

both)  recording  location  of  the  CMV  once  per  minute  and  using  a  synchronized 
clock/calendar to derive distance traveled (‘‘electronic breadcrumbs’’). This approach 
has  the  potential  advantages  of  removing  a  restrictive  design  requirement,  pro-
viding  an  opportunity  for  innovation,  and  allowing  use  of  less  expensive  hardware 
(e.g.,  GPS-enabled  cell  phones),  without  making  existing  synchronized  devices  obso-
lete. 

Regardless  of  the  communications  modes  (wireless  or  terrestrial)  and  the  method 
used  to  synchronize  the  time  and  CMV-operation  information  into  an  electronic 
RODS,  FMCSA  would  require  the  records  from  EOBRs  to  record  duty  status  infor-
mation  accurately.  The  difference  proposed  between  actual  distance  traveled  and 
distance  computed  via  location-tracking  methods  over  a  24-hour  period  would  be  ± 
1  percent.  EOBR  developers  would  need  to  test  their  devices  thoroughly  to  ensure 
they meet or exceed these tolerances. 

Question 9. How are you going to guarantee that the driver of a rig with an EOBR 

is actually the authorized or bona fide driver? 

Answer.  The  FMCSA’s  proposal  would  correct  an  apparent  gap  in  the  existing 
automatic  on-board  recorder  (AOBRD)  regulation.  The  current  rule  includes  no  ex-
plicit  requirement  for  driver  identification  beyond  requiring  the  driver’s  signature 
on hard copies of the record of duty status. The proposed rule would require driver 
identification, without prescribing a specific method. 

The  FMCSA  recognizes  the  diversity  of  motor  carrier  operations  and  acknowl-
edges  that  numerous  commenters’  to  the  Agency’s  2004  advance  notice  of  proposed 
rulemaking (ANPRM) expressed concerns about the potential costs of advanced driv-
er identification methods such as biometric identifiers and smart cards. Various ap-
proaches to identification currently exist, while others are being developed, and car-
riers may have different needs and standards regarding an acceptable level of risk. 
Rather than limiting carriers’ ability to adopt technically advanced systems or im-
posing  duplicative  requirements  on  carriers  desiring  more  secure  systems,  FMCSA 
proposed  adopting  a  general  requirement  that  driver  identification  be  part  of  the 
EOBR  record,  without  prescribing  a  specific  approach.  An  EOBR  would  require  the 
driver  to  enter  self-identifying  information  (e.g.,  user  ID  and  password,  PIN  num-
bers)  or  to  provide  other  identifying  information  (e.g.,  smart  card,  biometrics)  when 
he or she logs on to the EOBR system. 

In  developing  its  proposed  rule,  FMCSA  also  considered  ANPRM  comments  sug-
gesting that the Agency require use of the Department of Homeland Security’s pro-
posed Transportation Working Identification Card (TWIC) to identify the CMV driv-
er  and  possibly  serve  as  a  portable  data  record,  FMCSA  does  not  presently  antici-
pate  using  TWIC  for  EOBR  HOS  data  storage.  There  are  several  reasons  for  this. 
While  the  amount  of  memory  required  has  yet  to  be  specified,  it  is  expected  to  be 
less than what would be needed for an EOBR application. Furthermore, FMCSA ac-
knowledges concerns about driver and motor carrier privacy; some information con-
tained on the TWIC would not be relevant to an HOS record. 

Question 10. Do you agree that waiting, loading and unloading activities for truck 
drivers  can  contribute  to  fatigue?  Will  the  FMCSA  consider  requiring  that  carriers 
who use EOBRs ensure that on-duty, not driving time is also entered into the EOBR 
system to keep track of these waiting, loading and unloading activities? 

Answer.  Yes.  All  motor  carriers  that  are  required  to  maintain  a  record  of  duty 
status,  whether  handwritten  or  electronic,  must  continue  to  ensure  that  the  record 
accurately documents all driving time, and other duty time, such as waiting, loading 
and unloading. 

In developing the proposed requirements for EOBRs, FMCSA focused its attention 
on seven research factors listed in the ANPRM: (1) Ability to identify the individual 
driver;  (2)  Tamper  resistance;  (3)  Ability  to  produce  records  for  audit;  (4)  Ability  of 
roadside  enforcement  personnel  to  access  the  HOS  information  quickly  and  easily; 
(5)  Level  of  protection  afforded  other  personal,  operational,  or  proprietary  informa-
tion;  (6)  Cost;  and  (7)  Driver  acceptability.  The  FMCSA  proposed  that  the  EOBR 
record  basic  information  needed  to  track  duty  status,  including  the  identity  of  the 
driver, duty status, date and time, location of the CMV, distance traveled, and other 
items  that  the  driver  would  enter  (such  as  truck  numbers  and  shipping  document 
numbers).  The  EOBR  would  also  be  required  to  identify  the  driver,  although 
FMCSA does not propose mandating a specific identification method. This approach 
would allow carriers to use existing identification systems or implement newer tech-
nologies as they become feasible. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

CAPTAIN JOHN E. HARRISON 

69 

Question 1. Do you believe that EOBR’s will permit enforcement officials to more 

efficiently and accurately determine hours-of-service violations? 

Answer. Yes, if there are uniform standards regarding their design and implemen-
tation (i.e. standard interface for enforcement). As important, if not more so, is how 
to  ‘‘enforce’’  these  standards.  There  should  be  a  3rd  party  independent  certification 
(initial and ongoing) program and a list of ‘‘approved’’ EOBRs. This will help to give 
comfort  to  those  buying  EOBRs  and  enforcement  officers  using  them  that  they  are 
certified to a certain standard. 

Question 2. Currently, how long does it take, on average, for enforcement officials 
to  review  and  verify  a  driver’s  paper  logbook?  How  do  enforcement  officials  verify 
the  information  in  the  paper  logbook  and  corroborate  evidence  to  support  driver’s 
notations? 

Answer. It depends on the complexity of the trip and the nature of the interview. 
Generally  speaking,  the  hours-of-service  portion  of  the  inspection  takes  approxi-
mately 10–15 minutes. Law enforcement uses the driver interview, supporting docu-
ments such as bills of lading, toll receipts, fuel receipts, gate receipts and other trip- 
related documentation to review hours-of-service compliance. 

Question  3.  From  your  organization’s  perspective,  how  large  is  the  problem  of 

drivers falsifying logbooks and exceeding their hours-of-service limits? 

Answer. We believe it is larger than what the data show. 
Question  4.  Do  you  believe  there  is  a  corollary  between  drivers  who  violate  the 

hours-of-service rules and safety? 

Answer. Yes we do. The attached research report corroborates this. 

PREDICTING TRUCK CRASH INVOLVEMENT: DEVELOPING A COMMERCIAL DRIVER 

BEHAVIOR-BASED MODEL AND RECOMMENDED COUNTERMEASURES, 

A Report by American Transportation Research Institute (ATRI) 

The Problem 

Efforts  by  government  and  industry  over  the  years  to  reduce  large  truck  crashes 
have  led  to  a  number  of  significant  positive  trends.  The  U.S.  Department  of  Trans-
portation  (USDOT)  recently  reported  a  decrease  in  the  fatal  crash  rate  for  large 
trucks from 2.2 fatalities per 100M vehicle miles traveled (VMT) in 2000 to 1.9 fatal 
crashes  per  100M  VMT  in  2003.1 In  spite  of  increasing  VMT  and  increased  conges-
tion  over  the  years,  the  trucking  industry  has  seen  a  general  downward  trend  in 
fatal, injury and property damage crash rates over the last 20 years. 

However, both industry and government recognize that more must be done to re-
duce the overall number of large truck crashes. Prior research studies, including the 
Federal  Motor  Carrier  Safety  Administration  (FMCSA)  Large  Truck  Crash  Causa-
tion  Study,  point  to  driver-related  factors  as  a  critical  reason  for  the  majority  of 
crashes involving large trucks. Therefore, focusing on driver behaviors will have the 
most profound impact on crash reduction. 
Research Goal 

The objective of this research was to design and test an analytical model for pre-
dicting future crash involvement based on prior driver history information. A second 
objective  of  the  research,  conducted  in  conjunction  with  the  Commercial  Vehicle 
Safety  Alliance  (CVSA),  was  to  identify  effective  enforcement  actions  to  counteract 
the  driving  behaviors  and  events  that  are  predictive  of  future  crash  involvement. 
Methodology 

This  research  is  one  of  the  first  studies  of  its  kind  to  analyze  several  available 
subsets  of  driver-specific  data  and  statistically  relate  the  data  to  future  crashes. 
Data sources included the Motor Carrier Management Information System (MCMIS) 
and the Commercial Drivers License Information System (CDLIS). 

The main dependent variable is crash involvement. For purposes of this research, 
crash involvement is the objective measure of driver ‘‘safety.’’ The independent vari-
ables are driver-specific performance indicators mined from the data including: spe-
cific violations; driver traffic conviction information; as well as past accident involve-
ment information. 

1 Large Truck Crash Facts 2003, Analysis Division, Federal Motor Carrier Safety Administra-

tion, FMCSA–RI–04–033, February 2005. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

70 

Driver  data  was  gathered  across  a  3-year  timeframe,  and  was  analyzed  to  deter-
mine  future  crash  predictability.  For  each  of  the  drivers  in  the  selected  samples, 
driver  history  regarding  past  inspections  and  crashes  were  derived  from  MCMIS, 
and  past  conviction  data  was  derived  from  CDLIS.  Descriptive  statistics  were  run 
on this entire dataset to develop the targeted samples. 

Appropriate  statistical  tests,  including  chi-square  analyses,  were  used  to  identify 
statistically  significant  predictions  for  future  crash  involvement  based  on  past  in-
spection, conviction, and/or crash information. 

In  order  to  associate  the  negative  behaviors  and  events  with  enforcement  strate-
gies  on  a  state-by-state  basis,  an  objective  measure  was  created  that  developed  a 
statistical relationship between CMV traffic enforcement and a weighted crash met-
ric.  All  51  enforcement  jurisdictions  were  surveyed  to  identify  current  enforcement 
activities  addressing  CMV  driver  behavior.  Additional  research  was  conducted  on 
those  states  identified  as  ‘‘top  tier’’  to  identify  targeted  enforcement  strategies  and 
best practices. 
Findings 

The  predictive  model  included  data  on  540,750  drivers.  The  analysis  shows  reck-
less  driving  and  improper  turn  violations  as  the  two  violations  associated  with  the 
highest  increase  in  likelihood  of  a  future  crash.  The  four  convictions  with  the  high-
est likelihood of a future crash are: improper or erratic lane change; failure to yield 
right of way; improper turn; and failure to maintain proper lane. When a driver re-
ceives  a  conviction  for  one  of  these  behaviors,  the  likelihood  of  a  future  crash  in-
creases  between  91  and  100  percent.  Table  1  ranks  the  top  10  driver  events  by  the 
percentage increase in the likelihood of a future crash. 

The  targeted  surveys  and  interviews  indicated  that  successful  enforcement  pro-
grams and strategies for addressing problem driver behaviors are those that exhibit 
one or more of the following components: 

• Center on aggressive driving apprehension programs/initiatives; 
• Target  both  commercial  motor  vehicle  (CMV)  and  non-CMV  behavior  patterns; 
• Utilize both highly visible and covert enforcement activities; and 
• Incorporate an internal performance-based system for managing enforcement by 

specific crash types, driver behaviors, and locations. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

s
p
e

.
i
r
t
a
1
0
5

71 

The research also surveyed carriers to identify those hiring, training, and remedi-
ation  practices  most  likely  to  mitigate  the  impacts  of  the  problem  behaviors  identi-
fied. 

A  complete  listing  of  findings  and  recommendations  can  be  found  in  the  full  re-
port,  Predicting  Truck  Crash  Involvement:  Developing  a  Commercial  Driver  Behav-
ior-Based Model and Recommended Countermeasures.* 

To  receive  a  copy  of  this  report  and  other  ATRI  studies,  please  visit:  www.atri- 

online.org. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO 

RICHARD S. REISER 

Question. Do you have an explanation of why your drivers regularly falsified their 
Qualcomm logs a few years ago when you started the FMCSA’s pilot program to test 
Qualcomm’s GPS system for monitoring truck driver hours-of-service compliance? 

Answer.  We  are  uncertain  of  the  context  in  which  it  is  alleged  that  our  drivers 
‘‘regularly falsified their Qualcomm logs a few years ago’’. We have sought clarifica-
tion  of  that  through  the  American  Trucking  Associations;  however,  as  of  this  time 
we have not received a clarification of the question. In view of the impending dead-
line, we will attempt to answer the question as we understand it. 

The  concept  and  design  of  the  Werner  Paperless  Log  System  was  to  create  an 
automated logging system for our drivers. The purpose was not to create simply an 
electronic  means  of  recording  logbook  information,  but  to  create  a  system  which 
would  do  so  automatically  with  minimal  driver  input.  Stated  differently,  we  were 
not attempting to simply replace a hand written document with a type written docu-
ment.  We  should  also  explain  that  both  the  idea  and  motivation  for  the  Paperless 
Log  System  originated  from  Werner  with  the  dual  goals  of  improving  the  accuracy 
of driver records of duty status and the safety of its fleet. 

In order to accomplish an automated logging system it was necessary that certain 
assumptions be made. Those assumptions were made on the basis of what the most 
frequent, or most common response would be to a particular situation, and the driv-
er given the means of overriding that assumed response as necessary. Drivers were 
instructed to do so. One of the assumptions made in the first stages of the pilot pro-
gram,  which  was  based  on  years  of  experience  with  records  of  duty  status  in  our 
fleet,  was  that  if  a  truck  stopped  moving  for  a  certain  period  of  time  (15  minutes), 
it was assumed that the driver had gone off-duty. A log entry would be entered ac-
cordingly.  That  was  the  most  common  situation  when  a  driver  ceased  moving  for 
a period in excess of 15 minutes. Obviously, however, there were times when a driv-
er ceased moving and then went on-duty not driving. In those situations, the driver 
was  instructed  to  override  the  assumption  and  show  that  he  was  in  fact  on-duty. 
During the course of the pilot program and the frequent auditing of the pilot pro-
gram by FMCSA, FMCSA became concerned that some drivers were simply accept-
ing  the  assumption  that  they  had  gone  off-duty  and  were  failing  to  override  that 
assumption to show that they were in fact on-duty not driving. Doing so would cre-
ate the effect of a false log. Although there was no indication that this was a wide-
spread problem, FMCSA required that assumption be changed, so that when a truck 
ceased moving for a period of time, the driver would be placed ‘‘on-duty not driving’’, 
and  would  therefore  be  less  likely  to  accept  that  assumption  if  he  was  ‘‘off-duty’’. 
The  changes  which  were  made  in  the  program  to  change  the  automatic  assump-
tion,  have  been  reviewed  by  FMCSA  and  found  acceptable  prior  to  the  time  an  ex-
emption was granted. If you have any additional questions concerning this, or if this 
is not the issue to which your question was directed, please feel free to contact me. 

Æ 

* This report is maintained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  08:53 Mar 07, 2013 Jkt 075679 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\79551.TXT JACKIE

